Imperialism, the Highest Stage of Capitalism

A POPULAR OUTLINE

Vladimir Ilyich Lenin

 

 

WRITTEN: January-June, 1916 

PUBLISHED: First published in mid-1917 in pamphlet form, Petrograd.
Published according to the manuscript and verified with the text of the
pamphlet.

SOURCE: Lenin’s _Selected Works_, Progress Publishers, 1963,
Moscow, Volume 1, pp. 667–766.

TRANSCRIPTION\MARKUP: Tim Delaney & Kevin Goins (2008)

PUBLIC DOMAIN: Lenin Internet Archive (marxists.org) 2005. You may
freely copy, distribute, display and perform this work; as well as make
derivative and commercial works. Please credit “Marxists Internet
Archive” as your source.

 

HTML VERSION:
http://marxists.org/archive/lenin/works/1916/imp-hsc/index.htm

 

CONVERTED TO EBOOK FORMAT BY: Sajjan Singh (2014)

 

Contents

Imperialism, the Highest Stage of Capitalism

A POPULAR OUTLINE

Vladimir Ilyich Lenin

PREFACE

PREFACE TO THE FRENCH AND GERMAN EDITIONS

I. CONCENTRATION OF PRODUCTION AND MONOPOLIES

II. BANKS AND THEIR NEW ROLE

III. FINANCE CAPITAL AND THE FINANCIAL OLIGARCHY

IV. EXPORT OF CAPITAL

VI. DIVISION OF THE WORLD AMONG THE GREAT POWERS

VII. IMPERIALISM AS A SPECIAL STAGE OF CAPITALISM

VIII. PARASITISM AND DECAY OF CAPITALISM

IX. CRITIQUE OF IMPERIALISM

X. THE PLACE OF IMPERIALISM IN HISTORY

 



PREFACE


 

The pamphlet here presented to the reader was written in the spring of
1916, in Zurich. In the conditions in which I was obliged to work there
I naturally suffered somewhat from a shortage of French and English
literature and from a serious dearth of Russian literature. However, I
made use of the principal English work on imperialism, the book by J. A.
Hobson, with all the care that, in my opinion, work deserves.

 

This pamphlet was written with an eye to the tsarist censorship. Hence,
I was not only forced to confine myself strictly to an exclusively
theoretical, specifically economic analysis of facts, but to formulate
the few necessary observations on politics with extreme caution, by
hints, in an allegorical language—in that accursed Aesopian language—to
which tsarism compelled all revolutionaries to have recourse whenever
they took up the pen to write a “legal” work.

 

It is painful, in these days of liberty, to re-read the passages of the
pamphlet which have been distorted, cramped, compressed in an iron vice
on account of the censor. That the period of imperialism is the eve of
the socialist revolution; that social-chauvinism (socialism in words,
chauvinism in deeds) is the utter betrayal of socialism, complete
desertion to the side of the bourgeoisie; that this split in the
working-class movement is bound up with the objective conditions of
imperialism, etc.—on these matters I had to speak in a “slavish” tongue,
and I must refer the reader who is interested in the subject to the
articles I wrote abroad in 1914-17, a new edition of which is soon to
appear. In order to show the reader, in a guise acceptable to
the censors, how shamelessly untruthful the capitalists and the
social-chauvinists who have deserted to their side (and whom Kautsky
opposes so inconsistently) are on the question of annexations; in order
to show how shamelessly they_ screen_ the annexations
of _their_ capitalists, I was forced to quote as an example—Japan! The
careful reader will easily substitute Russia for Japan, and Finland,
Poland, Courland, the Ukraine, Khiva, Bokhara, Estonia or other regions
peopled by non-Great Russians, for Korea.

 

I trust that this pamphlet will help the reader to understand the
fundamental economic question, that of the economic essence of
imperialism, for unless this is studied, it will be impossible to
understand and appraise modern war and modern politics.

 

Author

Petrograd, April 26, 1917

 

PREFACE TO THE FRENCH AND GERMAN EDITIONS

 

I

 

As was indicated in the preface to the Russian edition, this pamphlet
was written in 1916, with an eye to the tsarist censorship. I am unable
to revise the whole text at the present time, nor, perhaps, would this
be advisable, since the main purpose of the book was, and remains, to
present, on the basis of the summarised returns of irrefutable bourgeois
statistics, and the admissions of bourgeois scholars of all
countries, _a composite picture_ of the world capitalist system in its
international relationships at the beginning of the twentieth century—on
the eve of the first world imperialist war.

 

To a certain extent it will even be useful for many Communists in
advanced capitalist countries to convince themselves by the example of
this pamphlet, legal from the standpoint of the tsarist censor, of the
possibility, and necessity, of making use of even the slight remnants of
legality which still remain at the disposal of the Communists, say, in
contemporary America or France, after the recent almost wholesale
arrests of Communists, in order to explain the utter falsity of
social-pacifist views and hopes for “world democracy”. The most
essential of what should be added to this censored pamphlet I shall try
to present in this preface.

 

II

 

It is proved in the pamphlet that the war of 1914-18 was imperialist
(that is, an annexationist, predatory, war of plunder) on the part of
both sides; it was a war for the division of the world, for the
partition and repartition of colonies and spheres of influence of
finance capital, etc.

 

Proof of what was the true social, or rather, the true class character
of the war is naturally to be found, not in the diplomatic history of
the war, but in an analysis of the _objective_ position of the
ruling _classes_ in _all_ the belligerent countries. In order to depict
this objective position one must not take examples or isolated data (in
view of the extreme complexity of the phenomena of social life it is
always possible to select any number of examples or separate data to
prove any proposition), but _all_ the data on the _basis_ of economic
life in _all_ the belligerent countries and the whole world.

 

It is precisely irrefutable summarised data of this kind that I quoted
in describing the _partition of the world_ in 1876 and 1914 (in Chapter
VI) and the division of the world’s _railways_ in 1890 and 1913 (in
Chapter VII). Railways are a summation of the basic capitalist
industries, coal, iron and steel; a summation and the most striking
index of the development of world trade and bourgeois-democratic
civilisation. How the railways are linked up with large-scale industry,
with monopolies, syndicates, cartels, trusts, banks and the financial
oligarchy is shown in the preceding chapters of the book. The uneven
distribution of the railways, their uneven development—sums up, as it
were, modern monopolist capitalism on a world-wide scale. And this
summary proves that imperialist wars are absolutely inevitable
under _such_ an economic system, _as long as_ private property in the
means of production exists.

 

The building of railways seems to be a simple, natural, democratic,
cultural and civilising enterprise; that is what it is in the opinion of
the bourgeois professors who are paid to depict capitalist slavery in
bright colours, and in the opinion of petty-bourgeois philistines. But
as a matter of fact the capitalist threads, which in thousands of
different intercrossings bind these enterprises with private property in
the means of production in general, have converted this railway
construction into an instrument for oppressing _a thousand
million_ people (in the colonies and semicolonies), that is, more than
half the population of the globe that inhabits the dependent countries,
as well as the wage-slaves of capital in the “civilised” countries.

 

Private property based on the labour of the small proprietor, free
competition, democracy, all the catchwords with which the capitalists
and their press deceive the workers and the peasants are things of the
distant past. Capitalism has grown into a world system of colonial
oppression and of the financial strangulation of the overwhelming
majority of the population of the world by a handful of “advanced”
countries. And this “booty” is shared between two or three powerful
world plunderers armed to the teeth (America, Great Britain, Japan), who
are drawing the whole world into _their_ war over the division
of _their_ booty.

 

III

 

The Treaty of Brest-Litovsk dictated by monarchist Germany, and the
subsequent much more brutal and despicable Treaty of Versailles dictated
by the “democratic” republics of America and France and also by “free”
Britain, have rendered a most useful service to humanity by exposing
both imperialism’s hired coolies of the pen and petty-bourgeois
reactionaries who, although they call themselves pacifists and
socialists, sang praises to “Wilsonism”, and insisted that peace and
reforms were possible under imperialism.

 

The tens of millions of dead and maimed left by the war—a war to decide
whether the British or German group of financial plunderers is to
receive the most booty—and those two “peace treaties”, are with
unprecedented rapidity opening the eyes of the millions and tens of
millions of people who are downtrodden, oppressed, deceived and duped by
the bourgeoisie. Thus, out of the universal ruin caused by the war a
world-wide revolutionary crisis is arising which, however prolonged and
arduous its stages may be, cannot end otherwise than in a proletarian
revolution and in its victory.

 

The Basle Manifesto of the Second International, which in 1912 gave an
appraisal of the very war that broke out in 1914 and not of war in
general (there are different kinds of wars, including revolutionary
wars)—this Manifesto is now a monument exposing to the full the shameful
bankruptcy and treachery of the heroes of the Second International.

 

That is why I reproduce this Manifesto (This Manifesto is not given as
an appendix to this edition—Ed) as a supplement to the present edition,
and again and again I urge the reader to note that the heroes of the
Second International are as assiduously avoiding the passages of this
Manifesto which speak precisely, clearly and definitely of the
connection between that impending war and the proletarian revolution, as
a thief avoids the scene of his crime.

 

IV

 

Special attention has been devoted in this pamphlet to a criticism of
Kautskyism, the international ideological trend represented in all
countries of the world by the “most prominent theoreticians”, the
leaders of the Second International (Otto Bauer and Co. in Austria,
Ramsay MacDonald and others in Britain, Albert Thomas in France, etc.,
etc.) and a multitude of socialists, reformists, pacifists, bourgeois
democrats and parsons.

 

This ideological trend is, on the one hand, a product of the
disintegration and decay of the Second International, and, on the other
hand, the inevitable fruit of the ideology of the petty bourgeoisie,
whose entire way of life holds them captive to bourgeois and democratic
prejudices.

 

The views held by Kautsky and his like are a complete renunciation of
those same revolutionary principles of Marxism that writer has
championed for decades, especially, by the way, in his struggle against
socialist opportunism (of Bernstein, Millerand, Hyndman, Gompers, etc.).
It is not a mere accident, therefore, that Kautsky’s followers all over
the world have now united in practical politics with the extreme
opportunists (through the Second, or Yellow International) and with the
bourgeois governments (through bourgeois coalition governments in which
socialists take part).

 

The growing world proletarian revolutionary movement in general, and the
communist movement in particular, cannot dispense with an analysis and
exposure of the theoretical errors of Kautskyism. The more so since
pacifism and “democracy” in general, which lay no claim to Marxism
whatever, but which, like Kautsky and Co., are obscuring the profundity
of the contradictions of imperialism and the inevitable revolutionary
crisis to which it gives rise, are still very widespread all over the
world. To combat these tendencies is the bounden duty of the party of
the proletariat, which must win away from the bourgeoisie the small
proprietors who are duped by them, and the millions of working people
who enjoy more or less petty-bourgeois conditions of life.

 

V

 

A few words must be said about Chapter VIII, “Parasitism and Decay of
Capitalism”. As already pointed out in the text, Hilferding,
ex-“Marxist”, and now a comrade-in-arms of Kautsky and one of the chief
exponents of bourgeois, reformist policy in the Independent
Social-Democratic Party of Germany, has taken a step backward on this
question compared with the _frankly_ pacifist and reformist Englishman,
Hobson. The international split of the entire working-class movement is
now quite evident (the Second and the Third Internationals). The fact
that armed struggle and civil war is now raging between the two trends
is also evident—the support given to Kolchak and Denikin in Russia by
the Mensheviks and Socialist-Revolutionaries against the Bolsheviks; the
fight the Scheidemanns and Noskes have conducted in conjunction with the
bourgeoisie against the Spartacists in Germany; the same thing in
Finland, Poland, Hungary, etc. What is the economic basis of this
world-historical phenomenon?

 

It is precisely the parasitism and decay of capitalism, characteristic
of its highest historical stage of development, i.e., imperialism. As
this pamphlet shows, capitalism has now singled out a _handful_ (less
than one-tenth of the inhabitants of the globe; less than one-fifth at a
most “generous” and liberal calculation) of exceptionally rich and
powerful states which plunder the whole world simply by “clipping
coupons”. Capital exports yield an income of eight to ten thousand
million francs per annum, at pre-war prices and according to pre-war
bourgeois statistics. Now, of course, they yield much more.

 

Obviously, out of such enormous _superprofits_ (since they are obtained
over and above the profits which capitalists squeeze out of the workers
of their “own” country) it is _possible to bribe_ the labour leaders and
the upper stratum of the labour aristocracy. And that is just what the
capitalists of the “advanced” countries are doing: they are bribing them
in a thousand different ways, direct and indirect, overt and covert.

 

This stratum of workers-turned-bourgeois, or the labour aristocracy, who
are quite philistine in their mode of life, in the size of their
earnings and in their entire outlook, is the principal prop of the
Second International, and in our days, the principal _social_ (not
military) _prop of the bourgeoisie_. For they are the real _agents of
the bourgeoisie in the working-class_ movement, the labour lieutenants
of the capitalist class, real vehicles of reformism and chauvinism. In
the civil war between the proletariat and the bourgeoisie they
inevitably, and in no small numbers, take the side of the bourgeoisie,
the “Versaillese” against the “Communards”.

 

Unless the economic roots of this phenomenon are understood and its
political and social significance is appreciated, not a step can be
taken toward the solution of the practical problem of the communist
movement and of the impending social revolution.

Imperialism is the eve of the social revolution of the proletariat. This
has been confirmed since 1917 on a world-wide scale.

 

N. Lenin

July 6, 1920

 

------------------------------------------------------------------------

 

During the last fifteen to twenty years, especially since the
Spanish-American War (1898) and the Anglo-Boer War (1899–1902), the
economic and also the political literature of the two hemispheres has
more and more often adopted the term “imperialism” in order to describe
the present era. In 1902, a book by the English economist J. A.
Hobson, _Imperialism, _was published in London and New York. This
author, whose point of view is that of bourgeois social-reformism and
pacifism which, in essence, is identical with the present point of view
of the ex-Marxist, Karl Kautsky, gives a very good and comprehensive
description of the principal specific economic and political features of
imperialism. In 1910, there appeared in Vienna the work of the Austrian
Marxist, Rudolf Hilferding, _Finance Capital _(Russian edition, Moscow,
1912). In spite of the mistake the author makes on the theory of money,
and in spite of a certain inclination on his part to reconcile Marxism
with opportunism, this work gives a very valuable theoretical analysis
of “the latest phase of capitalist development”, as the subtitle runs.
Indeed, what has been said of imperialism during the last few years,
especially in an enormous number of magazine and newspaper articles, and
also in the resolutions, for example, of the Chemnitz and Basle
congresses which took place in the autumn of 1912, has scarcely gone
beyond the ideas expounded, or more exactly, summed up by the two
writers mentioned above...

 

Later on, I shall try to show briefly, and as simply as possible, the
connection and relationships between the _principal _economic features
of imperialism. I shall not be able to deal with the non-economic
aspects of the question, however much they deserve to be dealt with.
References to literature and other notes which, perhaps, would not
interest all readers, are to be found at the end of this pamphlet.

 



I. CONCENTRATION OF PRODUCTION AND MONOPOLIES


 

The enormous growth of industry and the remarkably rapid concentration
of production in ever-larger enterprises are one of the most
characteristic features of capitalism. Modern production censuses give
most complete and most exact data on this process.

 

In Germany, for example, out of every 1,000 industrial enterprises,
large enterprises, i.e., those employing more than 50 workers, numbered
three in 1882, six in 1895 and nine in 1907; and out of every 100
workers employed, this group of enterprises employed. 22, 30 and 37,
respectively. Concentration of production, however, is much more intense
than the concentration of workers, since labour in the large enterprises
is much more productive. This is shown by the figures on steam-engines
and electric motors. If we take what in Germany is called industry in
the broad sense of the term, that is, including commerce, transport,
etc., we get the following picture. Large-scale enterprises, 30,588 out
of a total of 3,265,623, that is to say, 0.9 per cent. These enterprises
employ 5,700,000 workers out of a total of 14,400,000, i.e., 39.4 per
cent; they use 6,600,000 steam horse power out of a total of 8,800,000,
i.e., 75.3 per cent, and 1,200,000 kilowatts of electricity out of a
total of 1,500,000, i.e., 77.2 per cent.

 

Less than one-hundredth of the total number of enterprises utilise _more
than three-fourths _of the total amount of steam and electric power! Two
million nine hundred and seventy thousand small enterprises (employing
up to five workers), constituting 91 per cent of the total, utilise only
7 per cent of the total amount of steam and electric power! Tens of
thousands of huge enterprises are everything; millions of small ones are
nothing.

 

In 1907, there were in Germany 586 establishments employing one thousand
and more workers, nearly _one-tenth_ (1,380,000) of the total number of
workers employed in industry, and they consumed _almost one-third _(32
per cent) of the total amount of steam and electric power.^(¹) As we
shall see, money capital and the banks make this superiority of a
handful of the largest enterprises still more overwhelming, in the most
literal sense of the word, i.e., millions of small, medium and even some
big “proprietors” are in fact in complete subjection to some hundreds of
millionaire financiers.

 

In another advanced country of modern capitalism, the United States of
America, the growth of the concentration of production is still greater.
Here statistics single out industry in the narrow sense of the word and
classify enterprises according to the value of their annual output. In
1904 large-scale enterprises with an output valued at one million
dollars and over, numbered 1,900 (out of 216,180, i.e., 0.9 per cent).
These employed 1,400,000 workers (out of 5,500,000, i.e., 25.6 per cent)
and the value of their output amounted to $5,600,000,000 (out of
$14,800,000,000, i.e., 38 per cent). Five years later, in 1909, the
corresponding figures were: 3,060 enterprises (out of 268,491, i.e., 1.1
per cent) employing 2,000,000 workers (out of 6,600,000, i.e., 30.5 per
cent) with an output valued at $9,000,000,000 (out of $20,700,000,000,
i.e., 43.8 per cent).^(²)

Almost half the total production of all the enterprises of the country
was carried on by _one-hundredth part _of these enterprises! These 3,000
giant enterprises embrace 258 branches of industry. From this it can be
seen that at a certain stage of its development concentration itself, as
it were, leads straight to monopoly, for a score or so of giant
enterprises can easily arrive at an agreement, and on the other hand,
the hindrance to competition, the tendency towards monopoly, arises from
the huge size of the enterprises. This transformation of competition
into monopoly is one of the most important—if not the most
important—phenomena of modern capitalist economy, and we must deal with
it in greater detail. But first we must clear up one possible
misunderstanding.

 

American statistics speak of 3,000 giant enterprises in 250 branches of
industry, as if there were only a dozen enterprises of the largest scale
for each branch of industry.

 

But this is not the case. Not in every branch of industry are there
large-scale enterprises; and moreover, a very important feature of
capitalism in its highest stage of development is so-called
_combination _of production, that is to say, the grouping in a single
enterprise of different branches of industry, which either represent the
consecutive stages in the processing of raw materials (for example, the
smelting of iron ore into pig-iron, the conversion of pig-iron into
steel, and then, perhaps, the manufacture of steel goods)—or are
auxiliary to one another (for example, the utilisation of scrap, or of
by-products, the manufacture of packing materials, etc.).

 

“Combination,” writes Hilferding, “levels out the fluctuations of trade
and therefore assures to the combined enterprises a more stable rate of
profit. Secondly, combination has the effect of eliminating trade.
Thirdly, it has the effect of rendering possible technical improvements,
and, consequently, the acquisition of superprofits over and above those
obtained by the ‘pure’ (i.e. non-combined) enterprises. Fourthly, it
strengthens the position of the combined enterprises relative to the
‘pure’ enterprises, strengthens them in the competitive struggle in
periods of serious depression, when the fall in prices of raw materials
does not keep pace with the fall in prices of manufactured goods.”^(³)

 

The German bourgeois economist, Heymann, who has written a book
especially on “mixed”, that is, combined, enterprises in the German iron
industry, says: “Pure enterprises perish, they are crushed between the
high price of raw material and the low price of the finished product.”
Thus we get the following picture: “There remain, on the one hand, the
big coal companies, producing millions of tons yearly, strongly
organised in their coal syndicate, and on the other, the big steel
plants, closely allied to the coal mines, having their own steel
syndicate. These giant enterprises, producing 400,000 tons of steel per
annum, with a tremendous output of ore and coal and producing finished
steel goods, employing 10,000 workers quartered in company houses, and
sometimes owning their own railways and ports, are the typical
representatives of the German iron and steel industry. And concentration
goes on further and further. Individual enterprises are becoming larger
and larger. An ever-increasing number of enterprises in one, or in
several different industries, join together in giant enterprises, backed
up and directed by half a dozen big Berlin banks. In relation to the
German mining industry, the truth of the teachings of Karl Marx on
concentration is definitely proved; true, this applies to a country
where industry is protected by tariffs and freight rates. The German
mining industry is ripe for expropriation.”^(⁴)

 

Such is the conclusion which a bourgeois economist who, by way of
exception, is conscientious, had to arrive at. It must be noted that he
seems to place Germany in a special category because her industries are
protected by higher tariffs. But this is a circumstance which only
accelerates concentration and the formation of monopolist manufacturers’
associations, cartels, syndicates, etc. It is extremely important to
note that in free-trade Britain, concentration also leads to monopoly,
although somewhat later and perhaps in another form. Professor Hermann
Levy, in his special work of research entitled _Monopolies, Cartels and
Trusts,_ based on data on British economic development, writes as
follows:

 

“In Great Britain it is the size of the enterprise and its high
technical level which harbour a monopolist tendency. This, for one
thing, is due to the great investment of capital per enterprise, which
gives rise to increasing demands for new capital for the new enterprises
and thereby renders their launching more difficult. Moreover (and this
seems to us to be the more important point), every new enterprise that
wants to keep pace with the gigantic enterprises that have been formed
by concentration would here produce such an enormous quantity of surplus
goods that it could dispose of them only by being able to sell them
profitably as a result of an enormous increase in demand; otherwise,
this surplus would force prices down to a level that would be
unprofitable both for the new enterprise and for the monopoly combines.”
Britain differs from other countries where protective tariffs facilitate
the formation of cartels in that monopolist manufacturers’ associations,
cartels and trusts arise in the majority of cases only when the number
of the chief competing enterprises has been reduced to “a couple of
dozen or so”. “Here the influence of concentration on the formation of
large industrial monopolies in a whole sphere of industry stands out
with crystal clarity.”^(⁵)

 

Half a century ago, when Marx was writing _Capital, _free competition
appeared to the overwhelming majority of economists to be a “natural
law”. Official science tried, by a conspiracy of silence, to kill the
works of Marx, who by a theoretical and historical analysis of
capitalism had proved that free competition gives rise to the
concentration of production, which, in turn, at a certain stage of
development, leads to monopoly. Today, monopoly has become a fact.
Economists are writing mountains of books in which they describe the
diverse manifestations of monopoly, and continue to declare in chorus
that “Marxism is refuted”. But facts are stubborn things, as the English
proverb says, and they have to be reckoned with, whether we like it or
not. The facts show that differences between capitalist countries, e.g.,
in the matter of protection or free trade, only give rise to
insignificant variations in the form of monopolies or in the moment of
their appearance; and that the rise of monopolies, as the result of the
concentration of production, is a general and fundamental law of the
present stage of development of capitalism.

 

For Europe, the time when the new capitalism _definitely _superseded the
old can be established with fair precision; it was the beginning of the
twentieth century. In one of the latest compilations on the history of
the “formation of monopolies”, we read:

 

“Isolated examples of capitalist monopoly could be cited from the period
preceding 1860; in these could be discerned the embryo of the forms that
are so common today; but all this undoubtedly represents the prehistory
of the cartels. The real beginning of modern monopoly goes back, at the
earliest, to the sixties. The first important period of development of
monopoly commenced with the international industrial depression of the
seventies and lasted until the beginning of the nineties.” “If we
examine the question on a European scale, we will find that the
development of free competition reached its apex in the sixties and
seventies. It was then that Britain completed the construction of her
old-style capitalist organisation. In Germany, this organisation had
entered into a fierce struggle with handicraft and domestic industry,
and had begun to create for itself its own forms of existence.”

 

“The great revolution commenced with the crash of 1873, or rather, the
depression which followed it and which, with hardly discernible
interruptions in the early eighties, and the unusually violent, but
short-lived boom round about 1889, marks twenty-two years of European
economic history ... .. During the short boom of 1889-90, the system of
cartels was widely resorted to in order to take advantage of favourable
business conditions. An ill-considered policy drove prices up still more
rapidly and still higher than would have been the case if there had been
no cartels, and nearly all these cartels perished ingloriously in the
smash. Another five-year period of bad trade and low prices followed,
but a new spirit reigned in industry; the depression was no longer
regarded as something to be taken for granted: it was regarded as
nothing more than a pause before another boom.

 

“The cartel movement entered its second epoch: instead of being a
transitory phenomenon, the cartels have become one of the foundations of
economic life. They are winning one field of industry after another,
primarily, the raw materials industry. At the beginning of the nineties
the cartel system had already acquired-in the organisation of the coke
syndicate on the model of which the coal syndicate was later formed—a
cartel technique which has hardly been improved on. For the first time
the great boom at the close of the nineteenth century and the crisis of
1900-03 occurred entirely—in the mining and iron industries at
least—under the aegis of the cartels. And while at that time it appeared
to be something novel, now the general public takes it for granted that
large spheres of economic life have been, as a general rule, removed
from the realm of free competition.”^(⁶)

 

Thus, the principal stages in the history of monopolies are the
following: (1) 1860-70, the highest stage, the apex of development of
free competition; monopoly is in the barely discernible, embryonic
stage. (2) After the crisis of 1873, a lengthy period of development of
cartels; but they are still the exception. They are not yet durable.
They are still a transitory phenomenon. (3) The boom at the end of the
nineteenth century and the crisis of 1900-03. Cartels become one of the
foundations of the whole of economic life. Capitalism has been
transformed into imperialism.

 

Cartels come to an agreement on the terms of sale, dates of payment,
etc. They divide the markets among themselves. They fix the quantity of
goods to be produced. They fix prices. They divide the profits among the
various enterprises, etc.

 

The number of cartels in Germany was estimated at about 250 in 1896 and
at 385 in 1905, with about 12,000 firms participating.^(⁷) But it is
generally recognised that these figures are underestimations. From the
statistics of German industry for 1907 we quoted above, it is evident
that even these 12,000 very big enterprises probably consume more than
half the steam and electric power used in the country. In the United
States of America, the number of trusts in 1900 was estimated at 185 and
in 1907, 250. American statistics divide all industrial enterprises into
those belonging to individuals, to private firms or to corporations. The
latter in 1904 comprised 23.6 per cent, and in 1909, 25.9 per cent,
i.e., more than one-fourth of the total industrial enterprises in the
country. These employed in 1904, 70.6 per cent, and in 1909, 75.6 per
cent, i.e., more than three-fourths of the total wage-earners. Their
output at these two dates was valued at $10,900,000,000 and
$16,300,000,000, i.e., 73.7 per cent and 79.0 per cent of the total,
respectively.

 

At times cartels and trusts concentrate in their hands seven- or
eight-tenths of the total output of a given branch of industry. The
Rhine-Westphalian Coal Syndicate, at its foundation in 1893,
concentrated 86.7 per cent of the total coal output of the area, and in
1910 it already concentrated 95.4 per cent.^(⁸) The monopoly so created
assures enormous profits, and leads to the formation of technical
production units of formidable magnitude. The famous Standard Oil
Company in the United States was founded in 1900: “It has an authorised
capital of $150,000,000. It issued $100,000,000 common and $106,000,000
preferred stock. From 1900 to 1907 the following dividends were paid on
the latter: 48, 48, 45, 44, 36, 40, 40, 40 per cent in the respective
years, i.e., in all, $367,000,000. From 1882 to 1907, out of total net
profits amounting to $889,000,000, $606,000,000 were distributed in
dividends, and the rest went to reserve capital.^(⁹) “In 1907 the
various works of the United States Steel Corporation employed no less
than 210,180 people. The largest enterprise in the German mining
industry, Gelsenkirchener Bergwerksgesellschaft, in 1908 had a staff of
46,048 workers and office employees.”^(¹⁰) In 1902, the United States
Steel Corporation already produced 9,000,000 tons of steel.^(¹¹) Its
output constituted in 1901, 66.3 per cent, and in 1908, 56.1 per cent of
the total output of steel in the United States.^(¹²) The output of ore
was 43.9 per cent and 46.3 per cent, respectively.

 

The report of the American Government Commission on Trusts states:
“Their superiority over competitors is due to the magnitude of their
enterprises and their excellent technical equipment. Since its
inception, the Tobacco Trust has devoted all its efforts to the
universal substitution of mechanical for manual labour. With this end in
view it has bought up all patents that have anything to do with the
manufacture of tobacco and has spent enormous sums for this purpose.
Many of these patents at first proved to be of no use, and had to be
modified by the engineers employed by the trust. At the end of 1906, two
subsidiary companies were formed solely to acquire patents. With the
same object in view, the trust has built its own foundries, machine
shops and repair shops. One of these establishments, that in Brooklyn,
employs on the average 300 workers; here experiments are carried out on
inventions concerning the manufacture of cigarettes, cheroots, snuff,
tinfoil for packing, boxes, etc. Here, also, inventions are
perfected.”^(¹³) “Other trusts also employ what are called development
engineers whose business it is to devise new methods of production and
to test technical improvements. The United States Steel Corporation
grants big bonuses to its workers and engineers for all inventions that
raise technical efficiency, or reduce cost of production.”^(¹⁴)

 

In German large-scale industry, e.g., in the chemical industry, which
has developed so enormously during these last few decades, the promotion
of technical improvement is organised in the same way. By 1908 the
process of concentration of production had already given rise to two
main “groups” which, in their way, were also in the nature of
monopolies. At first these groups constituted “dual alliances” of two
pairs of big factories, each having a capital of from twenty to
twenty-one million marks-on the one hand, the former Meister Factory in
Hochst and the Casella Factory in Frankfurt am Main; and on the other
hand, the aniline and soda factory at Ludwigshafen and the former Bayer
Factory at Elberfeld. Then, in 1905, one of these groups, and in 1908
the other group, each concluded an agreement with yet another big
factory. The result was the formation of two “triple alliances”, each
with a capital of from forty to fifty million marks. And these
“alliances” have already begun to “approach” each other, to reach “an
understanding” about prices, etc.^(¹⁵)

 

Competition becomes transformed into monopoly. The result is immense
progress in the socialisation of production. In particular, the process
of technical invention and improvement becomes socialised.

 

This is something quite different from the old free competition between
manufacturers, scattered and out of touch with one another, and
producing for an unknown market. Concentration has reached the point at
which it is possible to make an approximate estimate of all sources of
raw materials (for example, the iron ore deposits) of a country and
even, as we shall see, of several countries, or of the whole world. Not
only are such estimates made, but these sources are captured by gigantic
monopolist associations. An approximate estimate of the capacity of
markets is also made, and the associations “divide” them up amongst
themselves by agreement. Skilled labour is monopolised, the best
engineers are engaged; the means of transport are captured—railways in
America, shipping companies in Europe and America. Capitalism in its
imperialist stage leads directly to the most comprehensive socialisation
of production; it, so to speak, drags the capitalists, against their
will and consciousness, into some sort of a new social order, a
transitional one from complete free competition to complete
socialisation.

 

Production becomes social, but appropriation remains private. The social
means of production remain the private property of a few. The general
framework of formally recognised free competition remains, and the yoke
of a few monopolists on the rest of the population becomes a hundred
times heavier, more burdensome and intolerable.

 

The German economist, Kestner, has written a book especially devoted to
“the struggle between the cartels and outsiders”, i.e., the capitalists
outside the cartels. He entitled his work _Compulsory Organisation_,
although, in order to present capitalism in its true light, he should,
of course, have written about compulsory submission to monopolist
associations. It is instructive to glance at least at the list of the
methods the monopolist associations resort to in the present-day, the
latest, the civilised struggle for “organisation”: (1) stopping supplies
of raw materials ... “one of the most important methods of compelling
adherence to the cartel”); (2) stopping the supply of labour by means of
“alliances” (i.e., of agreements between the capitalists and the trade
unions by which the latter permit their members to work only in
cartelised enterprises); (3) stopping deliveries; (4) closing trade
outlets; (5) agreements with the buyers, by which the latter undertake
to trade only with the cartels; (6) systematic price cutting (to ruin
“outside” firms, i.e., those which refuse to submit to the monopolists.
Millions are spent in order to sell goods for a certain time below their
cost price; there were instances when the price of petrol was thus
reduced from 40 to 22 marks, i.e., almost by half!); (7) stopping
credits; (8) boycott.

 

Here we no longer have competition between small and large, between
technically developed and backward enterprises. We see here the
monopolists throttling those who do not submit to them, to their yoke,
to their dictation. This is how this process is reflected in the mind of
a bourgeois economist:

 

“Even in the purely economic sphere,” writes Kestner, “a certain change
is taking place from commercial activity in the old sense of the word
towards organisational-speculative activity. The greatest success no
longer goes to the merchant whose technical and commercial experience
enables him best of all to estimate the needs of the buyer, and who is
able to discover and, so to speak, ‘awaken’ a latent demand; it goes to
the speculative genius [?!] who knows how to estimate, or even only to
sense in advance, the organisational development and the possibilities
of certain connections between individual enterprises and the banks. . .
.”

 

Translated into ordinary human language this means that the development
of capitalism has arrived at a stage when, although commodity production
still “reigns” and continues to be regarded as the basis of economic
life, it has in reality been undermined and the bulk of the profits go
to the “geniuses” of financial manipulation. At the basis of these
manipulations and swindles lies socialised production; but the immense
progress of mankind, which achieved this socialisation, goes to benefit
. . . the speculators. We shall see later how “on these grounds”
reactionary, petty-bourgeois critics of capitalist imperialism dream of
going _back _to “free”, “peaceful”, and “honest” competition.

 

“The prolonged raising of prices which results from the formation of
cartels,” says Kestner, “has hitherto been observed only in respect of
the most important means of production, particularly coal, iron and
potassium, but never in respect of manufactured goods. Similarly, the
increase in profits resulting from this raising of prices has been
limited only to the industries which produce means of production. To
this observation we must add that the industries which process raw
materials (and not semi-manufactures) not only secure advantages from
the cartel formation in the shape of high profits, to the detriment of
the finished goods industry, but have also secured a _dominating
position _over the latter, which did not exist under free
competition.”^(¹⁶)

 

The words which I have italicised reveal the essence of the case which
the bourgeois economists admit so reluctantly and so rarely, and which
the present-day defenders of opportunism, led by Kautsky, so zealously
try to evade and brush aside. Domination, and the violence that is
associated with it, such are the relationships that are typical of the
“latest phase of capitalist development”; this is what inevitably had to
result, and has resulted, from the formation of all-powerful economic
monopolies.

 

I shall give one more example of the methods employed by the cartels.
Where it is possible to capture all or the chief sources of raw
materials, the rise of cartels and formation of monopolies is
particularly easy. It would be wrong, however, to assume that monopolies
do not arise in other industries in which it is impossible to corner the
sources of raw materials. The cement industry, for instance, can find
its raw materials everywhere. Yet in Germany this industry too is
strongly cartelised. The cement manufacturers have formed regional
syndicates: South German, Rhine-Westplialian, etc. The prices fixed are
monopoly prices: 230 to 280 marks a car-load, when the cost price is
180 marks! The enterprises pay a dividend of from 12 to 16 per cent—and
it must not be forgotten that the “geniuses” of modern speculation know
how to pocket big profits besides what they draw in dividends. In order
to prevent competition in such a profitable industry, the monopolists
even resort to various stratagems: they spread false rumours about the
bad situation in their industry; anonymous warnings are published in the
newspapers, like the following: “Capitalists, don’t invest your capital
in the cement industry!”; lastly, they buy up “outsiders” (those outside
the syndicates) and pay them compensation of 60,000, 80,000 and even
150,000 marks.^(¹⁷) Monopoly hews a path for itself everywhere without
scruple as to the means, from paying a “modest” sum to buy off
competitors, to the American device of employing dynamite against them.

 

The statement that cartels can abolish crises is a fable spread by
bourgeois economists who at all costs desire to place capitalism in a
favourable light. On the contrary, the monopoly created
in _certain _branches of industry increases and intensifies the anarchy
inherent in capitalist production _as a whole. _The disparity between
the development of agriculture and that of industry, which is
characteristic of capitalism in general, is increased. The privileged
position of the most highly cartelised, so-called _heavy _industry,
especially coal and iron, causes “a still greater lack of co-ordination”
in other branches of industry—as Jeidels, the author of one of the best
works on “the relationship of the German big banks to industry”,
admits.^(¹⁸)

 

“The more developed an economic system is,” writes Liefmann, an
unblushing apologist of capitalism, “the more it resorts to risky
enterprises, or enterprises in other countries, to those which need a
great deal of time to develop, or finally, to those which are only of
local importance.”^(¹⁹) The increased risk is connected in the long run
with a prodigious increase of capital, which, as it were, overflows the
brim, flows abroad, etc. At the same time the extremely rapid rate of
technical progress gives rise to increasing elements of disparity
between the various spheres of national economy, to anarchy and crises.
Liefmann is obliged to admit that: “In all probability mankind will see
further important technical revolutions in the near future which will
also affect the organisation of the economic system”... electricity and
aviation.... “As a general rule, in such periods of radical economic
change, speculation develops on a large scale.”...^(²⁰)

 

Crises of every kind—economic crises most frequently, but not only
these—in their turn increase very considerably the tendency towards
concentration and towards monopoly. In this connection, the following
reflections of Jeidels on the significance of the crisis of 1900, which,
as we have already seen, marked the turning-point in the history of
modern monopoly, are exceedingly instructive:

 

“Side by side with the gigantic plants in the basic industries, the
crisis of 1900 still found many plants organised on lines that today
would be considered obsolete, the ‘pure’ (non-combined) plants, which
were brought into being at the height of the industrial boom. The fall
in prices and the falling off in demand put these ‘pure’ enterprises in
a precarious position, which did not affect the gigantic combined
enterprises at all or only affected them for a very short time. As a
consequence of this the crisis of 1900 resulted in a far greater
concentration of industry than the crisis of 1873: the latter crisis
also produced a sort of selection of the best-equipped enterprises, but
owing to the level of technical development at that time, this selection
could not place the firms which successfully emerged from the crisis in
a position of monopoly. Such a durable monopoly exists to a high degree
in the gigantic enterprises in the modern iron and steel and electrical
industries owing to their very complicated technique, far-reaching
organisation and magnitude of capital, and, to a lesser degree, in the
engineering industry, certain branches of the metallurgical industry,
transport, etc.”^(²¹)

 

Monopoly! This is the last word in the “latest phase of capitalist
development”. But we shall only have a very insufficient, incomplete,
and poor notion of the real power and the significance of modern
monopolies if we do not take into consideration the part played by the
banks.

 



II. BANKS AND THEIR NEW ROLE


 

The principal and primary function of banks is to serve as middlemen in
the making of payments. In so doing they transform inactive money
capital into active, that is, into capital yielding a profit; they
collect all kinds of money revenues and place them at the disposal of
the capitalist class.

 

As banking develops and becomes concentrated in a small number of
establishments, the banks grow from modest middlemen into powerful
monopolies having at their command almost the whole of the money capital
of all the capitalists and small businessmen and also the larger part of
the means of production and sources of raw materials in any one country
and in a number of countries. This transformation of numerous modest
middlemen into a handful of monopolists is one of the fundamental
processes in the growth of capitalism into capitalist imperialism; for
this reason we must first of all examine the concentration of banking.

 

In 1907-08, the combined deposits of the German joint-stock banks, each
having a capital of more than a million marks, amounted to 7,000 million
marks; in 1912-13, these deposits already amounted to 9,800 million
marks, an increase of 40 per cent in five years; and of the 2,800
million increase, 2,750 million was divided among 57 banks, each having
a capital of more than 10 million marks. The distribution of the
deposits between big and small banks was as follows:^(²²)

 

PERCENTAGE OF TOTAL DEPOSITS

 

+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
|             | In 9 Big    | In the      | In 115      | In small    |
|             | Berlin      | other 48    | banks       | banks       |
|             | Banks       | banks with  | with a      | (with a     |
|             |             | a capital   | capital     | capital     |
|             |             | of more     | of 1-10     | of less     |
|             |             | than 10     | million     | than a      |
|             |             | million     | marks       | million     |
|             |             | marks       |             | marks)      |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| 1907-08.... | 47          | 32.5        | 16.5        | 4           |
| .           |             |             |             |             |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| 1912-13.... | 49          | 36          | 12          | 3           |
| ..          |             |             |             |             |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+

 

 

The small banks are being squeezed out by the big banks, of which only
nine concentrate in their hands almost half the total deposits. But we
have left out of account many important details, for instance, the
transformation of numerous small banks into actual branches of the big
banks, etc. Of this I shall speak later on.

 

At the end of 1913, Schulze-Gaevernitz estimated the deposits in the
nine big Berlin banks at 5,100 million marks, out of a total of about
10,000 million marks. Taking into account not only the deposits, but the
total bank capital, this author wrote: “At the end of 1909, the nine big
Berlin banks, _together with their affiliated banks_, controlled 11,300
million marks, that is, about 83 per cent of the total German bank
capital. The Deutsche Bank, which _together with its affiliated
banks_ controls nearly 3,000 million marks, represents, parallel to the
Prussian State Railway Administration, the biggest and also the most
decentralised accumulation of capital in the Old World.”^(²³)

 

I have emphasised the reference to the “affiliated” banks because it is
one of the most important distinguishing features of modern capitalist
concentration. The big enterprises, and the banks in particular, not
only completely absorb the small ones, but also “annex” them,
subordinate them, bring them into their “own” group or “concern” (to use
the technical term) by acquiring “holdings” in their capital, by
purchasing or exchanging shares, by a system of credits, etc., etc.
Professor Liefmann has written a voluminous “work” of about 500 pages
describing modern “holding and finance companies”,^(²⁴) unfortunately
adding very dubious “theoretical” reflections to what is frequently
undigested raw material. To what results this “holding” system leads in
respect of concentration is best illustrated in the book written on the
big German banks by Riesser, himself a banker. But before examining his
data, let us quote a concrete example of the “holding” system.

 

The Deutsche Bank “group” is one of the biggest, if not the biggest, of
the big banking groups. In order to trace the main threads which connect
all the banks in this group, a distinction must be made between holdings
of the first and second and third degree, or what amounts to the same
thing, between dependence (of the lesser banks on the Deutsche Bank) in
the first, second and third degree. We then obtain the following
picture:^(²⁵)

 

+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| The Deutsche    | DIRECT OR       | 2^(nd) DEGREE   | 3^(rd) DEGREE   |
| Bank has        | 1^(st)          | DEPENDENCE      |                 |
| holdings:       | DEGREE          |                 | dependence      |
|                 | DEPENDENCE      |                 |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| Permanently     | in 17 other     | 9 of the 17     | 4 of the 9 have |
|                 |                 |                 | holdings in 7   |
|                 | banks           | have holdings   | other banks     |
|                 |                 | in              |                 |
|                 |                 |                 |                 |
|                 |                 | 34 other banks  |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| For an          | in 5 other      | ---             | ---             |
| indefinite      | banks           |                 |                 |
| period …        |                 |                 |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| Occasionally…   | in 8 other      | 5 of the 8 have | 2 of the 5 have |
|                 | banks           | holdings in 14  | holdings in 2   |
|                 |                 | other banks     | other banks     |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| Totals …        | in 30 other     | 14 of the 30    | 6 of the 14     |
|                 | banks           | have            | have holdings   |
|                 |                 | holdings in 48  | in 9 other      |
|                 |                 | other banks     | banks           |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+

 

Included in the eight banks “occasionally” dependent on the Deutsche
Bank in the “first degree”, are three foreign banks: one Austrian (the
Wiener Bankverein) and two Russian (the Siberian Commercial Bank and the
Russian Bank for Foreign Trade). Altogether, the Deutsche Bank
group comprises, directly and indirectly, partially and totally, 87
banks; and the total capital—its own and that of others which it
controls—is estimated at between two and three thousand million marks.

 

It is obvious that a bank which stands at the head of such. A group, and
which enters into agreement with half a dozen other banks only slightly
smaller than itself for the purpose of conducting exceptionally big and
profitable financial operations like floating state loans, has already
outgrown the part of “middleman” and has become an association of a
handful of monopolists.

 

The rapidity with which the concentration of banking proceeded in
Germany at the turn of the twentieth century is shown by the following
data which we quote in an abbreviated form from Riesser:

 

SIX BERLIN BANKS

 

+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| Year        | Branches in | Deposit     | Constant    | Total       |
|             | Germany     | banks and   | holdings in | Establishme |
|             |             | exchange    | German      | nts         |
|             |             | offices     | joint-stock |             |
|             |             |             | banks       |             |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| 1895 …      | 16          | 14          | 1           | 42          |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| 1900 …      | 21          | 40          | 8           | 80          |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+
| 1911 …      | 104         | 276         | 63          | 450         |
+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+-------------+

 

We see the rapid expansion of a close network of channels which cover
the whole country, centralising all capital and all revenues,
transforming thousands and thousands of scattered economic enterprises
into a single national capitalist, and then into a world capitalist
economy. The “decentralisation” that SchuIze-Gaevernitz, as an exponent
of present-day bourgeois political economy, speaks of in the passage
previously quoted, really means the subordination to a single centre of
an increasing number of formerly relatively “independent”, or rather,
strictly local economic units. In reality it is centralisation, the
enhancement of the role, importance and power of monopolist giants.

 

In the older capitalist countries this “banking network” is still
closer. In Great Britain and Ireland, in 1910, there were in all 7,151
branches of banks. Four big banks had more than 400 branches each (from
447 to 689); four had more than 200 branches each, and eleven more than
100 each.

 

In France, three very big banks, Crédit Lyonnais, the Comptoir National
and the Société Générale extended their operations and their network of
branches in the following manner.^(²⁶)

 

Number of branches and offices

Capital (000,000 francs)

Year

In the provinces

In Paris

Total

Own Capital

Deposits used as capital

1870

47

17

64

200

427

1890

192

66

258

265

1,245

1909

1,033

196

1,299

887

4,363

In order to show the “connections” of a big modern bank, Riesser gives
the following figures of the number of letters dispatched and received
by the Disconto-Gesellschaft, one of the biggest banks in Germany and in
the world (its capital in 1914 amounted to 300 million marks):

 

+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| Year                  | Letters               | Letters               |
|                       | received              | dispatched            |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| 1852...               | 6,135                 | 6,292                 |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| 1870...               | 85,800                | 87,513                |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+
| 1900...               | 533,102               | 626,043               |
+-----------------------+-----------------------+-----------------------+

 

The number of accounts of the big Paris bank, the Crédit Lyonnais,
increased from 28,535 in 1875 to 633,539 in 1912.^(²⁷)

 

These simple figures show perhaps better than lengthy disquisitions how
the concentration of capital and the growth of bank turnover are
radically changing the significance of the banks. Scattered capitalists
are transformed into a single collective capitalist. When carrying the
current accounts of a few capitalists, a bank, as it were, transacts a
purely technical and exclusively auxiliary operation. When, however,
this operation grows to enormous dimensions we find that a handful of
monopolists subordinate to their will all the operations, both
commercial and industrial, of the whole of capitalist society; for they
are enabled-by means of their banking connections, their current
accounts and other financial operations—first, to ascertain exactly the
financial position of the various capitalists, then to control them, to
influence them by restricting or enlarging, facilitating or hindering
credits, and finally to entirely determine their fate, determine their
income, deprive them of capital, or permit them to increase their
capital rapidly and to enormous dimensions, etc.

 

We have just mentioned the 300 million marks capital of the
Disconto-Gesellschaft of Berlin. This increase of the capital of the
bank was one of the incidents in the struggle for hegemony between two
of the biggest Berlin banks-the Deutsche Bank and the Disconto. In 1870,
the first was still a novice and had a capital of only 15 million marks,
while the second had a capital of 30 million marks. In 1908, the first
had a capital of 200 million, while the second had 170 million. In 1914,
the first increased its capital to 250 million and the second, by
merging with another first-class big bank, the Schaaffhausenscher
Bankverein, increased its capital to 300 million. And, of course, this
struggle for hegemony went hand in hand with the more and more frequent
conclusion of “agreements” of an increasingly durable character between
the two banks. The following are the conclusions that this development
forces upon banking specialists who regard economic questions from a
standpoint which does not in the least exceed the bounds of the most
moderate and cautious bourgeois reformism.

 

Commenting on the increase of the capital of the Disconto Gesellschaft
to 300 million marks, the German review, Die Bank, wrote: “Other banks
will follow this same path and in time the three hundred men, who today
govern Germany economically, will gradually be reduced to fifty,
twenty-five or still fewer. It cannot be expected that this latest move
towards concentration will be confined to banking. The close relations
that exist between individual banks naturally lead to the bringing
together of the industrial syndicates which these banks favour.... One
fine morning we shall wake up in surprise to see nothing but trusts
before our eyes, and to find ourselves faced with the necessity of
substituting state monopolies for private monopolies. However, we have
nothing to reproach ourselves with, except that we have allowed things
to follow their own course, slightly accelerated by the manipulation of
stocks.”^(²⁸)

 

This is an example of the impotence of bourgeois journalism which
differs from bourgeois science only in that the latter is less sincere
and strives to obscure the essence of the matter, to hide the forest
behind the trees. To be “surprised” at the results of concentration, to
“reproach” the government of capitalist Germany, or capitalist “society”
(“ourselves”), to fear that the introduction of stocks and shares might
“accelerate” concentration in the same way as the German “cartel”
specialist Tschierschky fears the American trusts and “prefers” the
German cartels on the grounds that they “may not, like the trusts,
excessively accelerate technical and economic progress”^(²⁹)—is not all
this a sign of impotence?

 

But facts remain facts. There are no trusts in Germany; there are “only”
cartels—but Germany is governed by not more than three hundred magnates
of capital, and the number of these is constantly diminishing. At all
events, banks greatly intensify and accelerate the process of
concentration of capital and the formation of monopolies in all
capitalist countries, notwithstanding all the differences in their
banking laws.

 

The banking system “possesses, indeed, the form of universal
book-keeping and distribution of means of production on a social scale,
but solely the form”, wrote Marx in Capital half a century ago (Russ.
trans., Vol. III, part II, p. 144). The figures we have quoted on the
growth of bank capital, on the increase in the number of the branches
and offices of the biggest banks, the increase in the number of their
accounts, etc., present a concrete picture of this “universal
book-keeping” of the whole capitalist class; and not only of the
capitalists, for the banks collect, even though temporarily, all kinds
of money revenues—of small businessmen, office clerks, and of a tiny
upper stratum of the working class. “Universal distribution of means of
production”—that, from the formal aspect, is what grows out of the
modern banks, which, numbering some three to six of the biggest in
France, and six to eight in Germany, control millions and millions.
In substance, however, the distribution of means of production is not at
all “universal”, but private, i.e., it conforms to the interests of big
capital, and primarily, of huge, monopoly capital, which operates under
conditions in which the masses live in want, in which the whole
development of agriculture hopelessly lags behind the development of
industry, while within industry itself the “heavy industries” exact
tribute from all other branches of industry.

 

In the matter of socialising capitalist economy the savings-banks and
post-offices are beginning to compete with the banks; they are more
“decentralised”, i.e., their influence extends to a greater number of
localities, to more remote places, to wider sections of the population.
Here is the data collected by an American commission on the comparative
growth of deposits in banks and savings-banks:^(³⁰)

 

DEPOSITS (000,000,000 marks)

Year

Britain

France

Germany

 

Banks

Savings-
banks

Banks

Savings-
banks

Banks

Credit
Societies

Savings-
banks

1880...

8.4

1.6

?

0.9

0.5

0.4

2.6

1888...

12.4

2.0

1.5

2.1

1.1

0.4

4.5

1908...

23.2

4.2

3.7

4.2

7.1

2.2

13.9

 

As they pay interest at the rate of 4 per cent and 4 1/4 per cent on
deposits, the savings-banks must seek “profitable” investments for their
capital, they must deal in bills, mortgages, etc. The boundaries between
the banks and the savings-banks “become more and more obliterated”. The
Chambers of Commerce of Bochum and Erfurt, for example, demand that
savings-banks be “prohibited” from engaging in “purely” banking
business, such as discounting bills; they demand the limitation of the
“banking” operations of the post-office.^(³¹) The banking magnates seem
to be afraid that state monopoly will steal upon them from an unexpected
quarter. It goes without saying, however, that this fear is no more than
an expression of the rivalry, so to speak, between two department
managers in the same office; for, on the one hand, the millions
entrusted to the savings-banks are in the final analysis actually
controlled by these very same bank capital magnates, while, on the other
hand, state monopoly in capitalist society is merely a means of
increasing and guaranteeing the income of millionaires in some branch of
industry who are on the verge of bankruptcy.

 

The change from the old type of capitalism, in which free competition
predominated, to the new capitalism, in which monopoly reigns, is
expressed, among other things, by a decline in the importance of the
Stock Exchange. The review, Die Bank, writes: “The Stock Exchange has
long ceased to be the indispensable medium of circulation that it
formerly was when the banks were not yet able to place the bulk of new
issues with their clients.”^(³²)

 

“’Every bank is a Stock Exchange’, and the bigger the bank, and the more
successful the concentration of banking, the truer does this modern
aphorism ring.”^(³³) “While formerly, in the seventies, the Stock
Exchange, flushed with the exuberance of youth” (a “subtle” allusion to
the Stock Exchange crash of 1873, the company promotion scandals, etc.),
“opened the era of the industrialisation of Germany, nowadays the banks
and industry are able to ‘manage it alone’. The domination of our big
banks over the Stock Exchange ... is nothing else than the expression of
the completely organised German industrial state. If the domain of the
automatically functioning economic laws is thus restricted, and if the
domain of conscious regulation by the banks is considerably enlarged,
the national economic responsibility of a few guiding heads is immensely
increased,” so writes the German Professor Schulze-Gaevernitz,^(³⁴) an
apologist of German imperialism, who is regarded as an authority by the
imperialists of all countries, and who tries to gloss over the “mere
detail” that the “conscious regulation” of economic life by the banks
consists in the fleecing of the public by a handful of “completely
organised” monopolists. The task of a bourgeois professor is not to lay
bare the entire mechanism, or to expose all the machinations of the bank
monopolists, but rather to present them in a favourable light.

 

In the same way, Riesser, a still more authoritative economist and
himself a banker, makes shift with meaningless phrases in order to
explain away undeniable facts: “... the Stock Exchange is steadily
losing the feature which is absolutely essential for national economy as
a whole and for the circulation of securities in particular—that of
being not only a most exact measuring-rod, but also an almost automatic
regulator of the economic movements which converge on it.”^(³⁵)

 

In other words, the old capitalism, the capitalism of free competition
with its indispensable regulator, the Stock Exchange, is passing away. A
new capitalism has come to take its place, bearing obvious features of
something transient, a mixture of free competition and monopoly. The
question naturally arises: into what is this new capitalism
“developing”? But the bourgeois scholars are afraid to raise this
question.

 

“Thirty years ago, businessmen, freely competing against one another,
performed nine-tenths of the work connected with their business other
than manual labour. At the present time, nine tenths of this ‘brain
work’ is performed by employees. Banking is in the forefront of this
evolution.”^(³⁶) This admission by Schulze-Gaevernitz brings us once
again to the question: into what is this new capitalism, capitalism in
its imperialist stage, developing?

 

Among the few banks which remain at the head of all capitalist economy
as a result of the process of concentration, there is naturally to be
observed an increasingly marked tendency towards monopolist agreements,
towards a bank trust. In America, not nine, but two very big banks,
those of the multimillionaires Rockefeller and Morgan, control a capital
of eleven thousand million marks.^(³⁷) In Germany the absorption of the
Schaaffhausenscher Bankverein by the Disconto-Gesellschaft to which I
referred above, was commented on in the following terms by the
Frankfurter Zeitung, an organ of Stock Exchange interests:

 

“The concentration movement of the banks is narrowing the circle of
establishments from which it is possible to obtain credits, and is
consequently increasing the dependence of big industry upon a small
number of banking groups. In view of the close connection between
industry and the financial world, the freedom of movement of industrial
companies which need banking capital is restricted. For this reason, big
industry is watching the growing trustification of the banks with mixed
feelings. Indeed, we have repeatedly seen the beginnings of certain
agreements between the individual big banking concerns, which aim at
restricting competition.”^(³⁸)

 

Again and again, the final word in the development of banking is
monopoly.

 

As regards the close connection between the banks and industry, it is
precisely in this sphere that the new role of the banks is, perhaps,
most strikingly felt. When a bank discounts a bill for a firm, opens a
current account for it, etc., these operations, taken separately, do not
in the least diminish its independence, and the bank plays no other part
than that of a modest middleman. But when such operations are multiplied
and become an established practice, when the bank “collects” in its own
hands enormous amounts of capital, when the running of a current account
for a given firm enables the bank—and this is what happens—to obtain
fuller and more detailed information about the economic position of its
client, the result is that the industrial capitalist becomes more
completely dependent on the bank.

 

At the same time a personal link-up, so to speak, is established between
the banks and the biggest industrial and commercial enterprises, the
merging of one with another through the acquisition of shares, through
the appointment of bank directors to the Supervisory Boards (or Boards
of Directors) of industrial and commercial enterprises, and vice versa.
The German economist, Jeidels, has compiled most detailed data on this
form of concentration of capital and of enterprises. Six of the biggest
Berlin banks were represented by their directors in 344 industrial
companies; and by their board members in 407 others, making a total of
751 companies. In 289 of these companies they either had two of their
representatives on each of the respective Supervisory Boards, or held
the posts of chairmen. We find these industrial and commercial companies
in the most diverse branches of industry: insurance, transport,
restaurants, theatres, art industry, etc. On the other hand, on the
Supervisory Boards of these six banks (in 1910) were fifty-one of the
biggest industrialists, including the director of Krupp, of the powerful
“Hapag” (Hamburg-Amerika Line), etc., etc. From 1895 to 1910, each of
these six banks participated in the share and bond issues of many
hundreds of industrial companies (the number ranging from 281 to
419).^(³⁹)

 

The “personal link-up” between the banks and industry is supplemented by
the “personal link-up” between both of them and the government. “Seats
on Supervisory Boards,” writes Jeidels, “are freely offered to persons
of title, also to ex-civil servants, who are able to do a great deal to
facilitate (!!) relations with the authorities.” . . . “Usually, on the
Supervisory Board of a big bank, there is a member of parliament or a
Berlin city councillor.”

 

The building and development, so to speak, of the big capitalist
monopolies is therefore going on full steam ahead in all “natural” and
“supernatural” ways. A sort of division of labour is being
systematically developed amongst the several hundred kings of finance
who reign over modern capitalist society:

 

“Simultaneously with this widening of the sphere of activity of certain
big industrialists (joining the boards of banks, etc.) and with the
assignment of provincial bank managers to definite industrial regions,
there is a growth of specialisation among the directors of the big
banks. Generally speaking, this specialisation is only conceivable when
banking is conducted on a large scale, and particularly when it has
widespread connections with industry. This division of labour proceeds
along two lines: on the one hand, relations with industry as a whole are
entrusted to one director, as his special function; on the other, each
director assumes the supervision of several separate enterprises, or of
a group of enterprises in the same branch of industry or having similar
interests.... (Capitalism has already reached the stage of organised
supervision of individual enterprises.) One specialises in German
industry, sometimes even in West German industry alone (the West is the
most industrialised part of Germany), others specialise in relations
with foreign states and foreign industry, in information on the
characters of industrialists and others, in Stock Exchange questions,
etc. Besides, each bank director is often assigned a special locality or
a special branch of industry; one works chiefly on Supervisory Boards of
electric companies, another, on chemical, brewing, or beet sugar plants,
a third, in a few isolated industrial enterprises, but at the same time
works on the Supervisory Boards of insurance companies.... In short,
there can be no doubt that the growth in the dimensions and diversity of
the big banks’ operations is accompanied by an increase in the division
of labour among their directors with the object (and result) of, so to
speak, lifting them somewhat out of pure banking and making them better
experts, better judges of the general problems of industry and the
special problems of each branch of industry, thus making them more
capable of acting within the respective bank’s industrial sphere of
influence. This system is supplemented by the banks’ endeavours to elect
to their Supervisory Boards men who are experts in industrial affairs,
such as industrialists, former officials, especially those formerly in
the railway service or in mining,” etc.^(⁴⁰)

 

We find the same system only in a slightly different form in French
banking. For instance, one of the three biggest French banks, the Crédit
Lyonnais, has organised a financial research service (service des études
financières), which permanently employs over fifty engineers,
statisticians, economists, lawyers, etc. This costs from six to seven
hundred thousand francs annually. The service is in turn divided into
eight departments: one specialises in collecting information on
industrial establishments, another studies general statistics, a third,
railway and steamship companies, a fourth, securities, a fifth,
financial reports, etc.^(⁴¹)

 

The result is, on the one hand, the ever-growing merger, or, as N. I.
Bukharin aptly calls it, coalescence, of bank and industrial capital
and, on the other hand, the growth of the banks into institutions of a
truly “universal character”. On this question I find it necessary to
quote the exact terms used by Jeidels, who has best studied the subject:

 

“An examination of the sum total of industrial relationships reveals the
universal character of the financial establishments working on behalf of
industry. Unlike other kinds of banks, and contrary to the demand
sometimes expressed in the literature that banks should specialise in
one kind of business or in one branch of industry in order to prevent
the ground from slipping from under their feet—the big banks are
striving to make their connections with industrial enterprises as varied
as possible in respect of the locality or branches of industry and are
striving to eliminate the unevenness in the distribution of capital
among localities and branches of industry resulting from the historical
development of individual enterprises.” “One tendency is to make the
connections with industry general; another tendency is to make them
durable and close. In the six big banks both these tendencies are
realised, not in full, but to a considerable extent and to an equal
degree.”

 

Quite often industrial and commercial circles complain of the
“terrorism” of the banks. And it is not surprising that such complaints
are heard, for the big banks “command”, as will be seen from the
following example. On November 19, 1901, one of the big, so-called
Berlin “D” banks (the names of the four biggest banks begin with the
letter D) wrote to the Board of Directors of the German Central
Northwest Cement Syndicate in the following terms: “As we learn from the
notice you published in a certain newspaper of the 18th inst., we must
reckon with the possibility that the next general meeting of your
syndicate, to be held on the 30th of this month, may decide on measures
which are likely to effect changes in your enterprise which are
unacceptable to us. We deeply regret that, for these reasons, we are
obliged henceforth to withdraw the credit which had hitherto been
allowed you.... But if the said next general meeting does not decide
upon measures which are unacceptable to us, and if we receive suitable
guarantees on this matter for the future, we shall be quite willing to
open negotiations with you on the grant of a new credit.”^(⁴²)

 

As a matter of fact, this is small capital’s old complaint about being
oppressed by big capital, but in this case it was a whole syndicate that
fell into the category of “small” capital! The old struggle between
small and big capital is being resumed at a new and immeasurably higher
stage of development. It stands to reason that the big banks’
enterprises, worth many millions, can accelerate technical progress with
means that cannot possibly be compared with those of the past. The
banks, for example, set up special technical research societies, and, of
course, only “friendly” industrial enterprises benefit from their work.
To this category belong the Electric Railway Research Association, the
Central Bureau of Scientific and Technical Research, etc.

 

The directors of the big banks themselves cannot fail to see that new
conditions of national economy are being created; but they are powerless
in the face of these phenomena.

 

“Anyone who has watched, in recent years,” writes Jeidels, “the changes
of incumbents of directorships and seats on the Supervisory Boards of
the big banks, cannot fail to have noticed that power is gradually
passing into the hands of men who consider the active intervention of
the big banks in the general development of industry to be necessary and
of increasing importance. Between these new men and the old bank
directors, disagreements on this subject of a business and often of a
personal nature are growing. The issue is whether or not the banks, as
credit institutions, will suffer from this intervention in industry,
whether they are sacrificing tried principles and an assured profit to
engage in a field of activity which has nothing in common with their
role as middlemen in providing credit, and which is leading the banks
into a field where they are more than ever before exposed to the blind
forces of trade fluctuations. This is the opinion of many of the older
bank directors, while most of the young men consider active intervention
in industry to be a necessity as great as that which gave rise,
simultaneously with big modern industry, to the big banks and modern
industrial banking. The two parties are agreed only on one point: that
there are neither firm principles nor a concrete aim in the new
activities of the big banks.”^(⁴³)

The old capitalism has had its day. The new capitalism represents a
transition towards something. It is hopeless, of course, to seek for
“firm principles and a concrete aim” for the purpose of “reconciling”
monopoly with free competition. The admission of the practical men has
quite a different ring from the official praises of the charms of
“organised” capitalism sung by its apologists, Schulze-Gaevernitz,
Liefmann and similar “theoreticians”.

 

At precisely what period were the “new activities” of the big banks
finally established? Jeidels gives us a fairly exact answer to this
important question:

 

“The connections between the banks and industrial enterprises, with
their new content, their new forms and their new organs, namely, the big
banks which are organised on both a centralised and a decentralised
basis, were scarcely a characteristic economic phenomenon before the
nineties; in one sense, indeed, this initial date may be advanced to the
year 1897, when the important mergers took place and when, for the first
time, the new form of decentralised organisation was introduced to suit
the industrial policy of the banks. This starting-point could perhaps be
placed at an even later date, for it was the crisis of 1900 that
enormously accelerated and intensified the process of concentration of
industry and of banking, consolidated that process, for the first time
transformed the connection with industry into the actual monopoly of the
big banks, and made this connection much closer and more active.”^(⁴⁴)

 

Thus, the twentieth century marks the turning-point from the old
capitalism to the new, from the domination of capital in general to the
domination of finance capital.

 



III. FINANCE CAPITAL AND THE FINANCIAL OLIGARCHY


 

“A steadily increasing proportion of capital in industry,” writes
Hilferding, “ceases to belong to the industrialists who employ it. They
obtain the use of it only through the medium of the banks which, in
relation to them, represent the owners of the capital. On the other
hand, the bank is forced to sink an increasing share of its funds in
industry. Thus, to an ever greater degree the banker is being
transformed into an industrial capitalist. This bank capital, i.e.,
capital in money form, which is thus actually transformed into
industrial capital, I call ‘finance capital’.” “Finance capital is
capital controlled by banks and employed by industrialists.”^(⁴⁵)

This definition is incomplete insofar as it is silent on one extremely
important fact—on the increase of concentration of production and of
capital to such an extent that concentration is leading, and has led, to
monopoly. But throughout the whole of his work, and particularly in the
two chapters preceding the one from which this definition is taken,
Hilferding stresses the part played by _capitalist monopolies._

 

The concentration of production; the monopolies arising therefrom; the
merging or coalescence of the banks with industry—such is the history of
the rise of finance capital and such is the content of that concept.

 

We now have to describe how, under the general conditions of commodity
production and private property, the “business operations” of capitalist
monopolies inevitably lead to the domination of a financial oligarchy.
It should be noted that German—and not only German—bourgeois scholars,
like Riesser, Schulze-Gaevernitz, Liefmann and others, are all
apologists of imperialism and of finance capital. Instead of revealing
the “mechanics” of the formation of an oligarchy, its methods, the size
of its revenues “impeccable and peccable”, its connections with
parliaments etc., etc., they obscure or gloss over them. They evade
these “vexed questions” by pompous and vague phrases, appeals to the
“sense of responsibility” of bank directors, by praising “the sense of
duty” of Prussian officials, giving serious study to the petty details
of absolutely ridiculous parliamentary bills for the “supervision” and
“regulation” of monopolies, playing spillikins with theories, like, for
example, the following “scholarly” definition, arrived at by Professor
Liefmann: “Commerce is an occupation having for its object the
collection, storage and supply of goods.”^(⁴⁶) (The Professor’s
bold-face italics.) . . . From this it would follow that commerce
existed in the time of primitive man, who knew nothing about exchange,
and that it will exist under socialism!

 

But the monstrous facts concerning the monstrous rule of the financial
oligarchy are so glaring that in all capitalist countries, in America,
France and Germany, a whole literature has sprung up, written from
the _bourgeois_ point of view, but which, nevertheless, gives a fairly
truthful picture and criticism—petty-bourgeois, naturally—of this
oligarchy.

 

Paramount importance attaches to the “holding system”, already briefly
referred to above. The German economist, Heymann, probably the first to
call attention to this matter, describes the essence of it in this way:

 

“The head of the concern controls the principal company (literally: the
“mother company”); the latter reigns over the subsidiary companies
(“daughter companies”) which in their turn control still other
subsidiaries (“grandchild companies”), etc. In this way, it is possible
with a comparatively small capital to dominate immense spheres of
production. Indeed, if holding 50 per cent of the capital is always
sufficient to control a company, the head of the concern needs only one
million to control eight million in the second subsidiaries. And if this
‘interlocking’ is extended, it is possible with one million to control
sixteen million, thirty-two million, etc.”^(⁴⁷)

 

As a matter of fact, experience shows that it is sufficient to own 40
per cent of the shares of a company in order to direct its
affairs,^(⁴⁸) since in practice a certain number of small, scattered
shareholders find it impossible to attend general meetings, etc. The
“democratisation” of the ownership of shares, from which the bourgeois
sophists and opportunist so-called “Social-Democrats” expect (or say
that they expect) the “democratisation of capital”, the strengthening of
the role and significance of small scale production, etc., is, in fact,
one of the ways of increasing the power of the financial oligarchy.
Incidentally, this is why, in the more advanced, or in the older and
more “experienced” capitalist countries, the law allows the issue of
shares of smaller denomination. In Germany, the law does not permit the
issue of shares of less than one thousand marks denomination, and the
magnates of German finance look with an envious eye at Britain, where
the issue of one-pound shares (= 20 marks, about 10 rubles) is permitted
Siemens, one of the biggest industrialists and “financial kings” in
Germany, told the Reiclistag on June 7, 1900, that “the one-pound share
is the basis of British imperialism”.^(⁴⁹) This merchant has a much
deeper and more “Marxist” understanding of imperialism than a certain
disreputable writer who is held to be one of the founders of Russian
Marxism and believes that imperialism is a bad habit of a certain
nation....

 

But the “holding system” not only serves enormously to increase the
power of the monopolists; it also enables them to resort with impunity
to all sorts of shady and dirty tricks to cheat the public, because
formally the directors of the “mother company” are not legally
responsible for the “daughter company”, which is supposed to be
“independent”, and _through the medium_ of which they can “pull
off” _anything_. Here is an example taken from the German review, _Die
Bank_, for May 1914:

 

“The Spring Steel Company of Kassel was regarded some years ago as being
one of the most profitable enterprises in Germany. Through bad
management its dividends fell from 15 per cent to nil. It appears that
the Board, without consulting the shareholders, had loaned _six million
marks_ to one of its ‘daughter companies’, the Hassia Company, which had
a nominal capital of only some hundreds of thousands of marks. This
commitment, amounting to nearly treble the capital of the ‘mother
company’, was never mentioned in its balance-sheets. This omission was
quite legal and could be hushed up for two whole years because it did
not violate any point of company law. The chairman of the Supervisory
Board, who as the responsible head had signed the false balance-sheets,
was, and still is, the president of the Kassel Chamber of Commerce. The
shareholders only heard of the loan to the Hassia Company long
afterwards, when it had been proved to be a mistake”... (the writer
should put this word in inverted commas) ... “and when Spring Steel
shares dropped nearly 100 per cent, because those in the know were
getting rid of them....

 

“_This typical example of balance-sheet jugglery, quite common_ in
joint-stock companies, explains why their Boards of Directors are
willing to undertake risky transactions with a far lighter heart than
individual businessmen. Modern methods of drawing up balance-sheets not
only make it possible to conceal doubtful undertakings from the ordinary
shareholder, but also allow the people most concerned to escape the
consequence of unsuccessful speculation by selling their shares in time
when the individual businessman risks his own skin in everything he
does....

 

“The balance-sheets of many joint-stock companies put us in mind of the
palimpsests of the Middle Ages from which the visible inscription had
first to be erased in order to discover beneath it another inscription
giving the real meaning of the document. [Palimpsests are parchment
documents from which the original inscription has been erased and
another inscription imposed.]

 

“The simplest and, therefore, most common procedure for making
balance-sheets indecipherable is to divide a single business into
several parts by setting up ‘daughter companies’—or by annexing them.
The advantages of this system for various purposes—legal and illegal—are
so evident that big companies which do not employ it are quite the
exception.”^(⁵⁰)

 

As an example of a huge monopolist company that extensively employs this
system, the author quotes the famous General Electric Company (the
A.E.G., to which I shall refer again later on). In 1912, it was
calculated that this company held shares in 175 to 200 other companies,
dominating them, of course, and thus controlling a total capital of
about _1,500 million marks_.^(⁵¹)

 

None of the rules of control, the publication of balance-sheets, the
drawing up of balance-sheets according to a definite form, the public
auditing of accounts, etc., the things about which well-intentioned
professors and officials—that is, those imbued with the good intention
of defending and prettyfying capitalism—discourse to the public, are of
any avail; for private property is sacred, and no one can be prohibited
from buying, selling, exchanging or hypothecating shares, etc.

 

The extent to which this “holding system” has developed in the big
Russian banks may be judged by the figures given by E. Agalid, who for
fifteen years was an official of the Russo-Chinese Bank and who, in May
1914, published a book, not altogether correctly entitled _Big Banks and
the World Market._^(⁵²) The author divides the big Russian banks into
two main groups: (a) banks that come under the “holding system”, and (b)
“independent” banks—“independence” however, being arbitrarily taken to
mean independence of _foreign_ banks. The author divides the first group
into three subgroups: (1) German holdings, (2) British holdings, and (3)
French holdings, having in view the “holdings” and domination of the big
foreign banks of the particular country mentioned. The author divides
the capital of the banks into “productively” invested capital
(industrial and commercial undertakings), and “speculatively” invested
capital (in Stock Exchange and financial operations), assuming, from his
petty-bourgeois reformist point of view, that it is possible, under
capitalism, to separate the first form of investment from the second and
to abolish the second form.

 

Here are the figures he supplies:

 

BANK ASSETS
(According to Reports for October-November 1912
000,000 rubles)

 

Capital Invested

Groups of Russian banks

Productively

Speculatively

Total

a 1)

Four banks: Siberian Commercial,
Russian , International, and 
Discount Bank....

413.7

859.1

1,272.8

a 2)

Two banks: Commercial and
Industrial, and Russo-British

239.3

169.1

408.4

a 3)

Five banks: Russian-Asiatic, St.
Petersburg Private, Azov-Don,
Union Moscow, Russo-
French Commercial

711.8

661.2

1,373.0

 

(11 banks) _Total_..............a) =

1,364.8

1,689.4

3,054.2

b)

Eight banks: Moscow Merchants,
Volga-Kama, Junker and Co., 
St. Petersburg Commercial (formerly
Wawelberg), Bank of Moscow (formerly
Ryabushinsky), Moscow Discount,
Moscow Commercial, Moscow
Private.......

504.2

391.1

895.3

 

(10 banks) _Total_ ..........

1,869.0

2,080.5

3,949.5

 

According to these figures, of the approximately 4,000 million rubles
making up the “working” capital of the big banks, _more than
three-fourths_, more than 3,000 million, belonged to banks which in
reality were only “daughter companies” of foreign banks, and chiefly of
Paris banks (the famous trio: Union Parisienne, Paris et Pays-Bas and
Société Générale), and of Berlin banks (particularly the Deutsche Bank
and Disconto-Gesellschaft). Two of the biggest Russian banks, the
Russian (Russian Bank for Foreign Trade) and the International (St.
Petersburg International Commercial Bank), between 1906 and 1912
increased their capital from 44 to 98 million rubles, and their reserves
from 15 million to 39 million “employing three-fourths German capital”.
The first bank belongs to the Berlin Deutsche Bank “concern” and the
second to the Berlin Disconto-Gesellschaft. The worthy Agahd is deeply
indignant at the majority of the shares being held by the Berlin banks,
so that the Russian shareholders are, therefore, powerless. Naturally,
the country which exports capital skims the cream; for example, the
Berlin Deutsche Bank, before placing the shares of the Siberian
Commercial Bank on the Berlin market, kept them in its portfolio for a
whole year, and then sold them at the rate of 193 for 100, that is, at
nearly twice their nominal value, “earning” a profit of nearly six
million rubles, which Hilferding calls “promoter’s profits”.

 

Our author puts the total “capacity” of the principal St. Petersburg
banks at 8,235 million rubles, well over 8,000 million, and the
“holdings”, or rather, the extent to which foreign banks dominated them,
he estimates as follows: French banks, 55 per cent; British, 10 per
cent; German, 35 per cent. The author calculates that of the total of
8,235 million rubles of functioning capital, 3,687 million rubles, or
over 40 per cent, fall to the share of the Produgol and Prodamet
syndicates and the syndicates in the oil, metallurgical and cement
industries. Thus, owing to the formation of capitalist monopolies, the
merging of bank and industrial capital has also made enormous strides in
Russia.

 

Finance capital, concentrated in a few hands and exercising a virtual
monopoly, exacts enormous and ever-increasing profits from the floating
of companies, issue of stock, state loans, etc., strengthens the
domination of the financial oligarchy and levies tribute upon the whole
of society for the benefit of monopolists. Here is an example, taken
from a multitude of others, of the “business” methods of the American
trusts, quoted by Hilferding. In 1887, Havemeyer founded the Sugar Trust
by amalgamating fifteen small firms, whose total capital amounted to
6,500,000 dollars. Suitably “watered”, as the Americans say, the capital
of the trust was declared to be 50 million dollars. This
“overcapitalisation” anticipated the monopoly profits, in the same way
as the United States Steel Corporation anticipates its monopoly profits
in buying up as many iron ore fields as possible. In fact, the Sugar
Trust set up monopoly prices, which secured it such profits that it
could pay 10 per cent dividend on capital “watered” _sevenfold, or about
70 per cent on the capital actually invested at the time the trust was
formed!_ In 1909, the capital of the Sugar Trust amounted to 90 million
dollars. In twenty-two years, it had increased its capital more than
tenfold.

 

In France the domination of the “financial oligarchy” (_Against the
Financial Oligarchy_ in France, the title of the well-known book by
Lysis, the fifth edition of which was published in 1908) assumed a form
that was only slightly different. Four of the most powerful banks enjoy,
not a relative, but an “absolute monopoly” in the issue of bonds. In
reality, this is a “trust of big banks”. And monopoly ensures monopoly
profits from bond issues. Usually a borrowing country does not get more
than 90 per cent of the sum of the loan, the remaining 10 per cent goes
to the banks and other middlemen. The profit made by the banks out of
the Russo-Chinese loan of 400 million francs amounted to 8 per cent; out
of the Russian (1904) loan of 800 million francs the profit amounted to
10 per cent; and out of the Moroccan (1904) loan of 62,500,000 francs it
amounted to 18.75 per cent. Capitalism, which began its development with
petty usury capital, is ending its development with gigantic usury
capital. “The French,” says Lysis, “are the usurers of Europe.” All the
conditions of economic life are being profoundly modified by this
transformation of capitalism. With a stationary population, and stagnant
industry, commerce and shipping, the “country” can grow rich by usury.
“Fifty persons, representing a capital of eight million francs, can
control _2,000 million_ francs deposited in four banks.” The “holding
system”, with which we are already familiar, leads to the same result.
One of the biggest banks, the Société Générale for instance, issues
64,000 bonds for its “daughter company”, the Egyptian Sugar Refineries.
The bonds are issued at 150 per cent, i.e., the bank gains 50 centimes
on the franc. The dividends of the new company were found to be
fictitious, the “public” lost from 90 to 100 million francs. “One of the
directors of the Société Générale was a member of the board of directors
of the Sugar Refineries.” It is not surprising that the author is driven
to the conclusion that “the French Republic is a financial monarchy”;
“it is the complete domination of the financial oligarchy; the latter
dominates over the press and the government.”^(⁵³)

 

The extraordinarily high rate of profit obtained from the issue of
bonds, which is one of the principal functions of finance capital, plays
a very important part in the development and consolidation of the
financial oligarchy. “There is not a single business of this type within
the country that brings in profits even approximately equal to those
obtained from the floatation of foreign loans,” says _Die Bank_.^(⁵⁴)

 

“No banking operation brings in profits comparable with those obtained
from the issue of securities!” According to the _German Economist_, the
average annual profits made on the issue of industrial stock were as
follows:

 

+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
|                                   | Per Cent                          |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1895..............                | 38.6                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1896..............                | 36.1                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1897..............                | 66.7                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1898..............                | 67.7                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1899..............                | 66.9                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+
| 1900..............                | 55.2                              |
+-----------------------------------+-----------------------------------+

 

“In the ten years from 1891 to 1900, more than a thousand million marks
were ‘earned’ by issuing German industrial stock.”^(⁵⁵)

 

During periods of industrial boom, the profits of finance capital are
immense, but during periods of depression, small and unsound businesses
go out of existence, and the big banks acquire “holdings” in them by
buying them up for a mere song, or participate in profitable schemes for
their “reconstruction” and “reorganisation”. In the “reconstruction” of
undertakings which have been running at a loss, “the share capital is
written down, that is, profits are distributed on a smaller capital and
continue to be calculated on this smaller basis. Or, if the income has
fallen to zero, new capital is called in, which, combined with the old
and less remunerative capital, will bring in an adequate return.”
“Incidentally,” adds Hilferding, “all these reorganisations and
reconstructions have a twofold significance for the banks: first, as
profitable transactions; and secondly, as opportunities for securing
control of the companies in difficulties.”^(⁵⁶)

 

Here is an instance. The Union Mining Company of Dortmund was founded in
1872. Share capital was issued to the amount of nearly 40 million marks
and the market price of the shares rose to 170 after it had paid a 12
per cent dividend for its first year. Finance capital skimmed the cream
and earned a trifle of something like 28 million marks. The principal
sponsor of this company was that very big German Disconto-Gesellschaft
which so successfully attained a capital of 300 million marks. Later,
the dividends of the Union declined to nil; the shareholders had to
consent to a “writing down” of capital, that is, to losing some of it in
order not to lose it all. By a series of “reconstructions”, more than 73
million marks were written off the books of the Union in the course of
thirty years. “At the present time, the original shareholders of the
company possess only 5 per cent of the nominal value of their
shares”^(⁵⁷) but the banks “earned something” out of every
“reconstruction”.

 

Speculation in land situated in the suburbs of rapidly growing big towns
is a particularly profitable operation for finance capital. The monopoly
of the banks merges here with the monopoly of ground-rent and with
monopoly of the means of communication, since the rise in the price of
land and the possibility of selling it profitably in lots, etc., is
mainly dependent on good means of communication with the centre of the
town; and these means of communication are in the hands of large
companies which are connected with these same banks through the holding
system and the distribution of seats on the boards. As a result we get
what the German writer, L. Eschwege, a contributor to _Die Bank_ who has
made a special study of real estate business and mortgages, etc., calls
a “bog”. Frantic speculation in suburban building lots; collapse of
building enterprises like the Berlin firm of Boswau and Knauer, which
acquired as much as 100 million marks with the help of the “sound and
solid” Deutsche Bank—the latter, of course, acting through the holding
system, i.e., secretly, behind the scenes—and got out of it with a loss
of “only” 12 million marks, then the ruin of small proprietors and of
workers who get nothing from the fictitious building firms, fraudulent
deals with the “honest” Berlin police and administration for the purpose
of gaining control of the issue of cadastral certificates, building
licences, etc., etc.^(⁵⁸)

 

“American ethics”, which the European professors and well-meaning
bourgeois so hypocritically deplore, have, in the age of finance
capital, become the ethics of literally every large city in any country.

 

At the beginning of 1914, there was talk in Berlin of the formation of a
“transport trust”, i.e., of establishing “community of interests”
between the three Berlin transport undertakings: the city electric
railway, the tramway company and the omnibus company. “We have been
aware,” wrote _Die Bank_, “that this plan was contemplated ever since it
became known that the majority of the shares in the bus company had been
acquired by the other two transport companies.... We may fully believe
those who are pursuing this aim when they say that by uniting the
transport services, they will secure economies, part of which will in
time benefit the public. But the question is complicated by the fact
that behind the transport trust that is being formed are the banks,
which, if they desire, can subordinate the means of transportation,
which they have monopolised, to the interests of their real estate
business. To be convinced of the reasonableness of such a conjecture, we
need only recall that the interests of the big banks that encouraged the
formation of the Electric Railway Company were already involved in it at
the time the company was formed. That is to say: the interests of this
transport undertaking were interlocked with the real estate interests.
The point is that the eastern line of this railway was to run across
land which this bank sold at an enormous profit for itself and for
several partners in the transactions when it became certain the line was
to be laid down.”^(⁵⁹)

 

A monopoly, once it is formed and controls thousands of millions,
inevitably penetrates into _every_ sphere of public life, regardless of
the form of government and all other “details”. In German economic
literature one usually comes across obsequious praise of the integrity
of the Prussian bureaucracy, and allusions to the French Panama
scandal and to political corruption in America. But the fact is that
even bourgeois literature devoted to German banking matters constantly
has to go far beyond the field of purely banking operations; it speaks,
for instance, about “the attraction of the banks” in reference to the
increasing frequency with which public officials take employment with
the banks, as follows: “How about the integrity of a state official who
in his innermost heart is aspiring to a soft job in the
Behrenstrasse?”^(⁶⁰) (The Berlin street where the head office of the
Deutsche Bank is situated.) In 1909, the publisher of _Die Bank_, Alfred
Lansburgh, wrote an article entitled “The Economic Significance of
Byzantinism”, in which he incidentally referred to Wilhelm II’s tour of
Palestine, and to “the immediate result of this journey, the
construction of the Baghdad railway, that fatal ‘great product of German
enterprise’, which is more responsible for the ‘encirclement’ than all
our political blunders put together”.^(⁶¹) (By encirclement is meant the
policy of Edward VII to isolate Germany and surround her with an
imperialist anti-German alliance.) In 1911, Eschwege, the contributor to
this same magazine to whom I have already referred, wrote an article
entitled “Plutocracy and Bureaucracy”, in which he exposed, for example,
the case of a German official named Völker, who was a zealous member of
the Cartel Committee and who, it turned out some time later, obtained a
lucrative post in the biggest cartel, the Steel Syndicate. Similar
cases, by no means casual, forced this bourgeois author to admit that
“the economic liberty guaranteed by the German Constitution has become
in many departments of economic life, a meaningless phrase” and that
under the existing rule of the plutocracy, “even the widest political
liberty cannot save us from being converted into a nation of unfree
people”.^(⁶²)

 

As for Russia, I shall confine myself to one example. Some years ago,
all the newspapers announced that Davydov, the director of the Credit
Department of the Treasury, had resigned his post to take employment
with a certain big bank at a salary which, according to the contract,
would total over one million rubles in the course of several years. The
Credit Department is an institution, the function of which is to
“co-ordinate the activities of all the credit institutions of the
country” and which grants subsidies to banks in St. Petersburg and
Moscow amounting to between 800 and 1,000 million rubles.”^(⁶³)

 

It is characteristic of capitalism in general that the ownership of
capital is separated from the application of capital to production, that
money capital is separated from industrial or productive capital, and
that the rentier who lives entirely on income obtained from money
capital, is separated from the entrepreneur and from all who are
directly concerned in the management of capital. Imperialism, or the
domination of finance capital, is that highest stage of capitalism in
which this separation reaches vast proportions. The supremacy of finance
capital over all other forms of capital means the predominance of the
rentier and of the financial oligarchy; it means that a small number of
financially “powerful” states stand out among all the rest. The extent
to which this process is going on may be judged from the statistics on
emissions, i.e., the issue of all kinds of securities.

 

In the _Bulletin of the International Statistical Institute_,
A. Neymarck^(⁶⁴) has published very comprehensive, complete and
comparative figures covering the issue of securities all over the world,
which have been repeatedly quoted in part in economic literature. The
following are the totals he gives for four decades:

 

TOTAL ISSUES IN FRANCS PER DECADE
(000,000,000)

1871-80..............

76.1

1881-90.............

64.5

1891-1900.........

100.4

1901-10............

197.8

 

In the 1870s the total amount of issues for the whole world was high,
owing particularly to the loans floated in connection with, the
Franco-Prussian War, and the company-promotion boom which set in in
Germany after the war. On the whole, the increase was relatively not
very rapid during the three last decades of the nineteenth century, and
only in the first ten years of the twentieth century is an enormous
increase of almost 100 per cent to be observed. Thus the beginning of
the twentieth century marks the turning-point, not only in the growth of
monopolies (cartels, syndicates, trusts), of which we have already
spoken, but also in the growth of finance capital.

 

Neymarck estimates the total amount of issued securities current in the
world in 1910 at about 815,000 million francs. Deducting from this sum
amounts which might have been duplicated, he reduces the total to
575,000-600,000 million, which is distributed among the various
countries as follows (I take 600,000 million):

 

FINANCIAL SECURITIES CURRENT IN 1910
(000,000,000 francs)

Great Britain

142

Holland

12.5

United States

132

Belgium

7.5

France

110

Spain

7.5

Germany

95

Switzerland

6.25

Russia

31

Denmark

3.75

Austria-Hungary

24

Sweden, 
Norway,
Rumania,
etc.

2.5

Italy

14

Japan

12

 

 

 

 

 

From these figures we at once see standing out in sharp relief four of
the richest capitalist countries, each of which holds securities to
amounts ranging approximately from 100,000 to 150,000 million francs. Of
these four countries, two, Britain and France, are the oldest capitalist
countries, and, as we shall see, possess the most colonies; the other
two, the United States and Germany, are capitalist countries leading in
the rapidity of development and the degree of extension of capitalist
monopolies in industry. Together, these four countries own 479,000
million francs, that is, nearly 80 per cent of the world’s finance
capital. In one way or another, nearly the whole of the rest of the
world is more or less the debtor to and tributary of these international
banker countries, these four “pillars” of world finance capital.

 

It is particularly important to examine the part which the export of
capital plays in creating the international network of dependence on and
connections of finance capital.

 



IV. EXPORT OF CAPITAL


Typical of the old capitalism, when free competition held undivided
sway, was the export of goods. Typical of the latest stage of
capitalism, when monopolies rule, is the export of capital.

 

Capitalism is commodity production at its highest stage of development,
when labour-power itself becomes a commodity. The growth of internal
exchange, and, particularly, of international exchange, is a
characteristic feature of capitalism. The uneven and spasmodic
development of individual enterprises, individual branches of industry
and individual countries is inevitable under the capitalist system.
England became a capitalist country before any other, and by the middle
of the nineteenth century, having adopted free trade, claimed to be the
“workshop of the world”, the supplier of manufactured goods to all
countries, which in exchange were to keep her provided with raw
materials. But in the last quarter of the nineteenth century, this
monopoly was already undermined; for other countries, sheltering
themselves with “protective” tariffs, developed into independent
capitalist states. On the threshold of the twentieth century we see the
formation of a new type of monopoly: firstly, monopolist associations of
capitalists in all capitalistically developed countries; secondly, the
monopolist position of a few very rich countries, in which the
accumulation of capital has reached gigantic proportions. An enormous
“surplus of capital” has arisen in the advanced countries.

 

It goes without saying that if capitalism could develop agriculture,
which today is everywhere lagging terribly behind industry, if it could
raise the living standards of the masses, who in spite of the amazing
technical progress are everywhere still half-starved and
poverty-stricken, there could be no question of a surplus of capital.
This “argument” is very often advanced by the petty-bourgeois critics of
capitalism. But if capitalism did these things it would not be
capitalism; for both uneven development and a semi-starvation level of
existence of the masses are fundamental and inevitable conditions and
constitute premises of this mode of production. As long as capitalism
remains what it is, surplus capital will be utilised not for the purpose
of raising the standard of living of the masses in a given country, for
this would mean a decline in profits for the capitalists, but for the
purpose of increasing profits by exporting capital abroad to the
backward countries. In these backward countries profits are usually
high, for capital is scarce, the price of land is relatively low, wages
are low, raw materials are cheap. The export of capital is made possible
by a number of backward countries having already been drawn into world
capitalist intercourse; main railways have either been or are being
built in those countries, elementary conditions for industrial
development have been created, etc. The need to export capital arises
from the fact that in a few countries capitalism has become “overripe”
and (owing to the backward state of agriculture and the poverty of the
masses) capital cannot find a field for “profitable” investment.

 

Here are approximate figures showing the amount of capital invested
abroad by the three principal countries^(⁶⁵):

CAPITAL INVESTED ABROAD
(000,000,000 francs)

Year

Great Britain

France

Germany

1862.....

3.6

—

—

1872.....

15.0

10 (1869)

—

1882.....

22.0

15(1880)

?

1893.....

42.0

20(1890)

?

1902.....

62.0

27-37

12.5

1914.....

75-100.0

00

44.0

 

This table shows that the export of capital reached enormous dimensions
only at the beginning of the twentieth century. Before the war the
capital invested abroad by the three principal countries amounted to
between 175,000 million and 200,000 million francs. At the modest rate
of 5 per cent, the income from this sum should reach from 8,000 to
10,000 million francs a year—a sound basis for the imperialist
oppression and exploitation of most of the countries and nations of the
world, for the capitalist parasitism of a handful of wealthy states!

How is this capital invested abroad distributed among the various
countries? _Where _is it invested? Only an approximate answer can be
given to these questions, but it is one sufficient to throw light on
certain general relations and connections of modern imperialism.

 

DISTRIBUTION (APPROXIMATE) OF FOREIGN
CAPITAL IN DIFFERENT PARTS OF THE GLOBE
(circa 1910)

 

Great 
Britain

France

Germany

Total

 

 

(000,000,000 marks)

 

Europe..........

4

23

18

45

America..........

37

4

10

51

Asia, Africa, and Australia......

29

8

7

44

 

 

 

 

 

Total........

70

35

35

140

 

The principal spheres of investment of British capital are the British
colonies, which are very large also in America (for example, Canada),
not to mention Asia, etc. In this case, enormous exports of capital are
bound up most closely with vast colonies, of tile importance of which
for imperialism I shall speak later. In the case of France the situation
is different. French capital exports are invested mainly in Europe,
primarily in Russia (at least ten thousand million francs). This is
mainly loan capital, government loans, and not capital invested in
industrial undertakings. Unlike British colonial imperialism, French
imperialism might be termed usury imperialism. In the case of Germany,
we have a third type; colonies are inconsiderable, and German capital
invested abroad is divided most evenly between Europe and America.

The export of capital influences and greatly accelerates the development
of capitalism in those countries to which it is exported. While,
therefore, the export of capital may tend to a certain extent to arrest
development in the capital-exporting countries, it can only do so by
expanding and deepening the further development of capitalism throughout
the world.

 

The capital-exporting countries are nearly always able to obtain certain
“advantages”, the character of which throws light on the peculiarity of
the epoch of finance capital and monopoly. The following passage, for
instance, appeared in the Berlin review, _Die Bank_, for October 1913:

 

“A comedy worthy of the pen of Aristophanes is lately being played on
the international capital market. Numerous foreign countries, from Spain
to the Balkan states, from Russia to Argentina, Brazil and China, are
openly or secretly coming into the big money market with demands,
sometimes very persistent, for loans. The money markets are not very
bright at the moment and the political outlook is not promising. But not
a single money market dares to refuse a loan for fear that its neighbour
may forestall it, consent to grant a loan and so secure some reciprocal
service. In these international transactions the creditor nearly always
manages to secure some extra benefit: a favourable clause in a
commercial treaty, a coating station, a contract to construct a harbour,
a fat concession, or an order for guns.”^(⁶⁶)

 

Finance capital has created the epoch of monopolies, and monopolies
introduce everywhere monopolist principles: the utilisation of
“connections” for profitable transactions takes the place of competition
on the open market. The most usual thing is to stipulate that part of
the loan granted shall be spent on purchases in the creditor country,
particularly on orders for war materials, or for ships, etc. In the
course of the last two decades (1890-1910), France has very often
resorted to this method. The export of capital thus becomes a means of
encouraging the export of commodities. In this connection, transactions
between particularly big firms assume a form which, as
Schilder^(⁶⁷) “mildly” puts it, “borders on corruption”. Krupp in
Germany, Schneider in France, Armstrong in Britain are instances of
firms which have close connections with powerful banks and governments
and which cannot easily be “ignored” when a loan is being arranged.

 

France, when granting loans to Russia, “squeezed” her in the commercial
treaty of September 16, 1905, stipulating for certain concessions to run
till 1917. She did the same in the commercial treaty with Japan of
August 19, 1911. The tariff war between Austria and Serbia, which
lasted, with a seven months’ interval, from 1906 to 1911, was partly
caused by Austria and France competing to supply Serbia with war
materials. In January 1912, Paul Deschanel stated in the Chamber of
Deputies that from 1908 to 1911 French firms had supplied war materials
to Serbia to the value of 45 million francs.

A report from the Austro-Hungarian Consul at San-Paulo (Brazil) states:
“The Brazilian railways are being built chiefly by French, Belgian,
British and German capital. In the financial operations connected with
the construction of these railways the countries involved stipulate for
orders for the necessary railway materials.”

 

Thus finance capital, literally, one might say, spreads its net over all
countries of the world. An important role in this is played by banks
founded in the colonies and by their branches. German imperialists look
with envy at the “old” colonial countries which have been particularly
“successful” in providing for themselves in this respect. In 1904, Great
Britain had 50 colonial banks with 2,279 branches (in 1910 there were 72
banks with 5,449 branches), France had 20 with 136 branches; Holland, 16
with 68 branches; and Germany had “only” 13 with 70 branches.^(⁶⁸) The
American capitalists, in their turn, are jealous of the English and
German: “In South America,” they complained in 1915, “five German banks
have forty branches and five British banks have seventy branches....
Britain and Germany have invested in Argentina, Brazil, and Uruguay in
the last twenty-five years approximately four thousand million dollars,
and as a result together enjoy 46 per cent of the total trade of these
three countries.”^(⁶⁹)

 

The capital-exporting countries have divided the world among themselves
in the figurative sense of the term. But finance capital has led to
the _actual_ division of the world.

 

V. DIVISION OF THE WORLD AMONG CAPITALIST ASSOCIATIONS

 

Monopolist capitalist associations, cartels, syndicates and trusts first
divided the home market among themselves and obtained more or less
complete possession of the industry of their own country. But under
capitalism the home market is inevitably bound up with the foreign
market. Capitalism long ago created a world market. As the export of
capital increased, and as the foreign and colonial connections and
“spheres of influence” of the big monopolist associations expanded in
all ways, things “naturally” gravitated towards an international
agreement among these associations, and towards the formation of
international cartels.

 

This is a new stage of world concentration of capital and production,
incomparably higher than the preceding stages. Let us see how this
supermonopoly develops.

 

The electrical industry is highly typical of the latest technical
achievements and is most typical of capitalism at the end of the
nineteenth and the beginning of the twentieth centuries. This industry
has developed most in the two leaders of the new capitalist countries,
the United States and Germany. In Germany, the crisis of 1900 gave a
particularly strong impetus to its concentration. During the crisis, the
banks, which by that time had become fairly well merged with industry,
enormously accelerated and intensified the ruin of relatively small
firms and their absorption by the large ones. “The banks,” writes
Jeidels, “refused a helping hand to the very firms in greatest need of
capital, and brought on first a frenzied boom and then the hopeless
failure of the companies which had not been connected with them closely
enough.” ^(⁷⁰)

 

As a result, after 1900, concentration in Germany progressed with giant
strides. Up to 1900 there had been seven or eight “groups” in the
electrical industry. Each consisted of several companies (altogether
there were 28) and each was backed by from 2 to 11 banks. Between 1908
and 1912 all these groups were merged into two, or one. The following
diagram shows the process:

 

GROUPS IN THE ELECTRICAL INDUSTRY

Prior to 1900: Felten & Lahmeyer; Guillaume
|
|

Union A.E.G.
|
|

Siemens Schuckert
& Halske & Co.
|

Berg-
mann
|

Kum-
mer
|

|
|
Felten & Lahmeyer
|_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_

|
A.E.G.
(G.E.C.)
_-_-_-_-_-_-_-|

|
|
Siemens & Halske-
Schuckert
|_-_-_-_-_-_-_-_

|
|
Berg-
man
_-_-_-_-_-|

|
|
Failed in 
1900

By 1912:

A.E.G. (G.E.C.) Siemens & Halske Schuckert

 

(in close "co-operation" since 1908)

 

The famous A.E.G. (General Electric Company), which grew up in this way,
controls 175 to 200 companies (through the “holding” system), and a
total capital of approximately _1,500 million_ marks. Of direct agencies
abroad alone, it has thirty-four, of which twelve are joint-stock
companies, in more than ten countries. As early as 1904 the amount of
capital invested abroad by the German electrical industry was estimated
at 233 million marks. Of this sum, 62 million were invested in Russia.
Needless to say, the A.E.G. is a huge “combine”—its manufacturing
companies alone number no less than sixteen—producing the most diverse
articles, from cables and insulators to motor-cars and flying machines.

 

But concentration in Europe was also a component part of the process of
concentration in America, which developed in the following way:

 

 

General Electric Company

United States:

Thomas-Houston Co.
establishes a firm in
Europe

Edison Co. establishes in Eu-
rope the French Edison Co.
which transfers its patents to
the German firm

Germany:

Union Electric Co.

General Electric Co. (A.E.G.)

 

Thus, _two_ electrical “great powers” were formed: “there are no other
electrical companies in the world _completely_ independent of them,”
wrote Heinig in his article “The Path of the Electric Trust”. An idea,
although far from complete, of the turnover and the size of the
enterprises of the two “trusts” can be obtained from the following
figures:

 

+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
|                 | Turnover        | Number of       | Net profits     |
|                 | (000,000        | employees       | (000,000        |
|                 | marks)          |                 | marks)          |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| America:        |                 |                 |                 |
| General         |                 |                 |                 |
| Electric Co:    |                 |                 |                 |
| (G.E.C)         |                 |                 |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| 1907            | 252             | 28,000          | 35.4            |
| 1910            | 298             | 32,000          | 45.6            |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| Germany:        |                 |                 |                 |
| General         |                 |                 |                 |
| Electric Co:    |                 |                 |                 |
| (A.E.G.)        |                 |                 |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| 1907            | 216             | 30,700          | 14.5            |
| 1911            | 362             | 60,800          | 21.7            |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+

 

And then, in 1907, the German and American trusts concluded an agreement
by which they divided the world between them. Competition between them
ceased. The American General Electric Company (G.E.C.) “got” the United
States and Canada. The German General Electric Company (A.E.G.) “got”
Germany, Austria, Russia, Holland, Denmark, Switzerland, Turkey and the
Balkans. Special agreements, naturally secret, were concluded regarding
the penetration of “daughter companies” into new branches of industry,
into “new” countries formally not yet allotted. The two trusts were to
exchange inventions and experiments.^(⁷¹)

The difficulty of competing against this trust, actually a single
world-wide trust controlling a capital of several thousand million, with
“branches”, agencies, representatives, connections, etc., in every
corner of the world, is self-evident. But the division of the world
between two powerful trusts does not preclude redivision if the relation
of forces changes as a result of uneven development, war, bankruptcy,
etc.

 

An instructive example of an attempt at such a redivision, of the
struggle for redivision, is provided by the oil industry.

 

“The world oil market,” wrote Jeidels in 1905, “is even today still
divided between two great financial groups—Rockefeller’s American
Standard Oil Co., and Rothschild and Nobel, the controlling interests of
the Russian oilfields in Baku. The two groups are closely connected. But
for several years five enemies have been threatening their
monopoly”^(⁷²): (1) the exhaustion of the American oilfields; (2) the
competition of the firm of Mantashev of Baku; (3) the Austrian
oilfields; (4) the Rumanian oilfields; (5) the overseas oilfields,
particularly in the Dutch colonies (the extremely rich firms, Samuel,
and Shell, also connected with British capital). The three last groups
are connected with the big German banks, headed by the huge Deutsche
Bank. These banks independently and systematically developed the oil
industry in Rumania, for example, in order to have a foothold of their
“own”. In 1907, the foreign capital invested in the Rumanian oil
industry was estimated at 185 million francs, of which 74 million was
German capital.^(⁷³)

 

A struggle began for the “division of the world”, as, in fact, it is
called in economic literature. On the one hand, the Rockefeller “oil
trust” wanted to lay its hands on _everything_; it formed a “daughter
company” _right in_ Holland, and bought up oilfields in the Dutch
Indies, in order to strike at its principal enemy, the Anglo-Dutch Shell
trust. On the other hand, the Deutsche Bank and the other German banks
aimed at “retaining” Rumania “for themselves” and at uniting her with
Russia against Rockefeller. The latter possessed far more capital and an
excellent system of oil transportation and distribution. The struggle
had to end, and did end in 1907, with the utter defeat of the Deutsche
Bank, which was confronted with the alternative: either to liquidate its
“oil interests” and lose millions, or submit. It chose to submit, and
concluded a very disadvantageous agreement with the “oil trust”. The
Deutsche Bank agreed “not to attempt anything which might injure
American interests”. Provision was made, however, for the annulment of
the agreement in the event of Germany establishing a state oil monopoly.

 

Then the “comedy of oil” began. One of the German finance kings, von
Gwinner, a director of the Deutsche Bank, through his private secretary,
Stauss, launched a campaign _for _a state oil monopoly. The gigantic
machine of the huge German bank and all its wide “connections” were set
in motion. The press bubbled over with “patriotic” indignation against
the “yoke” of the American trust, and, on March 15, 1911, the Reichstag,
by an almost unanimous vote, adopted a motion asking the government to
introduce a bill for the establishment of an oil monopoly. The
government seized upon this “popular” idea, and the game of the Deutsche
Bank, which hoped to cheat its American counterpart and improve its
business by a state monopoly, appeared to have been won. The German oil
magnates already saw visions of enormous profits, which would not be
less than those of the Russian sugar refiners.... But, firstly, the big
German banks quarrelled among themselves over the division of the
spoils. The Disconto-Gesellschaft exposed the covetous aims of the
Deutsche Bank; secondly, the government took fright at the prospect of a
struggle with Rockefeller, for it was very doubtful whether Germany
could be sure of obtaining oil from other sources (the Rumanian output
was small); thirdly, just at that time the 1913 credits of a thousand
million marks were voted for Germany’s war preparations. The oil
monopoly project was postponed. The Rockefeller “oil trust” came out of
the struggle, for the time being, victorious.

 

The Berlin review, _Die Bank_, wrote in this connection that Germany
could fight the oil trust only by establishing an electricity monopoly
and by converting water-power into cheap electricity. “But,” the author
added, “the electricity monopoly will come when the producers need it,
that is to say, when the next great crash in the electrical industry is
imminent, and when the gigantic, expensive power stations now being put
up at great cost everywhere by private electrical concerns, which are
already obtaining certain franchises from towns, from states, etc., can
no longer work at a profit. Water-power will then have to be used. But
it will be impossible to convert it into cheap electricity at state
expense; it will also have to be handed over to a ‘private monopoly
controlled by the state’, because private industry has already concluded
a number of contracts and has stipulated for heavy compensation.... So
it was with the nitrate monopoly, so it is with the oil monopoly, so it
will be with the electric power monopoly. It is time our state
socialists, who allow themselves to be blinded by a beautiful principle,
understood, at last, that in Germany the monopolies have never pursued
the aim, nor have they had the result, of benefiting the consumer, or
even of handing over to the state part of the promoter’s profits; they
have served only to facilitate, at the expense of the state, the
recovery of private industries which were on the verge of
bankruptcy.^(⁷⁴)

 

Such are the valuable admissions which the German bourgeois economists
are forced to make. We see plainly here how private and state monopolies
are interwoven in the epoch of finance capital; how both are but
separate links in the imperialist struggle between the big monopolists
for the division of the world.

 

In merchant shipping, the tremendous development of concentration has
ended also in the division of the world. In Germany two powerful
companies have come to the fore: the Hamburg-Amerika and the
Norddeutscher Lloyd, each having a capital of 200 million marks (in
stocks and bonds) and possessing shipping tonnage to the value of 185 to
189 million marks. On the other hand, in America, on January 1, 1903,
the International Mercantile Marine Co., known as the Morgan trust, was
formed; it united nine American and British steamship companies, and
possessed a capital of 120 million dollars (480 million marks). As early
as 1903, the German giants and this American-British trust concluded an
agreement to divide the world with a consequent division of profits. The
German companies undertook not to compete in the Anglo-American traffic.
Which ports were to be “allotted” to each was precisely stipulated; a
joint committee of control was set up, etc. This agreement was concluded
for twenty years, with the prudent provision for its annulment in the
event of war. ^(⁷⁵)

Extremely instructive also is the story of the formation of the
International Rail Cartel. The first attempt of the British, Belgian and
German rail manufacturers to form such a cartel was made as early as
1884, during a severe industrial depression. The manufacturers agreed
not to compete with one another in the home markets of the countries
involved, and they divided the foreign markets in the following quotas:
Great Britain, 66 per cent; Germany, 27 per cent; Belgium, 7 per cent.
India was reserved entirely for Great Britain. Joint war was declared
against a British firm which remained outside the cartel, the cost of
which was met by a percentage levy on all sales. But in 1886 the cartel
collapsed when two British firms retired from it. It is characteristic
that agreement could not be achieved during subsequent boom periods.

 

At the beginning of 1904, the German steel syndicate was formed. In
November 1904, the International Rail Cartel was revived, with the
following quotas: Britain, 53.5 per cent; Germany, 28.83 per cent;
Belgium, 17.67 per cent. France came in later and received 4.8 per cent,
5.8 per cent and 6.4 per cent in the first, second and third year
respectively, over and above the 100 per cent limit, i.e., out of a
total of 104.8 per cent, etc. In 1905, the United States Steel
Corporation entered the cartel; then Austria and Spain. “At the present
time,” wrote Vogelstein in 1910, “the division of the world is complete,
and the big consumers, primarily the state railways—since the world has
been parcelled out without consideration for their interests—can now
dwell like the poet in the heavens of Jupiter.”^(⁷⁶)

 

Let me also mention the International Zinc Syndicate which was
established in 1909 and which precisely apportioned output among five
groups of factories: German, Belgian, French, Spanish and British; and
also the International Dynamite Trust, which, Liefmann says, is “quite a
modern, close alliance of all the German explosives manufacturers who,
with the French and American dynamite manufacturers, organised in a
similar manner, have divided the whole world among themselves, so to
speak”. ^(⁷⁷)

 

Liefmann calculated that in 1897 there were altogether about forty
international cartels in which Germany had a share, while in 1910 there
were about a hundred.

 

Certain bourgeois writers (now joined by Karl Kautsky, who has
completely abandoned the Marxist position he had held, for example, in
1909) have expressed the opinion that international cartels, being one
of the most striking expressions of the internationalisation of capital,
give the hope of peace among nations under capitalism. Theoretically,
this opinion is absolutely absurd, while in practice it is sophistry and
a dishonest defence of the worst opportunism. International cartels show
to what point capitalist monopolies have developed, and _the object_ of
the struggle between the various capitalist associations. This last
circumstance is the most important; it alone shows us the
historico-economic meaning of what is taking place; for the _forms _of
the struggle may and do constantly change in accordance with varying,
relatively specific and temporary causes, but the _substance _of the
struggle, its class _content_, positively _cannot _change while classes
exist. Naturally, it is in the interests of, for example, the German
bourgeoisie, to whose side Kautsky has in effect gone over in his
theoretical arguments (I shall deal with this later), to obscure
the_substance _of the present economic struggle (the division of the
world) and to emphasise now this and now another _form _of the struggle.
Kautsky makes the same mistake. Of course, we have in mind not only the
German bourgeoisie, but the bourgeoisie all over the world. The
capitalists divide the world, not out of any particular malice, but
because the degree of concentration which has been reached forces them
to adopt this method in order to obtain profits. And they divide it “in
proportion to capital”, “in proportion to strength”, because there
cannot be any other method of division under commodity production and
capitalism. But strength varies with the degree of economic and
political development. In order to understand what is taking place, it
is necessary to know what questions are settled by the changes in
strength. The question as to whether these changes are “purely” economic
or non-economic (e.g., military) is a secondary one, which cannot in the
least affect fundamental views on the latest epoch of capitalism. To
substitute the question of the form of the struggle and agreements
(today peaceful, tomorrow warlike, the next day warlike again) for the
question of the substance of the struggle and agreements between
capitalist associations is to sink to the role of a sophist.

 

The epoch of the latest stage of capitalism shows us that certain
relations between capitalist associations grow up, _based _on the
economic division of the world; while parallel to and in connection with
it, certain relations grow up between political alliances, between
states, on the basis of the territorial division of the world, of the
struggle for colonies, of the “struggle for spheres of influence”.

 



VI. DIVISION OF THE WORLD AMONG THE GREAT POWERS


In his book, on “the territorial development of the European colonies”,
A. Supan,^(⁷⁸) the geographer, gives the following brief summary of this
development at the end of the nineteenth century:

 

PERCENTAGE OF TERRITORY BELONGING TO THE EUROPEAN
COLONIAL POWERS
(Including the United States)

 

1876

1900

Increase or 
decrease

Africa..........

10.8

90.4

+79.6

Polynesia....

56.8

98.9

+42.1

Asia............

51.5

56.6

+5.1

Australia.....

100.0

100.0

—

America......

27.5

27.2

-0.3

 

“The characteristic feature of this period,” he concludes, “is,
therefore, the division of Africa and Polynesia.” As there are no
unoccupied territories—that is, territories that do not belong to any
state in Asia and America, it is necessary to amplify Supan’s conclusion
and say that the characteristic feature of the period under review is
the final partitioning of the globe—final, not in the sense
that _repartition _is impossible; on the contrary, repartitions are
possible and inevitable—but in the sense that the colonial policy of the
capitalist countries has _completed _the seizure of the unoccupied
territories on our planet. For the first time the world is completely
divided up, so that in the future _only _redivision is possible, i.e.,
territories can only pass from one “owner” to another, instead of
passing as ownerless territory to an owner.

 

Hence, we are living in a peculiar epoch of world colonial policy, which
is most closely connected with the “latest stage in the development of
capitalism”, with finance capital. For this reason, it is essential
first of all to deal in greater detail with the facts, in order to
ascertain as exactly as possible what distinguishes this epoch from
those preceding it, and what the present situation is. In the first
place, two questions of fact arise here: is an intensification of
colonial policy, a sharpening of the struggle for colonies, observed
precisely in the epoch of finance capital? And how, in this respect, is
the world divided at the present time?

The American writer, Morris, in his book on the history of
colonisation,^(⁷⁹) made an attempt to sum up the data on the colonial
possessions of Great Britain, France and Germany during different
periods of the nineteenth century. The following is a brief summary of
the results he has obtained:

 

COLONIAL POSSESSIONS

Year

Great Britain

France

Germany

Area
(000,000
sq. m.)

Pop. (000,000)

Area
(000,000
sq. m.)

Pop. (000,000)

Area
(000,000
sq. m.)

Pop. (000,000)

1815-30

?

126.4

0.02

0.5

—

—

1860

2.5

145.1

0.2

3.4

—

—

1880

7.7

267.9

0.7

7.5

—

—

1899

9.3

309.0

3.7

56.4

1.0

14.7

 

 

For Great Britain, the period of the enormous expansion of colonial
conquests was that between 1860 and 1880, and it was also very
considerable in the last twenty years of the nineteenth century. For
France and Germany this period falls precisely in these twenty years. We
saw above that the development of pre-monopoly capitalism, of capitalism
in which free competition was predominant, reached its limit in the
1860s and 1870s. We now see that it is _precisely after that
period_ that the tremendous “boom” in colonial conquests begins, and
that the struggle for the territorial division of the world becomes
extraordinarily sharp. It is beyond doubt, therefore, that capitalism’s
transition to the stage of monopoly capitalism, to finance capital, _is
connected_ with the intensification of the struggle for the partitioning
of the world.

Hobson, in his work on imperialism, marks the years 1884-1900 as the
epoch of intensified “expansion” of the chief European states. According
to his estimate, Great Britain during these years acquired 3,700,000
square miles of territory with 57,000,000 inhabitants; France, 3,600,000
square miles with 36,500,000; Germany, 1,000,000 square miles with
14,700,000; Belgium, 900,000 square miles with 30,000,000; Portugal,
800,000 square miles with 9,000,000 inhabitants. The scramble for
colonies by all the capitalist states at the end of the nineteenth
century and particularly since the 1880s is a commonly known fact in the
history of diplomacy and of foreign policy.

 

In the most flourishing period of free competition in Great Britain,
i.e., between 1840 and 1860, the leading British bourgeois politicians
were _opposed_ to colonial policy and were of the opinion that the
liberation of the colonies, their complete separation from Britain, was
inevitable and desirable. M. Beer, in an article, “Modern British
Imperialism”,^(⁸⁰) published in 1898, shows that in 1852, Disraeli, a
statesman who was generally inclined towards imperialism, declared: “The
colonies are millstones round our necks.” But at the end of the
nineteenth century the British heroes of the hour were Cecil Rhodes and
Joseph Chamberlain, who openly advocated imperialism and applied the
imperialist policy in the most cynical manner!

 

It is not without interest to observe that even then these leading
British bourgeois politicians saw the connection between what might be
called the purely economic and the socio-political roots of modern
imperialism. Chamberlain advocated imperialism as a “true, wise and
economical policy”, and pointed particularly to the German, American and
Belgian competition which Great Britain was encountering in the world
market. Salvation lies in monopoly, said the capitalists as they formed
cartels, syndicates and trusts. Salvation lies in monopoly, echoed the
political leaders of the bourgeoisie, hastening to appropriate the parts
of the world not yet shared out. And Cecil Rhodes, we are informed by
his intimate friend, the journalist Stead, expressed his imperialist
views to him in 1895 in the following terms: “I was in the East End of
London (a working-class quarter) yesterday and attended a meeting of the
unemployed. I listened to the wild speeches, which were just a cry for
‘bread! bread!’ and on my way home I pondered over the scene and I
became more than ever convinced of the importance of imperialism.... My
cherished idea is a solution for the social problem, i.e., in order to
save the 40,000,000 inhabitants of the United Kingdom from a bloody
civil war, we colonial statesmen must acquire new lands to settle the
surplus population, to provide new markets for the goods produced in the
factories and mines. The Empire, as I have always said, is a bread and
butter question. If you want to avoid civil war, you must become
imperialists.^(⁸¹)

That was said in 1895 by Cecil Rhodes, millionaire, a king of finance,
the man who was mainly responsible for the Anglo-Boer War. True, his
defence of imperialism is crude and cynical, but in substance it does
not differ from the “theory” advocated by Messrs. Maslov, Südekum,
Potresov, David, the founder of Russian Marxism and others. Cecil Rhodes
was a somewhat more honest social-chauvinist....

 

To present as precise a picture as possible of the territorial division
of the world and of the changes which have occurred during the last
decades in this respect, I shall utilise the data furnished by Supan in
the work already quoted on the colonial possessions of all the powers of
the world. Supan takes the years 1876 and 1900; I shall take the year
1876—a year very aptly selected, for it is precisely by that time that
the pre-monopolist stage of development of West-European capitalism can
be said to have been, in the main, completed—and the year 1914, and
instead of Supan’s figures I shall quote the more recent statistics of
Hübner’s _Geographical and Statistical Tables_. Supan gives figures only
for colonies; I think it useful, in order to present a complete picture
of the division of the world, to add brief data on non-colonial and
semi-colonial countries, in which category I place Persia, China and
Turkey: the first of these countries is already almost completely a
colony, the second and third are becoming such.

We thus get the following result:

 

COLONIAL POSSESSIONS OF THE GREAT POWERS
(000,000 square kilometers and 000,000 inhabitants)

 

Colonies

Metropolitan
countries

Total

1876

1914

1914

1914

Area

Pop.

Area

Pop.

Area

Pop.

Area

Pop.

Great 
Britain

22.5

251.9

33.5

393.5

0.3

46.5

33.8

444.0

Russia

17.0

15.9

17.4

33.2

5.4

136.2

22.8

169.4

France

0.9

6.0

10.6

55.5

0.5

39.6

11.1

95.1

Germany

—

—

2.9

12.3

0.5

64.9

3.4

77.2

United
States

—

—

0.3

9.7

9.4

97.0

9.7

106.7

Japan

—

—

0.3

19.2

0.4

53.0

0.7

72.2

Total for 6 Great
Powers

40.4

273.8

65.0

523.4

16.5

437.2

81.5

960.6

Colonies of other powers 
(Belgium, Holland, etc.)

9.9

45.3

Semi-colonial countries
(Persia, China, Turkey)

14.5

361.2

Other countries

28.0

289.9

Total for the world

133.9

1,657.0

 

 

 

We clearly see from these figures how “complete” was the partition of
the world at the turn of the twentieth century. After 1876 colonial
possessions increased to enormous dimensions, by more than fifty per
cent, from 40,000,000 to 65,000,000 square kilometres for the six
biggest powers; the increase amounts to 25,000,000 square kilometres,
fifty per cent more than the area of the metropolitan countries
(16,500,000 square kilometres). In 1876 three powers had no colonies,
and a fourth, France, had scarcely any. By 1914 these four powers had
acquired colonies with an area of 14,100,000 square kilometres, i.e.,
about half as much again as the area of Europe, with a population of
nearly 100,000,000. The unevenness in the rate of expansion of colonial
possessions is very great. If, for instance, we compare France, Germany
and Japan, which do not differ very much in area and population, we see
that the first has acquired almost three times as much colonial
territory as the other two combined. In regard to finance capital,
France, at the beginning of the period we are considering, was also,
perhaps, several times richer than Germany and Japan put together. In
addition to, and on the basis of, purely economic conditions,
geographical and other conditions also affect the dimensions of colonial
possessions. However strong the process of levelling the world, of
levelling the economic and living conditions in different countries, may
have been in the past decades as a result of the pressure of large-scale
industry, exchange and finance capital, considerable differences still
remain; and among the six countries mentioned we see, firstly, young
capitalist countries (America, Germany, Japan) whose progress has been
extraordinarily rapid; secondly, countries with an old capitalist
development (France and Great Britain), whose progress lately has been
much slower than that of the previously mentioned countries, and
thirdly, a country most backward economically (Russia), where modern
capitalist imperialism is enmeshed, so to speak, in a particularly close
network of pre-capitalist relations.

 

Alongside the colonial possessions of the Great Powers, we have placed
the small colonies of the small states, which are, so to speak, the next
objects of a possible and probable “redivision” of colonies. These small
states mostly retain their colonies only because the big powers are torn
by conflicting interests, friction, etc., which prevent them from coming
to an agreement on the division of the spoils. As to the “semi-colonial”
states, they provide an example of the transitional forms which are to
be found in all spheres of nature and society. Finance capital is such a
great, such a decisive, you might say, force in all economic and in all
international relations, that it is capable of subjecting, and actually
does subject, to itself even states enjoying the fullest political
independence; we shall shortly see examples of this. Of course, finance
capital finds most “convenient”, and derives the greatest profit from,
a _form _of subjection which involves the loss of the political
independence of the subjected countries and peoples. In this respect,
the semi-colonial countries provide a typical example of the “middle
stage”. It is natural that the struggle for these semidependent
countries should have become particularly bitter in the epoch of finance
capital, when the rest of the world has already been divided up.

 

Colonial policy and imperialism existed before the latest stage of
capitalism, and even before capitalism. Rome, founded on slavery,
pursued a colonial policy and practised imperialism. But “general”
disquisitions on imperialism, which ignore, or put into the background,
the fundamental difference between socio-economic formations, inevitably
turn into the most vapid banality or bragging, like the comparison:
“Greater Rome and Greater Britain.”^(⁸²) Even the capitalist colonial
policy of _previous _stages of capitalism is essentially different from
the colonial policy of finance capital.

 

The principal feature of the latest stage of capitalism is the
domination of monopolist associations of big employers. These monopolies
are most firmly established when _all _the sources of raw materials are
captured by one group, and we have seen with what zeal the international
capitalist associations exert every effort to deprive their rivals of
all opportunity of competing, to buy up, for example, ironfields,
oilfields, etc. Colonial possession alone gives the monopolies complete
guarantee against all contingencies in the struggle against competitors,
including the case of the adversary wanting to be protected by a law
establishing a state monopoly. The more capitalism is developed, the
more strongly the shortage of raw materials is felt, the more intense
the competition and the hunt for sources of raw materials throughout the
whole world, the more desperate the struggle for the acquisition of
colonies.

“It may be asserted,” writes Schilder, “although it may sound
paradoxical to some, that in the more or less foreseeable future the
growth of the urban and industrial population is more likely to be
hindered by a shortage of raw materials for industry than by a shortage
of food.” For example, there is a growing shortage of timber—the price
of which is steadily rising—of leather, and of raw materials for the
textile industry. “Associations of manufacturers are making efforts to
create an equilibrium between agriculture and industry in the whole of
world economy; as an example of this we might mention the International
Federation of Cotton Spinners’ Associations in several of the most
important industrial countries, founded in 1904, and the European
Federation of Flax Spinners’ Associations, founded on the same model in
1910.”^(⁸³)

 

Of course, the bourgeois reformists, and among them particularly the
present-day adherents of Kautsky, try to belittle the importance of
facts of this kind by arguing that raw materials “could be” obtained in
the open market without a “costly and dangerous” colonial policy; and
that the supply of raw materials “could be” increased enormously by
“simply” improving conditions in agriculture in general. But such
arguments become an apology for imperialism, an attempt to paint it in
bright colours, because they ignore the principal feature of the latest
stage of capitalism: monopolies. The free market is becoming more and
more a thing of the past; monopolist syndicates and trusts are
restricting it with every passing day, and “simply” improving conditions
in agriculture means improving the conditions of the masses, raising
wages and reducing profits. Where, except in the imagination of
sentimental reformists, are there any trusts capable of concerning
themselves with the condition of the masses instead of the conquest of
colonies?

 

Finance capital is interested not only in the already discovered sources
of raw materials but also in potential sources, because present-day
technical development is extremely rapid, and land which is useless
today may be improved tomorrow if new methods are devised (to this end a
big bank can equip a special expedition of engineers, agricultural
experts, etc.), and if large amounts of capital are invested. This also
applies to prospecting for minerals, to new methods of processing up and
utilising raw materials, etc., etc. Hence, the inevitable striving of
finance capital to enlarge its spheres of influence and even its actual
territory. In the same way that the trusts capitalise their property at
two or three times its value, taking into account its “potential” (and
not actual) profits and the further results of monopoly, so finance
capital in general strives to seize the largest possible amount of land
of all kinds in all places, and by every means, taking into account
potential sources of raw materials and fearing to be left behind in the
fierce struggle for the last remnants of independent territory, or for
the repartition of those territories that have been already divided.

 

The British capitalists are exerting every effort to develop cotton
growing in _their _colony, Egypt (in 1904, out of 2,300,000 hectares of
land under cultivation, 600,000, or more than one-fourth, were under
cotton); the Russians are doing the same in _their _colony, Turkestan,
because in this way they will be in a better position to defeat their
foreign competitors, to monopolise the sources of raw materials and form
a more economical and profitable textile trust in which _all _the
processes of cotton production and manufacturing will be “combined” and
concentrated in the hands of one set of owners.

 

The interests pursued in exporting capital also give an impetus to the
conquest of colonies, for in the colonial market it is easier to employ
monopoly methods (and sometimes they are the only methods that can be
employed) to eliminate competition, to ensure supplies, to secure the
necessary “connections”, etc.

 

The non-economic superstructure which grows up on the basis of finance
capital, its politics and its ideology, stimulates the striving for
colonial conquest. “Finance capital does not want liberty, it wants
domination,” as Hilferding very truly says. And a French bourgeois
writer, developing and supplementing, as it were, the ideas of Cecil
Rhodes quoted above,^(⁸⁴) writes that social causes should be added to
the economic causes of modern colonial policy: “Owing to the growing
complexities of life and the difficulties which weigh not only on the
masses of the workers, but also on the middle classes, ‘impatience,
irritation and hatred are accumulating in all the countries of the old
civilisation and are becoming a menace to public order; the energy which
is being hurled out of the definite class channel must be given
employment abroad in order to avert an explosion at home’.”^(⁸⁵)

 

Since we are speaking of colonial policy in the epoch of capitalist
imperialism, it must be observed that finance capital and its foreign
policy, which is the struggle of the great powers for the economic and
political division of the world, give rise to a number
of _transitional _forms of state dependence. Not only are the two main
groups of countries, those owning colonies, and the colonies themselves,
but also the diverse forms of dependent countries which, politically,
are formally independent, but in fact, are enmeshed in the net of
financial and diplomatic dependence, typical of this epoch. We have
already referred to one form of dependence—the semi-colony. An example
of another is provided by Argentina.

 

“South America, and especially Argentina,” writes Schulze-Gaevernitz in
his work on British imperialism, “is so dependent financially on London
that it ought to be described as almost a British commercial
colony.”^(⁸⁶) Basing himself on the reports of the Austro-Hungarian
Consul at Buenos Aires for 1909, Schilder estimated the amount of
British capital invested in Argentina at 8,750 million francs. It is not
difficult to imagine what strong connections British finance capital
(and its faithful “friend”, diplomacy) thereby acquires with the
Argentine bourgeoisie, with the circles that control the whole of that
country’s economic and political life.

 

A somewhat different form of financial and diplomatic dependence,
accompanied by political independence, is presented by Portugal.
Portugal is an independent sovereign state, but actually, for more than
two hundred years, since the war of the Spanish Succession (1701-14), it
has been a British protectorate. Great Britain has protected Portugal
and her colonies in order to fortify her own positions in the fight
against her rivals, Spain and France. In return Great Britain has
received commercial privileges, preferential conditions for importing
goods and especially capital into Portugal and the Portuguese colonies,
the right to use the ports and islands of Portugal, her telegraph
cables, etc., etc.^(⁸⁷) Relations of this kind have always existed
between big and little states, but in the epoch of capitalist
imperialism they become a general system, they form part of the sum
total of “divide the world” relations and become links in the chain of
operations of world finance capital.

 

In order to finish with the question of the division of the world, I
must make the following additional observation. This question was raised
quite openly and definitely not only in American literature after the
Spanish-American War, and in English literature after the Anglo-Boer
War, at the very end of the nineteenth century and the beginning of the
twentieth; not only has German literature, which has “most jealously”
watched “British imperialism”, systematically given its appraisal of
this fact. This question has also been raised in French bourgeois
literature as definitely and broadly as is thinkable from the bourgeois
point of view. Let me quote Driault, the historian, who, in his
book, _Political and Social Problems at the End of the Nineteenth
Century_, in the chapter “The Great Powers and the Division of the
World”, wrote the following: “During the past few years, all the free
territory of the globe, with the exception of China, has been occupied
by the powers of Europe and North America. This has already brought
about several conflicts and shifts of spheres of influence, and these
foreshadow more terrible upheavals in the near future. For it is
necessary to make haste. The nations which have not yet made provision
for themselves run the risk of never receiving their share and never
participating in the tremendous exploitation of the globe which will be
one of the most essential features of the next century (i.e., the
twentieth). That is why all Europe and America have lately been
afflicted with the fever of colonial expansion, of ‘imperialism’, that
most noteworthy feature of the end of the nineteenth century.” And the
author added: “In this partition of the world, in this furious hunt for
the treasures and the big markets of the globe, the relative strength of
the empires founded in this nineteenth century is totally out of
proportion to the place occupied in Europe by the nations which founded
them. The dominant powers in Europe, the arbiters of her destiny,
are _not _equally preponderant in the whole world. And, as colonial
might, the hope of controlling as yet unassessed wealth, will evidently
react upon the relative strength of the European powers, the colonial
question—“imperialism”, if you will—which has already modified the
political conditions of Europe itself, will modify them more and
more.”^(⁸⁸)

 



VII. IMPERIALISM AS A SPECIAL STAGE OF CAPITALISM


 

We must now try to sum up, to draw together the threads of what has been
said above on the subject of imperialism. Imperialism emerged as the
development and direct continuation of the fundamental characteristics
of capitalism in general. But capitalism only became capitalist
imperialism at a definite and very high stage of its development, when
certain of its fundamental characteristics began to change into their
opposites, when the features of the epoch of transition from capitalism
to a higher social and economic system had taken shape and revealed
themselves in all spheres. Economically, the main thing in this process
is the displacement of capitalist free competition by capitalist
monopoly. Free competition is the basic feature of capitalism, and of
commodity production generally; monopoly is the exact opposite of free
competition, but we have seen the latter being transformed into monopoly
before our eyes, creating large-scale industry and forcing out small
industry, replacing large-scale by still larger-scale industry, and
carrying concentration of production and capital to the point where out
of it has grown and is growing monopoly: cartels, syndicates and trusts,
and merging with them, the capital of a dozen or so banks, which
manipulate thousands of millions. At the same time the monopolies, which
have grown out of free competition, do not eliminate the latter, but
exist above it and alongside it, and thereby give rise to a number of
very acute, intense antagonisms, frictions and conflicts. Monopoly is
the transition from capitalism to a higher system.

 

If it were necessary to give the briefest possible definition of
imperialism we should have to say that imperialism is the monopoly stage
of capitalism. Such a definition would include what is most important,
for, on the one hand, finance capital is the bank capital of a few very
big monopolist banks, merged with the capital of the monopolist
associations of industrialists; and, on the other hand, the division of
the world is the transition from a colonial policy which has extended
without hindrance to territories unseized by any capitalist power, to a
colonial policy of monopolist possession of the territory of the world,
which has been completely divided up.

 

But very brief definitions, although convenient, for they sum up the
main points, are nevertheless inadequate, since we have to deduce from
them some especially important features of the phenomenon that has to be
defined. And so, without forgetting the conditional and relative value
of all definitions in general, which can never embrace all the
concatenations of a phenomenon in its full development, we must give a
definition of imperialism that will include the following five of its
basic features:

 

(1) the concentration of production and capital has developed to such a
high stage that it has created monopolies which play a decisive role in
economic life; (2) the merging of bank capital with industrial capital,
and the creation, on the basis of this “finance capital”, of a financial
oligarchy; (3) the export of capital as distinguished from the export of
commodities acquires exceptional importance; (4) the formation of
international monopolist capitalist associations which share the world
among themselves, and (5) the territorial division of the whole world
among the biggest capitalist powers is completed. Imperialism is
capitalism at that stage of development at which the dominance of
monopolies and finance capital is established; in which the export of
capital has acquired pronounced importance; in which the division of the
world among the international trusts has begun, in which the division of
all territories of the globe among the biggest capitalist powers has
been completed.

 

We shall see later that imperialism can and must be defined differently
if we bear in mind not only the basic, purely economic concepts—to which
the above definition is limited—but also the historical place of this
stage of capitalism in relation to capitalism in general, or the
relation between imperialism and the two main trends in the
working-class movement. The thing to be noted at this point is that
imperialism, as interpreted above, undoubtedly represents a special
stage in the development of capitalism. To enable the reader to obtain
the most well-grounded idea of imperialism, I deliberately tried to
quote as extensively as possible _bourgeois _economists who have to
admit the particularly incontrovertible facts concerning the latest
stage of capitalist economy. With the same object in view, I have quoted
detailed statistics which enable one to see to what degree bank capital,
etc., has grown, in what precisely the transformation of quantity into
quality, of developed capitalism into imperialism, was expressed.
Needless to say, of course, all boundaries in nature and in society are
conventional and changeable, and it would be absurd to argue, for
example, about the particular year or decade in which imperialism
“definitely” became established.

 

In the matter of defining imperialism, however, we have to enter into
controversy, primarily, with Karl Kautsky, the principal Marxist
theoretician of the epoch of the so-called Second International—that is,
of the twenty-five years between 1889 and 1914. The fundamental ideas
expressed in our definition of imperialism were very resolutely attacked
by Kautsky in 1915, and even in November 1914, when he said that
imperialism must not be regarded as a “phase” or stage of economy, but
as a policy, a definite policy “preferred” by finance capital; that
imperialism must not be “identified” with “present-day capitalism”; that
if imperialism is to be understood to mean “all the phenomena of
present-day capitalism”—cartels, protection, the domination of the
financiers, and colonial policy—then the question as to whether
imperialism is necessary to capitalism becomes reduced to the “flattest
tautology”, because, in that case, “imperialism is naturally a vital
necessity for capitalism”, and so on. The best way to present Kautsky’s
idea is to quote his own definition of imperialism, which is
diametrically opposed to the substance of the ideas which I have set
forth (for the objections coming from the camp of the German Marxists,
who have been advocating similar ideas for many years already, have been
long known to Kautsky as the objections of a definite trend in Marxism).

 

Kautsky’s definition is as follows:

 

“Imperialism is a product of highly developed industrial capitalism. It
consists in the striving of every industrial capitalist nation to bring
under its control or to annex all large areas of _agrarian_ [Kautsky’s
italics] territory, irrespective of what nations inhabit it.”^(⁸⁹)

 

This definition is of no use at all because it one-sidedly, i.e.,
arbitrarily, singles out only the national question (although the latter
is extremely important in itself as well as in its relation to
imperialism), it arbitrarily and _inaccurately _connects this
question _only _with industrial capital in the countries which annex
other nations, and in an equally arbitrary and inaccurate manner pushes
into the forefront the annexation of agrarian regions.

 

Imperialism is a striving for annexations—this is what
the _political _part of Kautsky’s definition amounts to. It is correct,
but very incomplete, for politically, imperialism is, in general, a
striving towards violence and reaction. For the moment, however, we are
interested in the _economic _aspect of the question, which
Kautsky _himself _introduced into his definition. The inaccuracies in
Kautsky’s definition are glaring. The characteristic feature of
imperialism is not industrial _but _finance capital. It is not an
accident that in France it was precisely the extraordinarily rapid
development of _finance _capital, and the weakening of industrial
capital, that from the eighties onwards gave rise to the extreme
intensification of annexationist (colonial) policy. The characteristic
feature of imperialism is precisely that it strives to annex _not
only_ agrarian territories, but even most highly industrialised regions
(German appetite for Belgium; French appetite for Lorraine), because (1)
the fact that the world is already partitioned obliges those
contemplating a _redivision _to reach out for _every kind_ of territory,
and (2) an essential feature of imperialism is the rivalry between
several great powers in the striving for hegemony, i.e., for the
conquest of territory, not so much directly for themselves as to weaken
the adversary and undermine _his _hegemony. (Belgium is particularly
important for Germany as a base for operations against Britain; Britain
needs Baghdad as a base for operations against Germany, etc.)

 

Kautsky refers especially—and repeatedly—to English writers who, lie
alleges, have given a purely political meaning to the word “imperialism”
in the sense that he, Kautsky, understands it. We take up the work by
the English writer Hobson, _Imperialism_, which appeared in 1902, and
there we read:

 

“The new imperialism differs from the older, first, in substituting for
the ambition of a single growing empire the theory and the practice of
competing empires, each motivated by similar lusts of political
aggrandisement and commercial gain; secondly, in the dominance of
financial or investing over mercantile interests.”^(⁹⁰)

 

We see that Kautsky is absolutely wrong in referring to English writers
generally (unless lie meant the vulgar English imperialists, or the
avowed apologists for imperialism). We see that Kautsky, while claiming
that he continues to advocate Marxism, as a matter of fact takes a step
backward compared with the _social-liberal_ Hobson, who _more
correctly_ takes into account two “historically concrete” (Kautsky’s
definition is a mockery of historical concreteness!) features of modern
imperialism: (1) the competition between _several _imperialisms, and (2)
the predominance of the financier over the merchant. If it is chiefly a
question of the annexation of agrarian countries by industrial
countries, then the role of the merchant is put in the forefront.

 

Kautsky’s definition is not only wrong and un-Marxist. It serves as a
basis for a whole system of views which signify a rupture with Marxist
theory and Marxist practice all along the line. I shall refer to this
later. The argument about words which Kautsky raises as to whether the
latest stage of capitalism should be called imperialism or the stage of
finance capital is not worth serious attention. Call it what you will,
it makes no difference. The essence of the matter is that Kautsky
detaches the politics of imperialism from its economics, speaks of
annexations as being a policy “preferred” by finance capital, and
opposes to it another bourgeois policy which, he alleges, is possible on
this very same basis of finance capital. It follows, then, that
monopolies in the economy are compatible with non-monopolistic,
non-violent, non-annexationist methods in politics. It follows, then,
that the territorial division of the world, which was completed during
this very epoch of finance capital, and which constitutes the basis of
the present peculiar forms of rivalry between the biggest capitalist
states, is compatible with a non-imperialist policy. The result is a
slurring-over and a blunting of the most profound contradictions of the
latest stage of capitalism, instead of an exposure of their depth; the
result is bourgeois reformism instead of Marxism.

 

Kautsky enters into controversy with the German apologist of imperialism
and annexations, Cunow, who clumsily and cynically argues that
imperialism is present-day capitalism; the development of capitalism is
inevitable and progressive; therefore imperialism is progressive;
therefore, we should grovel before it and glorify it! This is something
like the caricature of the Russian Marxists which the Narodniks drew in
1894-95. They argued: if the Marxists believe that capitalism is
inevitable in Russia, that it is progressive, then they ought to open a
tavern and begin to implant capitalism! Kautsky’s reply to Cunow is as
follows: imperialism is not present-day capitalism; it is only one of
the forms of the policy of present-day capitalism. This policy we can
and should fight, fight imperialism, annexations, etc.

The reply seems quite plausible, but in effect it is a more subtle and
more disguised (and therefore more dangerous) advocacy of conciliation
with imperialism, because a “fight” against the policy of the trusts and
banks that does not affect the economic basis of the trusts and banks is
mere bourgeois reformism and pacifism, the benevolent and innocent
expression of pious wishes. Evasion of existing contradictions,
forgetting the most important of them, instead of revealing their full
depth—such is Kautsky’s theory, which has nothing in common with
Marxism. Naturally, such a “theory” can only serve the purpose of
advocating unity with the Cunows!

 

“From the purely economic point of view,” writes Kautsky, “it is not
impossible that capitalism will yet go through a new phase, that of the
extension of the policy of the cartels to foreign policy, the phase of
ultra-imperialism,” ^(⁹¹) i.e., of a superimperialism, of a union of the
imperialisms of the whole world and not struggles among them, a phase
when wars shall cease under capitalism, a phase of “the joint
exploitation of the world by internationally united finance
capital”.^(⁹²)

 

We shall have to deal with this “theory of ultra-imperialism” later on
in order to show in detail how decisively and completely it breaks with
Marxism. At present, in keeping with the general plan of the present
work, we must examine the exact economic data on this question. “From
the purely economic point of view”, is “ultra-imperialism” possible, or
is it ultra-nonsense?

 

If the purely economic point of view is meant to be a “pure”
abstraction, then all that can be said reduces itself to the following
proposition: development is proceeding towards monopolies, hence,
towards a single world monopoly, towards a single world trust. This is
indisputable, but it is also as completely meaningless as is the
statement that “development is proceeding” towards the manufacture of
foodstuffs in laboratories. In this sense the “theory” of
ultra-imperialism is no less absurd than a “theory of ultra-agriculture”
would be.

 

If, however, we are discussing the “purely economic” conditions of the
epoch of finance capital as a historically concrete epoch which began at
the turn of the twentieth century, then the best reply that one can make
to the lifeless abstractions of “ultraimperialism” (which serve
exclusively a most reactionary aim: that of diverting attention from the
depth of _existing _antagonisms) is to contrast them with the concrete
economic realities of the present-day world economy. Kautsky’s utterly
meaningless talk about ultra-imperialism encourages, among other things,
that profoundly mistaken idea which only brings grist to the mill of the
apologists of imperialism, i.e., that the rule of finance
capital _lessens _the unevenness and contradictions inherent in the
world economy, whereas in reality it increases them.

 

R. Calwer, in his little book, _An Introduction to the World
Economy_,^(⁹³) made an attempt to summarise the main, purely economic,
data that enable one to obtain a concrete picture of the internal
relations of the world economy at the turn of the twentieth century. He
divides the world into five “main economic areas”, as follows: (1)
Central Europe (the whole of Europe with the exception of Russia and
Great Britain); (2) Great Britain; (3) Russia; (4) Eastern Asia; (5)
America; he includes the colonies in the “areas” of the states to which
they belong and “leaves aside” a few countries not distributed according
to areas, such as Persia, Afghanistan, and Arabia in Asia, Morocco and
Abyssinia in Africa, etc.

 

Here is a brief summary of the economic data he quotes on these regions.

 

Principal
economic
areas

Area

Pop.

Transport

Trade

Industry

Million sq.
miles

Millions

Railways
(thou. km)

Mercantile
fleet (mill-
ions tons)

Imports,
exports
(thous-million
marks)

Output

 

Of coal (mill.
tons)

Of pig iron
(mill. tons)

Number
of cotton
spindles
(millions)

1) Central
Europe

27.6
(23.6)

388
(146)

204

8

41

251

15

26

2) Britain

28.9
(28.6)

398
(355)

140

11

25

249

9

51

3) Russia

22

131

63

1

3

16

3

7

4) Eastern Asia

12

389

8

1

2

8

0.02

2

5) America

30

148

379

6

14

245

14

19

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

NOTE: The figures in parentheses show the area and population of the
colonies.

 

We see three areas of highly developed capitalism (high development of
means of transport, of trade and of industry): the Central European, the
British and the American areas. Among these are three states which
dominate the world: Germany, Great Britain, and the United States.
Imperialist rivalry and the struggle between these countries have become
extremely keen because Germany has only an insignificant area and few
colonies; the creation of “Central Europe” is still a matter for the
future, it is being born in the midst of a desperate struggle. For the
moment the distinctive feature of the whole of Europe is political
disunity. In the British and American areas, on the other hand,
political concentration is very highly developed, but there is a vast
disparity between the immense colonies of the one and the insignificant
colonies of the other. In the colonies, however, capitalism is only
beginning to develop. The struggle for South America is becoming more
and more acute.

 

There are two areas where capitalism is little developed: Russia and
Eastern Asia. In the former, the population is extremely sparse, in the
latter it is extremely dense; in the former political concentration is
high, in the latter it does not exist. The partitioning of China is only
just beginning, and the struggle for it between Japan, the U.S., etc.,
is continually gaining in intensity.

 

Compare this reality—the vast diversity of economic and political
conditions, the extreme disparity in the rate of development of the
various countries, etc., and the violent struggles among the imperialist
states—with Kautsky’s silly little fable about “peaceful”
ultra-imperialism. Is this not the reactionary attempt of a frightened
philistine to hide from stern reality? Are not the international cartels
which Kautsky imagines are the embryos of “ultra-imperialism” (in the
same way as one “can” describe the manufacture of tablets in a
laboratory as ultra-agriculture in embryo) an example of the
division _and the redivision_ of the world, the transition from peaceful
division to non-peaceful division and vice versa? Is not American and
other finance capital, which divided the whole world peacefully with
Germany’s participation in, for example, the international rail
syndicate, or in the international mercantile shipping trust, now
engaged in _redividing _the world on the basis of a new relation of
forces that is being changed by methods_ anything but_ peaceful?

 

Finance capital and the trusts do not diminish but increase the
differences in the rate of growth of the various parts of the world
economy. Once the relation of forces is changed, what other solution of
the contradictions can be found _under capitalism_ than that of _force_?
Railway statistics^(⁹⁴) provide remarkably exact data on the different
rates of growth of capitalism and finance capital in world economy. In
the last decades of imperialist development, the total length of
railways has changed as follows:

 

 

Railways (000 kilometers)

1890

1913

+

Europe

224

 

346

 

+122

 

U.S.

268

411

+143

All colonies

82

125

210

347

+128

+222

Independent and semi-independent 
states of Asia and America

43

137

+94

Total

617

 

1,104

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

 

Thus, the development of railways has been most rapid in the colonies
and in the independent (and semi-independent) states of Asia and
America. Here, as we know, the finance capital of the four or five
biggest capitalist states holds undisputed sway. Two hundred thousand
kilometres of new railways in the colonies and in the other countries of
Asia and America represent a capital of more than 40,000 million marks
newly invested on particularly advantageous terms, with special
guarantees of a good return and with profitable orders for steel works,
etc., etc.

 

Capitalism is growing with the greatest rapidity in the colonies and in
overseas countries. Among the latter, new imperialist powers are
emerging (e.g., Japan). The struggle among the world imperialisms is
becoming more acute. The tribute levied by finance capital on the most
profitable colonial and overseas enterprises is increasing. In the
division of this “booty”, an exceptionally large part goes to countries
which do not always stand at the top of the list in the rapidity of the
development of their productive forces. In the case of the biggest
countries, together with their colonies, the total length of railways
was as follows:

 

 

(000 kilometres)

1890

1913

 

U.S.

268

413

+145

British Empire

107

208

+101

Russia

32

78

+46

Germany

43

68

+25

France

41

63

+22

Total

491

830

+339

 

 

Thus, about 80 per cent of the total existing railways are concentrated
in the hands of the five biggest powers. But the concentration of
the _ownership _of these railways, the concentration of finance capital,
is immeasurably greater since the French and British millionaires, for
example, own an enormous amount of shares and bonds in American, Russian
and other railways.

 

Thanks to her colonies, Great Britain has increased the length of “her”
railways by 100,000 kilometres, four times as much as Germany. And yet,
it is well known that the development of productive forces in Germany,
and especially the development of the coal and iron industries, has been
incomparably more rapid during this period than in Britain—not to speak
of France and Russia. In 1892, Germany produced 4,900,000 tons of
pig-iron and Great Britain produced 6,800,000 tons; in 1912, Germany
produced 17,600,000 tons and Great Britain, 9,000,000 tons. Germany,
therefore, had an overwhelming superiority over Britain in this
respect.^(⁹⁵) The question is: what means other than war could there
be _under capitalism_ to overcome the disparity between the development
of productive forces and the accumulation of capital on the one side,
and the division of colonies and spheres of influence for finance
capital on the other?

 



VIII. PARASITISM AND DECAY OF CAPITALISM


 

We now have to examine yet another significant aspect of imperialism to
which most of the discussions on the subject usually attach insufficient
importance. One of the shortcomings of the Marxist Hilferding is that on
this point he has taken a step backward compared with the non-Marxist
Hobson. I refer to parasitism, which is characteristic of imperialism.

 

As we have seen, the deepest economic foundation of imperialism is
monopoly. This is capitalist monopoly, i.e., monopoly which has grown
out of capitalism and which exists in the general environment of
capitalism, commodity production and competition, in permanent and
insoluble contradiction to this general environment. Nevertheless, like
all monopoly, it inevitably engenders a tendency of stagnation and
decay. Since monopoly prices are established, even temporarily, the
motive cause of technical and, consequently, of all other progress
disappears to a certain extent and, further, the economic possibility
arises of deliberately retarding technical progress. For instance, in
America, a certain Owens invented a machine which revolutionised the
manufacture of bottles. The German bottle-manufacturing cartel purchased
Owens’s patent, but pigeon-holed it, refrained from utilising it.
Certainly, monopoly under capitalism can never completely, and for a
very long period of time, eliminate competition in the world market (and
this, by the by, is one of the reasons why the theory of
ultra-imperialism is so absurd). Certainly, the possibility of reducing
the cost of production and increasing profits by introducing technical
improvements operates in the direction of change. But the tendency to
stagnation and decay, which is characteristic of monopoly, continues to
operate, and in some branches of industry, in some countries, for
certain periods of time, it gains the upper hand.

 

The monopoly ownership of very extensive, rich or wellsituated colonies
operates in the same direction.

 

Further, imperialism is an immense accumulation of money capital in a
few countries, amounting, as we have seen, to 100,000-50,000 million
francs in securities. Hence the extraordinary growth of a class, or
rather, of a stratum of rentiers, i.e., people who live by “clipping
coupons”, who take no part in any enterprise whatever, whose profession
is idleness. The export of capital, one of the most essential economic
bases of imperialism, still more completely isolates the rentiers from
production and sets the seal of parasitism on the whole country that
lives by exploiting the labour of several overseas countries and
colonies.

 

“In 1893,” writes Hobson, “the British capital invested abroad
represented about 15 per cent of the total wealth of the United
Kingdom.”^(⁹⁶) Let me remind the reader that by 1915 this capital had
increased about two and a half times. “Aggressive imperialism,” says
Hobson further on, “which costs the tax-payer so dear, which is of so
little value to the manufacturer and trader ... is a source of great
gain to the investor.... The annual income Great Britain derives from
commissions in her whole foreign and colonial trade, import and export,
is estimated by Sir R.Giffen at £18,000,000 (nearly 170 million rubles]
for 1899, taken at 2 1/2 per cent, upon a turnover of £800,000,000.”
Great as this sum is, it cannot explain the aggressive imperialism of
Great Britain, which is explained by the income of £90 million to £100
million from “invested” capital, the income of the rentiers.

 

The income of the rentiers is five _times _greater than the income
obtained from the foreign trade of the biggest “trading” country in the
world! This is the essence of imperialism and imperialist parasitism.

 

For that reason the term “rentier state” (Rentnerstaat), or usurer
state, is coming into common use in the economic literature that deals
with imperialism. The world has become divided into a handful of usurer
states and a vast majority of debtor states. “At the top of the list of
foreign investments,” says Schulze-Gaevernitz, “are those placed in
politically dependent or allied countries: Great Britain grants loans to
Egypt, Japan, China and South America. Her navy plays here the part of
bailiff in case of necessity. Great Britain’s political power protects
her from the indignation of her debtors.”^(⁹⁷) Sartorius von
Waltershausen in his book, _The National Economic System of Capital
Investments Abroad, _cites Holland as the model “rentier state” and
points out that Great Britain and France are now becoming
such.^(⁹⁸) Schilder is of the opinion that five industrial states have
become “definitely pronounced creditor countries”: Great Britain,
France, Germany, Belgium and Switzerland. He does not include Holland in
this list simply because she is “industrially little
developed”. ^(⁹⁹) The United States is a creditor only of the American
countries.

 

“Great Britain,” says Schulze-Gaevernitz, “is gradually becoming
transformed from an industrial into a creditor state. Notwithstanding
the absolute increase in industrial output and the export of
manufactured goods, there is an increase in the relative importance of
income from interest and dividends, issues of securities, commissions
and speculation in the whole of the national economy. In my opinion it
is precisely this that forms the economic basis of imperialist
ascendancy. The creditor is more firmly attached to the debtor than the
seller is to the buyer.^(¹⁰⁰) In regard to Germany, A. Lansburgh, the
publisher of the Berlin _Die Bank, _in 1911, in an article entitled
“Germany—a Rentier State”, wrote the following: “People in Germany are
ready to sneer at the yearning to become rentiers that is observed in
France. But they forget that as far as the bourgeoisie is concerned the
situation in Germany is becoming more and more like that in
France.”^(¹⁰¹)

 

The rentier state is a state of parasitic, decaying capitalism, and this
circumstance cannot fail to influence all the socio-political conditions
of the countries concerned, in general, and the two fundamental trends
in the working-class movement, in particular. To demonstrate this in the
clearest possible manner let me quote Hobson, who is a most reliable
witness, since he cannot be suspected of leaning towards Marxist
orthodoxy; on the other hand, he is an Englishman who is very well
acquainted with the situation in the country which is richest in
colonies, in finance capital, and in imperialist experience.

 

With the Anglo-Boer War fresh in his mind, Hobson describes the
connection between imperialism and the interests of the “financiers”,
their growing profits from contracts, supplies, etc., and writes: “While
the directors of this definitely parasitic policy are capitalists, the
same motives appeal to special classes of the workers. In many towns
most important trades are dependent upon government employment or
contracts; the imperialism of the metal and shipbuilding centres is
attributable in no small degree to this fact.” Two sets of
circumstances, in this writer’s opinion, have weakened the old empires:
(1) “economic parasitism”, and (2) the formation of armies recruited
from subject peoples. “There is first the habit of economic parasitism,
by which the ruling state has used its provinces, colonies, and
dependencies in order to enrich its ruling class and to bribe its lower
classes into acquiescence.” And I shall add that the economic
possibility of such bribery, whatever its form may be, requires high
monopolist profits.

 

As for the second circumstance, Hobson writes: “One of the strangest
symptoms of the blindness of imperialism is the reckless indifference
with which Great Britain, France and other imperial nations are
embarking on this perilous dependence. Great Britain has gone farthest.
Most of the fighting by which we have won our Indian Empire has been
done by natives; in India, as more recently in Egypt, great standing
armies are placed under British commanders; almost all the fighting
associated with our African dominions, except in the southern part, has
been done for us by natives.”

 

Hobson gives the following economic appraisal of the prospect of the
partitioning of China: “The greater part of Western Europe might then
assume the appearance and character already exhibited by tracts of
country in the South of England, in the Riviera and in the
tourist-ridden or residential parts of Italy and Switzerland, little
clusters of wealthy aristocrats drawing dividends and pensions from the
Far East, with a somewhat larger group of professional retainers and
tradesmen and a larger body of personal servants and workers in the
transport trade and in the final stages of production of the more
perishable goods; all the main arterial industries would have
disappeared, the staple foods and manufactures flowing in as tribute
from Asia and Africa. . . . We have foreshadowed the possibility of even
a larger alliance of Western states, a European federation of great
powers which, so far from forwarding the cause of world civilisation,
might introduce the gigantic peril of a Western parasitism, a group of
advanced industrial nations, whose upper classes drew vast tribute from
Asia and Africa, with which they supported great tame masses of
retainers, no longer engaged in the staple industries of agriculture and
manufacture, but kept in the performance of personal or minor industrial
services under the control of a new financial aristocracy. Let those who
would scout such a theory (it would be better to say: prospect) as
undeserving of consideration examine the economic and social condition
of districts in Southern England today which are already reduced to this
condition, and reflect upon the vast extension of such a system which
might be rendered feasible by the subjection of China to the economic
control of similar groups of financiers, investors, and political and
business officials, draining the greatest potential reservoir of profit
the world has ever known, in order to consume it in Europe. The
situation is far too complex, the play of world forces far too
incalculable, to render this or any other single interpretation of the
future very probable; but the influences which govern the imperialism of
Western Europe today are moving in this direction, and, unless
counteracted or diverted, make towards some such consummation.”^(¹⁰²)

 

The author is quite right: if the forces of imperialism had not been
counteracted they would have led precisely to what he has described. The
significance of a “United States of Europe” in the present imperialist
situation is correctly appraised. He should have added, however, that,
also _within _the working-class movement, the opportunists, who are for
the moment victorious in most countries, are “working” systematically
and undeviatingly in this very direction. Imperialism, which means the
partitioning of the world, and the exploitation of other countries
besides China, which means high monopoly profits for a handful of very
rich countries, makes it economically possible to bribe the upper strata
of the proletariat, and thereby fosters, gives shape to, and strengthens
opportunism. We must not, however, lose sight of the forces which
counteract imperialism in general, and opportunism in particular, and
which, naturally, the social-liberal Hobson is unable to perceive.

The German opportunist, Gerhard Hildebrand, who was once expelled from
the Party for defending imperialism, and who could today be a leader of
the so-called “Social-Democratic” Party of Germany, supplements Hobson
well by his advocacy of a “United States of Western Europe” (without
Russia) for the purpose of “joint” action ... against the African
Negroes, against the “great Islamic movement”, for the maintenance of a
“powerful army and navy”, against a “Sino-Japanese
coalition”,^(¹⁰³) etc.

 

The description of “British imperialism” in Schulze-Gaevernitz’s book
reveals the same parasitical traits. The national income of Great
Britain approximately doubled from 1865 to 1898, while the income “from
abroad” increased _ninefold _in the same period. While the “merit” of
imperialism is that it “trains the Negro to habits of industry” (you
cannot manage without coercion ... ), the “danger” of imperialism lies
in that “Europe will shift the burden of physical toil—first
agricultural and mining, then the rougher work in industry—on to the
coloured races, and itself be content with the role of rentier, and in
this way, perhaps, pave the way for the economic, and later, the
political emancipation of the coloured races”.

 

An increasing proportion of land in England is being taken out of
cultivation and used for sport, for the diversion of the rich. As far as
Scotland—the most aristocratic place for hunting and other sports—is
concerned, it is said that “it lives on its past and on Mr. Carnegie”
(the American multimillionaire). On horse racing and fox hunting alone
England annually spends £14,000,000 (nearly 130 million rubles). The
number of rentiers in England is about one million. The percentage of
the productively employed population to the total population is
declining:

 

+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
|                 | Population      | Workers in      | Per cent of     |
|                 | England and     | basic           | total popula-   |
|                 | Wales (000,000) | industries      | tion            |
|                 |                 | (000,000)       |                 |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| 1851.....       | 17.9            | 4.1             | 23              |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+
| 1901.....       | 32.5            | 4.9             | 15              |
+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+-----------------+

 

And in speaking of the British working class the bourgeois student of
“British imperialism at the beginning of the twentieth century” is
obliged to distinguish systematically between the “_upper stratum_” of
the workers and the “_lower stratum of the proletariat proper_”. The
upper stratum furnishes the bulk of the membership of co-operatives, of
trade unions, of sporting clubs and of numerous religious sects. To this
level is adapted the electoral system, which in Great Britain is still
“_sufficiently restricted to exclude the lower stratum of the
proletariat proper_"! In order to present the condition of the British
working class in a rosy light, only this upper stratum—which constitutes
a _minority of _the proletariat—is usually spoken of. For instance, “the
problem of unemployment is mainly a London problem and that of the lower
proletarian stratum, _to which the politicians attach little
importance_...” ^(¹⁰⁴) He should have said: to which the bourgeois
politicians and the “socialist” opportunists attach little importance.

 

One of the special features of imperialism connected with the facts I am
describing, is the decline in emigration from imperialist countries and
the increase in immigration into these countries from the more backward
countries where lower wages are paid. As Hobson observes, emigration
from Great Britain has been declining since 1884. In that year the
number of emigrants was 242,000, while in 1900, the number was 169,000.
Emigration from Germany reached the highest point between 1881 and 1890,
with a total of 1,453,000 emigrants. In the course of the following two
decades, it fell to 544,000 and to 341,000. On the other hand, there was
an increase in the number of workers entering Germany from Austria,
Italy, Russia and other countries. According to the 1907 census, there
were 1,342,294 foreigners in Germany, of whom 440,800 were industrial
workers and 257,329 agricultural workers. ^(¹⁰⁵) In France, the workers
employed in the mining industry are, “in great part”, foreigners: Poles,
Italians and Spaniards.^(¹⁰⁶) In the United States, immigrants from
Eastern and Southern Europe are engaged in the most poorly paid jobs,
while American workers provide the highest percentage of overseers or of
the better-paid workers. ^(¹⁰⁷) Imperialism has the tendency to create
privileged sections also among the workers, and to detach them from the
broad masses of the proletariat.

 

It must be observed that in Great Britain the tendency of imperialism to
split the workers, to strengthen opportunism among them and to cause
temporary decay in the working-class movement, revealed itself much
earlier than the end of the nineteenth and the beginning of the
twentieth centuries; for two important distinguishing features of
imperialism were already observed in Great Britain in the middle of the
nineteenth century—vast colonial possessions and a monopolist position
in the world market. Marx and Engels traced this connection between
opportunism in the working-class movement and the imperialist features
of British capitalism systematically, during the course of several
decades. For example, on October 7, 1858, Engels wrote to Marx: “The
English proletariat is actually becoming more and more bourgeois, so
that this most bourgeois of all nations is apparently aiming ultimately
at the possession of a bourgeois aristocracy and a bourgeois
proletariat _alongside_ the bourgeoisie. For a nation which exploits the
whole world this is of course to a certain extent
justifiable.”^([15]) Almost a quarter of a century later, in a letter
dated August 11, 1881, Engels speaks of the “worst English trade unions
which allow themselves to be led by men sold to, or at least paid by,
the middle class”. In a letter to Kautsky, dated September 12, 1882,
Engels wrote: “You ask me what the English workers think about colonial
policy. Well, exactly the same as they think about politics in general.
There is no workers’ party here, there are only Conservatives and
Liberal-Radicals, and the workers gaily share the feast of England’s
monopoly of the world market and the colonies.”^(¹⁰⁸) (Engels expressed
similar ideas in the press in his preface to the second edition of _The
Condition of the Working Class in England, _which appeared in 1892.)

 

This clearly shows the causes and effects. The causes are: (1)
exploitation of the whole world by this country; (2) its monopolist
position in the world market; (3) its colonial monopoly. The effects
are: (1) a section of the British proletariat becomes bourgeois; (2) a
section of the proletariat allows itself to be led by men bought by, or
at least paid by, the bourgeoisie. The imperialism of the beginning of
the twentieth century completed the division of the world among a
handful of states, each of which today exploits (in the sense of drawing
superprofits from) a part of the “whole world” only a little smaller
than that which England exploited in 1858; each of them occupies a
monopolist position in the world market thanks to trusts, cartels,
finance capital and creditor and debtor relations; each of them enjoys
to some degree a colonial monopoly (we have seen that out of the total
of _75,000,000 _sq. km., which comprise the _whole _colonial
world,_65,000,000 _sq. km., or 86 per cent, belong to six
powers; _61,000,000 _sq. km., or 81 per cent, belong to three powers).

 

The distinctive feature of the present situation is the prevalence of
such economic and political conditions that are bound to increase the
irreconcilability between opportunism and the general and vital
interests of the working-class movement: imperialism has grown from an
embryo into the predominant system; capitalist monopolies occupy first
place in economics and politics; the division of the world has been
completed; on the other hand, instead of the undivided monopoly of Great
Britain, we see a few imperialist powers contending for the right to
share in this monopoly, and this struggle is characteristic of the whole
period of the early twentieth century. Opportunism cannot now be
completely triumphant in the working-class movement of one country for
decades as it was in Britain in the second half of the nineteenth
century; but in a number of countries it has grown ripe, overripe, and
rotten, and has become completely merged with bourgeois policy in the
form of “social-chauvinism”.^(¹⁰⁹)

 



IX. CRITIQUE OF IMPERIALISM


 

By the critique of imperialism, in the broad sense of the term, we mean
the attitude of the different classes of society towards imperialist
policy in connection with their general ideology.

 

The enormous dimensions of finance capital concentrated in a few hands
and creating an extraordinarily dense and widespread network of
relationships and connections which subordinates not only the small and
medium, but also the very small capitalists and small masters, on the
one hand, and the increasingly intense struggle waged against other
national state groups of financiers for the division of the world and
domination over other countries, on the other hand, cause the propertied
classes to go over entirely to the side of imperialism. “General”
enthusiasm over the prospects of imperialism, furious defence of it and
painting it in the brightest colours—such are the signs of the times.
Imperialist ideology also penetrates the working class. No Chinese Wall
separates it from the other classes. The leaders of the present-day,
so-called, “Social-Democratic” Party of Germany are justly called
“social-imperialists”, that is, socialists in words and imperialists in
deeds; but as early as 1902, Hobson noted the existence in Britain of
“Fabian imperialists” who belonged to the opportunist Fabian Society.

 

Bourgeois scholars and publicists usually come out in defence of
imperialism in a somewhat veiled form; they obscure its complete,
domination and its deep-going roots, strive to push specific and
secondary details into the forefront and do their very best to distract
attention from essentials by means of absolutely ridiculous schemes for
“reform”, such as police supervision of the trusts or banks, etc.
Cynical and frank imperialists who are bold enough to admit the
absurdity of the idea of reforming the fundamental characteristics of
imperialism are a rarer phenomenon.

 

Here is an example. The German imperialists attempt, in the
magazine _Archives of World Economy_, to follow the national
emancipation movements in the colonies, particularly, of course, in
colonies other than those belonging to Germany. They note the unrest and
the protest movements in India, the movement in Natal (South Africa), in
the Dutch East Indies, etc. One of them, commenting on an English report
of a conference held on June 28-30, 1910, of representatives of various
subject nations and races, of peoples of Asia, Africa and Europe who are
under foreign rule, writes as follows in appraising the speeches
delivered at this conference: “We are told that we must fight
imperialism; that the ruling states should recognise the right of
subject peoples to independence; that an international tribunal should
supervise the fulfilment of treaties concluded between the great powers
and weak peoples. Further than the expression of these pious wishes they
do not go. We see no trace of understanding of the fact that imperialism
is inseparably bound up with capitalism in its present form and that,
therefore [!!], an open struggle against imperialism would be hopeless,
unless, perhaps, the fight were to be confined to protests against
certain of its especially abhorrent excesses.”^(¹¹⁰) Since the reform of
the basis of imperialism is a deception, a “pious wish”, since the
bourgeois representatives of the oppressed nations go no “further”
forward, the bourgeois representative of an oppressing nation goes
“further” _backward_, to servility towards imperialism under cover of
the claim to be “scientific”. That is also “logic”!

 

The questions as to whether it is possible to reform the basis of
imperialism, whether to go forward to the further intensification and
deepening of the antagonisms which it engenders, or backward, towards
allaying these antagonisms, are fundamental questions in the critique of
imperialism. Since the specific political features of imperialism are
reaction everywhere and increased national oppression due to the
oppression of the financial oligarchy and the elimination of free
competition, a petty-bourgeois-democratic opposition to imperialism
arose at the beginning of the twentieth century in nearly all
imperialist countries. Kautsky not only did not trouble to oppose, was
not only unable to oppose this petty-bourgeois reformist opposition,
which is really reactionary in its economic basis, but became merged
with it in practice, and this is precisely where Kautsky and the broad
international Kautskian trend deserted Marxism.

 

In the United States, the imperialist war waged against Spain in 1898
stirred up the opposition of the “anti-imperialists”, the last of the
Mohicans of bourgeois democracy who declared this war to be “criminal”,
regarded the annexation of foreign territories as a violation of the
Constitution, declared that the treatment of Aguinaldo, leader of the
Filipinos (the Americans promised him the independence of his country,
but later landed troops and annexed it), was “jingo treachery”, and
quoted the words of Lincoln: “When the white man governs himself, that
is self-government; but when he governs himself and also governs others,
it is no longer self-government; it is despotism.”^(¹¹¹) But as long, as
all this criticism shrank from recognising the inseverable bond between
imperialism and the trusts, and, therefore, between imperialism and the
foundations of capitalism, while it shrank from joining the forces
engendered by large-scale capitalism and its development-it remained a
“pious wish”.

 

This is also the main attitude taken by Hobson in his critique of
imperialism. Hobson anticipated Kautsky in protesting against the
“inevitability of imperialism” argument, and in urging the necessity of
“increasing the consuming capacity” of the people (under capitalism!).
The petty-bourgeois point of view in the critique of imperialism, the
omnipotence of the banks, the financial oligarchy, etc., is adopted by
the authors I have often quoted, such as Agahd, A. Lansburgh, L.
Eschwege, and among the French writers Victor Berard, author of a
superficial book entitled_England and Imperialism _which appeared in
1900. All these authors, who make no claim to be Marxists, contrast
imperialism with free competition and democracy, condemn the Baghdad
railway scheme, which is leading to conflicts and war, utter “pious
wishes” for peace, etc. This applies also to the compiler of
international stock and share issue statistics, A. Neymarck, who, after
calculating the thousands of millions of francs representing
“international” securities, exclaimed in 1912: “Is it possible to
believe that peace may be disturbed ... that, in the face of these
enormous figures, anyone would risk starting a war?”^(¹¹²)

 

Such simple-mindedness on the part of the bourgeois economists is not
surprising; moreover, _it is in their interest _to pretend to be so
naive and to talk “seriously” about peace under imperialism. But what
remains of Kautsky’s Marxism, when, in 1914, 1915 and 1916, he takes up
the same bourgeois-reformist point of view and affirms that “everybody
is agreed” (imperialists, pseudo- socialists and social-pacifists) on
the matter of peace? Instead of an analysis of imperialism and an
exposure of the depths of its contradictions, we have nothing but a
reformist “pious wish” to wave them aside, to evade them.

 

Here is a sample of Kautsky’s economic criticism of imperialism. He
takes the statistics of the British export and import trade with Egypt
for 1872 and 1912; it seems that this export and import trade has grown
more slowly than British foreign trade as a whole. From this Kautsky
concludes that “we have no reason to suppose that without military
occupation the growth of British trade with Egypt would have been less,
simply as a result of the mere operation of economic factors”. “The urge
of capital to expand ... can be best promoted, not by the violent
methods of imperialism, but by peaceful democracy.”^(¹¹³)

 

This argument of Kautsky’s, which is repeated in every key by his
Russian armour-bearer (and Russian shielder of the social-chauvinists),
Mr. Spectator, constitutes the basis of Kautskian critique of
imperialism, and that is why we must deal with it in greater detail. We
will begin with a quotation from Hilferding, whose conclusions Kautsky
on many occasions, and notably in April 1915, has declared to have been
“unanimously adopted by all socialist theoreticians”.

 

“It is not the business of the proletariat,” writes Hilferding “to
contrast the more progressive capitalist policy with that of the now
bygone era of free trade and of hostility towards the state. The reply
of the proletariat to the economic policy of finance capital, to
imperialism, cannot be free trade, but socialism. The aim of proletarian
policy cannot today be the ideal of restoring free competition—which has
now become a reactionary ideal—but the complete elimination of
competition by the abolition of capitalism.”^(¹¹⁴)

 

Kautsky broke with Marxism by advocating in the epoch of finance capital
a “reactionary ideal”, “peaceful democracy”, “the mere operation of
economic factors”, for _objectively _this ideal drags us back from
monopoly to non-monopoly capitalism, and is a reformist swindle.

 

Trade with Egypt (or with any other colony or semi-colony) “would have
grown more” _without _military occupation, without imperialism, and
without finance capital. What does this mean? That capitalism would have
developed more rapidly if free competition had not been restricted by
monopolies in general, or by the “connections”, yoke (i.e., also the
monopoly) of finance capital, or by the monopolist possession of
colonies by certain countries?

 

Kautsky’s argument can have no other meaning; and _this_ “meaning” is
meaningless. Let us assume that free competition, without any sort of
monopoly, would have developed capitalism and trade more rapidly. But
the more rapidly trade and capitalism develop, the greater is the
concentration of production and capital which _gives rise _to monopoly.
And monopolies have _already_arisen—precisely out of free competition!
Even if monopolies have now begun to retard progress, it is not an
argument in favour of free competition, which has become impossible
after it has given rise to monopoly.

Whichever way one turns Kautsky’s argument, one will find nothing in it
except reaction and bourgeois reformism.

 

Even if we correct this argument and say, as Spectator says, that the
trade of the colonies with Britain is now developing more slowly than
their trade with other countries, it does not save Kautsky; for it _is
also _monopoly, _also _imperialism that is beating Great Britain, only
it is the monopoly and imperialism of another country (America,
Germany). It is known that the cartels have given rise to a new and
peculiar form of protective tariffs, i.e., goods suitable for export are
protected (Engels noted this in Vol. III of _Capital_). It is known,
too, that the cartels add finance capital have a system peculiar to
themselves, that of “exporting goods at cut-rate prices”, or “dumping”,
as the English call it: within a given country the cartel sells its
goods at high monopoly prices, but sells them abroad at a much lower
price to undercut the competitor, to enlarge its own production to the
utmost, etc. If Germany’s trade with the British colonies is developing
more rapidly than Great Britain’s, it only proves that German
imperialism is younger, stronger and better organised than British
imperialism, is superior to it; but it by no means proves the
“superiority” of free trade, for it is not a fight between free trade
and protection and colonial dependence, but between two rival
imperialisms, two monopolies, two groups of finance capital. The
superiority of German imperialism over British imperialism is more
potent than the wall of colonial frontiers or of protective tariffs: to
use this as an “argument” in _favour _of free trade and “peaceful
democracy” is banal, it means forgetting the essential features and
characteristics of imperialism, substituting petty-bourgeois reformism
for Marxism.

 

It is interesting to note that even the bourgeois economist, A.
Lansburgh, whose criticism of imperialism is as petty-bourgeois as
Kautsky’s, nevertheless got closer to a more scientific study of trade
statistics. He did not compare one single country, chosen at random, and
one single colony with the other countries; he examined the export trade
of an imperialist country: (1) with countries which are financially
dependent upon it, and borrow money from it; and (2) with countries
which are financially independent. He obtained the following results:

 

EXPORT TRADE OF GERMANY (000,000 marks)

TO COUNTRIES FINANCIALLY 
DEPENDENT ON 
Germany

1889

1908

Per cent
increase

Rumania

48.2

70.8

47

Portugal

19.0

32.8

73

Argentina

60.7

147.0

143

Brazil

48.7

84.5

73

Chile

28.3

64.0

114

Total

234.8

451.5

92

To countries
financially
independent
of Germany

1889

1908

Per cent
increase

Great Britain

651.8

997.4

53

France

210.2

437.9

108

Belgium

137.2

322.8

135

Switzerland

177.4

401.1

127

Australia

21.2

64.5

205

Dutch East 
Indies

8.8

40.7

363

Total

1,206.6

2,264.4

87

 

Lansburgh did not draw _conclusions _and therefore, strangely enough,
failed to observe that if the figures prove anything at all, they prove
that _he is wrong, _for the exports to countries financially dependent
on Germany have grown _more rapidly, _if only slightly, than exports to
the countries which are financially independent. (I emphasise the “if”,
for Lansburgh’s figures are far from complete.)

 

Tracing the connection between exports and loans, Lansburgh writes:

 

“In 1890-91, a Rumanian loan was floated through the German banks, which
had already in previous years made advances on this loan. It was used
chiefly to purchase railway materials in Germany. In 1891, German
exports to Rumania amounted to 55 million marks. The following year they
dropped to 39.4 million marks and, with fluctuations, to 25.4 million in
1900. Only in very recent years have they regained the level of 1891,
thanks to two new loans.

“German exports to Portugal rose, following the loans of 1888- to
21,100,000 (1890); then, in the two following years, they dropped to
16,200,000 and 7,400,000, and regained their former level only in 1903.

 

“The figures of German trade with Argentina are still more striking.
Loans were floated in 1888 and 1890; German exports to Argentina reached
60,700,000 marks (1889). Two years later they amounted to only
18,600,000 marks, less than one-third of the previous figure. It was not
until 1901 that they regained and surpassed the level of 1889, and then
only as a result of new loans floated by the state and by
municipalities, with advances to build power stations, and with other
credit operations.

 

“Exports to Chile, as a consequence of the loan of 1889, rose to
45,200,000 marks (in 1892), and a year later dropped to 22,500,000
marks. A new Chilean loan floated by the German banks in 1906 was
followed by a rise of exports to 84,700,000 marks in 1907, only to fall
again to 52,400,000 marks in 1908.”^(¹¹⁵)

 

From these facts Lansburgh draws the amusing petty-bourgeois moral of
how unstable and irregular export trade is when it is bound up with
loans, how bad it is to invest capital abroad instead of “naturally” and
“harmoniously” developing home industry, how “costly” are the millions
in bakshish that Krupp has to pay in floating foreign loans, etc. But
the facts tell us clearly: the increase in exports is connected with
just _these _swindling tricks of finance capital, which is not concerned
with bourgeois morality, but with skinning the ox twice—first, it
pockets the profits from the loan; then it pockets other profits from
the _same _loan which the borrower uses to make purchases from Krupp, or
to purchase railway material from the Steel Syndicate, etc.

 

I repeat that I do not by any means consider Lansburgh’s figures to be
perfect; but I had to quote them because they are more scientific than
Kautsky’s and Spectator’s and because Lansburgh showed the correct way
to approach the question. In discussing the significance of finance
capital in regard to exports, etc., one must be able to single out the
connection of exports especially and solely with the tricks of the
financiers, especially and solely with the sale of goods by cartels,
etc. Simply to compare colonies with non-colonies, one imperialism with
another imperialism, one semi-colony or colony (Egypt) with all other
countries, is to evade and to obscure the very _essence _of the
question.

 

Kautsky’s theoretical critique of imperialism has nothing in common with
Marxism and serves only as a preamble to propaganda for peace and unity
with the opportunists and the social-chauvinists, precisely for the
reason that it evades and obscures the very profound and fundamental
contradictions of imperialism: the contradictions between monopoly and
free competition which exists side by side with it, between the gigantic
“operations” (and gigantic profits) of finance capital and “honest”
trade in the free market, the contradiction between cartels and trusts,
on the one hand, and non-cartelised industry, on the other, etc.

 

The notorious theory of “ultra-imperialism”, invented by Kautsky, is
just as reactionary. Compare his arguments on this subject in 1915, with
Hobson’s arguments in 1902.

 

Kautsky: “... Cannot the present imperialist policy be supplanted by a
new, ultra-imperialist policy, which will introduce the joint
exploitation of the world by internationally united finance capital in
place of the mutual rivalries of national finance capitals? Such a new
phase of capitalism is at any rate conceivable. Can it be achieved?
Sufficient premises are still lacking to enable us to answer this
question.”^(¹¹⁶)

 

Hobson: “Christendom thus laid out in a few great federal empires, each
with a retinue of uncivilised dependencies, seems to many the most
legitimate development of present tendencies, and one which would offer
the best hope of permanent peace on an assured basis of
inter-Imperialism.”

 

Kautsky called ultra-imperialism or super-imperialism what Hobson,
thirteen years earlier, described as inter- imperialism. Except for
coining a new and clever catchword, replacing one Latin prefix by
another, the only progress Kautsky has made in the sphere of
“scientific” thought is that he gave out as Marxism what Hobson, in
effect, described as the cant of English parsons. After the Anglo-Boer
War it was quite natural for this highly honourable caste to exert their
main efforts to _console _the British middle class and the workers who
had lost many of their relatives on the battlefields of South Africa and
who were obliged to pay higher taxes in order to guarantee still higher
profits for the British financiers. And what better consolation could
there be than the theory that imperialism is not so bad; that it stands
close to inter- (or ultra-) imperialism, which can ensure permanent
peace? No matter what the good intentions of the English parsons, or of
sentimental Kautsky, may have been, the only objective, i.e., real,
social significance of Kautsky’s “theory” is this: it is a most
reactionary method of consoling the masses with hopes of permanent peace
being possible under capitalism, by distracting their attention from the
sharp antagonisms and acute problems of the present times, and directing
it towards illusory prospects of an imaginary “ultraimperialism” of the
future. Deception of the masses—that is all there is in Kautsky’s
“Marxist” theory.

 

Indeed, it is enough to compare well-known and indisputable facts to
become convinced of the utter falsity of the prospects which Kautsky
tries to conjure up before the German workers (and the workers of all
lands). Let us consider India, Indo-China and China. It is known that
these three colonial and semi-colonial countries, with a population of
six to seven hundred million, are subjected to the exploitation of the
finance capital of several imperialist powers: Great Britain, France,
Japan, the U.S.A., etc. Let us assume that these imperialist countries
form alliances against one another in order to protect or enlarge their
possessions, their interests and their spheres of influence in these
Asiatic states; these alliances will be “inter-imperialist”, or
“ultra-imperialist” alliances. Let us assume that _all_ the imperialist
countries conclude an alliance for the “peaceful” division of these
parts of Asia; this alliance would be an alliance of “internationally
united finance capital”. There are actual examples of alliances of this
kind in the history of the twentieth century—the attitude of the powers
to China, for instance. We ask, is it “conceivable”, assuming that the
capitalist system remains intact—and this is precisely the assumption
that Kautsky does make—that such alliances would be more than temporary,
that they would eliminate friction, conflicts and struggle in every
possible form?

 

The question has only to be presented clearly for any other than a
negative answer to be impossible. This is because the only conceivable
basis under capitalism for the division of spheres of influence,
interests, colonies, etc., is a calculation of the _strength _of those
participating, their general economic, financial, military strength,
etc. And the strength of these participants in the division does not
change to an equal degree, for the _even _development of different
undertakings, trusts, branches of industry, or countries is impossible
under capitalism. Half a century ago Germany was a miserable,
insignificant country, if her capitalist strength is compared with that
of the Britain of that time; Japan compared with Russia in the same way.
Is it “conceivable” that in ten or twenty years’ time the relative
strength of the imperialist powers will have remained unchanged? It is
out of the question.

 

Therefore, in the realities of the capitalist system, and not in the
banal philistine fantasies of English parsons, or of the German
“Marxist”, Kautsky, “inter-imperialist” or “ultra-imperialist”
alliances, no matter what form they may assume, whether of one
imperialist coalition against another, or of a general alliance
embracing _all _the imperialist powers, are _inevitably nothing _more
than a “truce” in periods between wars. Peaceful alliances prepare the
ground for wars, and in their turn grow out of wars; the one conditions
the other, producing alternating forms of peaceful and non-peaceful
struggle on _one and the same _basis of imperialist connections and
relations within world economics and world politics. But in order to
pacify the workers and reconcile them with the social-chauvinists who
have deserted to the side of the bourgeoisie, over-wise
Kautsky _separates _one link of a single chain from another, separates
the present peaceful (and ultra-imperialist, nay,
ultra-ultra-imperialist) alliance of _all _the powers for the
“pacification” of China (remember the suppression of the Boxer
Rebellion^([13])) from the non-peaceful conflict of tomorrow, which will
prepare the ground for another “peaceful” general alliance for the
partition, say, of Turkey, on the day after tomorrow, _etc.,
etc. _Instead of showing the living connection between periods of
imperialist peace and periods of imperialist war, Kautsky presents the
workers with a lifeless abstraction in order to reconcile them to their
lifeless leaders.

 

An American writer, Hill, in his _A History of the Diplomacy in the
International Development of Europe _refers in his preface to the
following periods in the recent history of diplomacy: (1) the era of
revolution; (2) the constitutional movement; (3) the present era of
“commercial imperialism”.^(¹¹⁷) Another writer divides the history of
Great Britain’s “world policy” since 1870 into four periods: (1) the
first Asiatic period (that of the struggle against Russia’s advance in
Central Asia towards India); (2) the African period (approximately
1885-1902): that of the struggle against France for the partition of
Africa (the “Fashoda incident” of 1898 which brought her within a hair’s
breadth of war with France); (3) the second Asiatic period (alliance
with Japan against Russia); and (4) the “European” period, chiefly
anti-German.^(¹¹⁸) “The political patrol clashes take place on the
financial field,” wrote the banker, Riesser, in 1905, in showing how
French finance capital operating in Italy was preparing the way for a
political alliance of these countries, and how a conflict was developing
between Germany and Great Britain over Persia, between all the European
capitalists over Chinese loans, etc. Behold, the living reality of
peaceful “ultra-imperialist” alliances in their inseverable connection
with ordinary imperialist conflicts!

 

Kautsky’s obscuring of the deepest contradictions of imperialism, which
inevitably boils down to painting imperialism in bright colours, leaves
its traces in this writer’s criticism of the political features of
imperialism. Imperialism is the epoch of finance capital and of
monopolies, which introduce everywhere the striving for domination, not
for freedom. Whatever the political system, the result of these
tendencies is everywhere reaction and an extreme intensification of
antagonisms in this field. Particularly intensified become the yoke of
national oppression and the striving for annexations, i.e., the
violation of national independence (for annexation is nothing but the
violation of the right of nations to self-determination). Hilferding
rightly notes the connection between imperialism and the intensification
of national oppression. “In the newly opened-up countries,” he writes,
“the capital imported into them intensifies antagonisms and excites
against the intruders the constantly growing resistance of the peoples
who are awakening to national consciousness; this resistance can easily
develop into dangerous measures against foreign capital. The old social
relations become completely revolutionised, the age-long agrarian
isolation of ‘nations without history’ is destroyed and they are drawn
into the capitalist whirlpool. Capitalism itself gradually provides the
subjugated with the means and resources for their emancipation and they
set out to achieve the goal which once seemed highest to the European
nations: the creation of a united national state as a means to economic
and cultural freedom. This movement for national independence threatens
European capital in its most valuable and most promising fields of
exploitation, and European capital can maintain its domination only by
continually increasing its military forces.”^(¹¹⁹)

 

To this must be added that it is not only in newly opened-up countries,
but also in the old, that imperialism is leading to annexation, to
increased national oppression, and, consequently, also to increasing
resistance. While objecting to the intensification of political reaction
by imperialism, Kautsky leaves in the shade a question that has become
particularly urgent, viz., the impossibility of unity with the
opportunists in the epoch of imperialism. While objecting to
annexations, he presents his objections in a form that is most
acceptable and least offensive to the opportunists. He addresses himself
to a German audience, yet he obscures the most topical and important
point, for instance, the annexation of Alsace-Lorraine by Germany. In
order to appraise this “mental aberration” of Kautsky’s I shall take the
following example. Let us suppose that a Japanese condemns the
annexation of the Philippines by the Americans. The question is: will
many believe that he does so because he has a horror of annexations as
such, and not because he himself has a desire to annex the Philippines?
And shall we not be constrained to admit that the “fight” the Japanese
is waging against annexations can be regarded as being sincere and
politically honest only if he fights against the annexation of Korea by
Japan, and urges freedom for Korea to secede from Japan?

 

Kautsky’s theoretical analysis of imperialism, as well as his economic
and political critique of imperialism, are permeated _through and
through _with a spirit, absolutely irreconcilable with Marxism, of
obscuring and glossing over the fundamental contradictions of
imperialism and with a striving to preserve at all costs the crumbling
unity with opportunism in the European working-class movement.

 



X. THE PLACE OF IMPERIALISM IN HISTORY


 

We have seen that in its economic essence imperialism is monopoly
capitalism. This in itself determines its place in history, for monopoly
that grows out of the soil of free competition, and precisely out of
free competition, is the transition from the capitalist system to a
higher socio-economic order. We must take special note of the four
principal types of monopoly, or principal manifestations of monopoly
capitalism, which are characteristic of the epoch we are examining.

 

Firstly, monopoly arose out of the concentration of production at a very
high stage. This refers to the monopolist capitalist associations,
cartels, syndicatess, and trusts. We have seen the important part these
play in present-day economic life. At the beginning of the twentieth
century, monopolies had acquired complete supremacy in the advanced
countries, and although the first steps towards the formation of the
cartels were taken by countries enjoying the protection of high tariffs
(Germany, America), Great Britain, with her system of free trade,
revealed the same basic phenomenon, only a little later, namely, the
birth of monopoly out of the concentration of production.

 

Secondly, monopolies have stimulated the seizure of the most important
sources of raw materials, especially for the basic and most highly
cartelised industries in capitalist society: the coal and iron
industries. The monopoly of the most important sources of raw materials
has enormously increased the power of big capital, and has sharpened the
antagonism between cartelised and non-cartelised industry.

 

Thirdly, monopoly has sprung from the banks. The banks have developed
from modest middleman enterprises into the monopolists of finance
capital. Some three to five of the biggest banks in each of the foremost
capitalist countries have achieved the “personal link-up” between
industrial and bank capital, and have concentrated in their hands the
control of thousands upon thousands of millions which form the greater
part of the capital and income of entire countries. A financial
oligarchy, which throws a close network of dependence relationships over
all the economic and political institutions of present-day bourgeois
society without exception—such is the most striking manifestation of
this monopoly.

 

Fourthly, monopoly has grown out of colonial policy. To the numerous
“old” motives of colonial policy, finance capital has added the struggle
for the sources of raw materials, for the export of capital, for spheres
of influence, i.e., for spheres for profitable deals, concessions,
monopoly profits and so on, economic territory in general. When the
colonies of the European powers,for instance, comprised only one-tenth
of the territory of Africa(as was the case in 1876), colonial policy was
able to develop—by methods other than those of monopoly—by the “free
grabbing” of territories, so to speak. But when nine-tenths of Africa
had been seized (by 1900), when the whole world had been divided
up,there was inevitably ushered in the era of monopoly possession of
colonies and, consequently, of particularly intense struggle for the
division and the redivision of the world.

 

The extent to which monopolist capital has intensified all the
contradictions of capitalism is generally known. It is sufficient to
mention the high cost of living and the tyranny of the cartels. This
intensification of contradictions constitutes the most powerful driving
force of the transitional period of history, which began from the time
of the final victory of world finance capital.

 

Monopolies, oligarchy, the striving for domination and not for freedom,
the exploitation of an increasing number of small or weak nations by a
handful of the richest or most powerful nations—all these have given
birth to those distinctive characteristics of imperialism which compel
us to define it as parasitic or decaying capitalism. More and more
prominently there emerges, as one of the tendencies of imperialism, the
creation of the “rentier state”, the usurer state, in which the
bourgeoisie to an ever-increasing degree lives on the proceeds of
capital exports and by “clipping coupons”. It would be a mistake to
believe that this tendency to decay precludes the rapid growth of
capitalism. It does not. In the epoch of imperialism, certain branches
of industry, certain strata of the bourgeoisie and certain countries
betray, to a greater or lesser degree, now one and now another of these
tendencies. On the whole, capitalism is growing far more rapidly than
before; but this growth is not only becoming more and more uneven in
general, its unevenness also manifests itself, in particular, in the
decay of the countries which are richest in capital (Britain).

 

In regard to the rapidity of Germany’s economic development, Riesser,
the author of the book on the big German banks, states: “The progress of
the preceding period (1848-70), which had not been exactly slow,
compares with the rapidity with which the whole of Germany’s national
economy, and with it German banking, progressed during this period
(1870-1905) in about the same way as the speed of the mail coach in the
good old days compares with the speed of the present-day automobile ...
which is whizzing past so fast that it endangers not only innocent
pedestrians in its path, but also the occupants of the car.” In its
turn, this finance capital which has grown with such
extraordinary rapidity is not unwilling, precisely because it has grown
so quickly, to pass on to a more “tranquil” possession of colonies which
have to be seized—and not only by peaceful methods—from richer nations.
In the United States, economic development in the last decades has been
even more rapid than in Germany, _and for this very reason_, the
parasitic features of modern American capitalism have stood out with
particular prominence. On the other hand, a comparison of, say, the
republican American bourgeoisie with the monarchist Japanese or German
bourgeoisie shows that the most pronounced political distinction
diminishes to an extreme degree in the epoch of imperialism—not because
it is unimportant in general, but because in all these cases we are
talking about a bourgeoisie which has definite features of parasitism.

 

The receipt of high monopoly profits by the capitalists in one of the
numerous branches of industry, in one of the numerous countries, etc.,
makes it economically possible for them to bribe certain sections of the
workers, and for a time a fairly considerable minority of them, and win
them to the side of the bourgeoisie of a given industry or given nation
against all the others. The intensification of antagonisms between
imperialist nations for the division of the world increases this urge.
And so there is created that bond between imperialism and opportunism,
which revealed itself first and most clearly in Great Britain, owing to
the fact that certain features of imperialist development were
observable there much earlier than in other countries. Some writers, L.
Martov, for example, are prone to wave aside the connection between
imperialism and opportunism in the working-class movement—a particularly
glaring fact at the present time—by resorting to “official optimism” (_à
la_ Kautsky and Huysmans) like the following: the cause of the opponents
of capitalism would be hopeless if it were progressive capitalism that
led to the increase of opportunism, or, if it were the best-paid workers
who were inclined towards opportunism, etc. We must have no illusions
about “optimism” of this kind. It is optimism in respect of opportunism;
it is optimism which serves to conceal opportunism. As a matter of fact
the extraordinary rapidity and the particularly revolting character of
the development of opportunism is by no means a guarantee that its
victory will be durable: the rapid growth of a painful abscess on a
healthy body can only cause it to burst more quickly and thus relieve
the body of it. The most dangerous of all in this respect are those who
do not wish to understand that the fight against imperialism is a sham
and humbug unless it is inseparably bound up with the fight against
opportunism.

 

From all that has been said in this book on the economic essence of
imperialism, it follows that we must define it as capitalism in
transition, or, more precisely, as moribund capitalism. It is very
instructive in this respect to note that bourgeois economists, in
describing modern capitalism, frequently employ catchwords and phrases
like “interlocking”, “absence of isolation”, etc.; “in conformity with
their functions and course of development”, banks are “not purely
private business enterprises: they are more and more outgrowing the
sphere of purely private business regulation”. And this very Riesser,
whose words I have just quoted, declares with all seriousness that the
“prophecy” of the Marxists concerning “socialisation” has “not come
true”!

 

What then does this catchword “interlocking” express? It merely
expresses the most striking feature of the process going on before our
eyes. It shows that the observer counts the separate trees, but cannot
see the wood. It slavishly copies the superficial, the fortuitous, the
chaotic. It reveals the observer as one who is overwhelmed by the mass
of raw material and is utterly incapable of appreciating its meaning and
importance. Ownership of shares, the relations between owners of private
property “interlock in a haphazard way”. But underlying this
interlocking, its very base, are the changing social relations of
production. When a big enterprise assumes gigantic proportions, and, on
the basis of an exact computation of mass data, organises according to
plan the supply of primary raw materials to the extent of two-thirds, or
three-fourths, of all that is necessary for tens of millions of people;
when the raw materials are transported in a systematic and organised
manner to the most suitable places of production, sometimes situated
hundreds or thousands of miles from each other; when a single centre
directs all the consecutive stages of processing the material right up
to the manufacture of numerous varieties of finished articles; when
these products are distributed according to a single plan among tens and
hundreds of millions of consumers (the marketing of oil in America and
Germany by the American oil trust)—then it becomes evident that we have
socialisation of production, and not mere “interlocking”, that private
economic and private property relations constitute a shell which no
longer fits its contents, a shell which must inevitably decay if its
removal is artificially delayed, a shell which may remain in a state of
decay for a fairly long period (if, at the worst, the cure of the
opportunist abscess is protracted), but which will inevitably be
removed.

 

The enthusiastic admirer of German imperialism, Schulze-Gaevernitz,
exclaims:

 

“Once the supreme management of the German banks has been entrusted to
the hands of a dozen persons, their activity is even today more
significant for the public good than that of the majority of the
Ministers of State... (The “interlocking” of bankers, ministers,
magnates of industry and rentiers is here conveniently forgotten.) If we
imagine the development of those tendencies we have noted carried to
their logical conclusion we will have: the money capital of the nation
united in the banks; the banks themselves combined into cartels; the
investment capital of the nation cast in the shape of securities. Then
the forecast of that genius Saint-Simon will be fulfilled: ‘The present
anarchy of production, which corresponds to the fact that economic
relations are developing without uniform regulation, must make way for
organisation in production. Production will no longer be directed by
isolated manufacturers, independent of each other and ignorant of man’s
economic needs; that will be done by a certain public institution. A
central committee of management, being able to survey the large field of
social economy from a more elevated point of view, will regulate it for
the benefit of the whole of society, will put the means of production
into suitable hands, and above all will take care that there be constant
harmony between production and consumption. Institutions already exist
which have assumed as part of their functions a certain organisation of
economic labour, the banks.’ We are still a long way from the fulfilment
of Saint-Simon’s forecast, but we are on the way towards it: Marxism,
different from what Marx imagined, but different only in form.”^(¹²⁰)

 

A crushing “refutation” of Marx indeed, which retreats a step from
Marx’s precise, scientific analysis to Saint-Simon’s guess-work, the
guess-work of a genius, but guess-work all the same.

 

 

 



NOTES


[←1]

      Figures taken from _Annalen des deutschen Reichs_, 1911, Zahn
    —_Lenin_

[←2]

     _Statistical Abstract of the United States, 1912_, p. 202 —_Lenin_

[←3]

     _Finance Capital_, Russ. ed., pp. 286-87 —_Lenin_

[←4]

     Hans Gideon Heymann, _Die gemischten Werke im deutschen
    Grosseiseugewerbe_, Stuttgart, 1904, (S. 256, 278). —_Lenin_

[←5]

     Hermann Levy, _Monopole, Kartelle und Trusts_, Jena, 1909, S. 286,
    290, —_Lenin_

[←6]

     Th. Vogelstein, “_Die finanzielle Organisation der kapitalistischen
    Industrie und die Monopolbildungen_” in _Grundriss der
    Sozialökonomik_, VI. Abt., Tubingen, 1914. Cf., also by the same
    author: _Organisationsformen der Eisenindustrie und Textilindustrie
    in England und Amerika_, Bd. 1, Lpz., 1910. —_Lenin_

[←7]

     Dr. Riesser, _Die deutschen Grossbanken und ihre Konzentration im
    Zusammenhange mit der Entwicklung der Gesamtwirtschaft in
    Deutschland_, 4. Aufl., 1912, S. 149; Robert Liefmann, _Kartelle und
    Trusts und die Weiterbildung der volkswirtschaftlichen
    Organisation,_ 2. Aufl., 1910, S. 25. —_Lenin_

[←8]

     Dr. Fritz Kestner, _Der Organisationszwang. Eine Untersuchung über
    die Kämpfe zwischen Kartellen und Aussenseitern_, Berlin, 1912, S.
    11. —_Lenin_

[←9]

     R. Liefmann, _Beteiligungs- und Finanziertingsgesellschaften. Eine
    Studie über den modernen Kapitalismus und das Effektenwesen_, 1.
    Aufl., Jena, 1909, S. 212. —_Lenin_

[←10]

     Ibid., S. 218. —Lenin

[←11]

     Dr. S. Tschierschky, _Kartell und Trust_, Göttingen, 1903, S. 13.
    —_Lenin_

[←12]

     Tr. Vogelstein, _Organisationsformen_, S. 275. —_Lenin_

[←13]

     _Report of the Commissioner of Corporations on the Tobacco
    Industry_, Washington, 1909, p. 266, cited according to Dr. Paul
    Tafel, _Die nordamerikanischen Trusts und ihre Wirkungen auf den
    Fortschritt der Technik_, Stuttgart, 1913, S. 48. —_Lenin_

[←14]

     Dr. P. Tafel, _ibid_., S. 49. —_Lenin_

[←15]

     Riesser, op. cit., third edition, p. 547 et seq. The newspapers
    (June 1916) report the formation of a new gigantic trust which
    combines the chemical industry of Germany. —_Lenin_

[←16]

     Kestner, op.cit., S. 254 —_Lenin_

[←17]

      L. Eschwege, “Zement” in _Die Bank_, 1909, S. 115 et. seq.
    —_Lenin_

[←18]

     Jeidels, _Das Verhältnis der deutschen Grossbanken zur Industrie
    mit besonderer Berüchsichtigung der Eisenindustrie_, Leipzig,
    1905, S. 271 —_Lenin_

[←19]

     _Liefmann, Beteiligungs- und Finanzierungsgesellschaften_, S, 434.
    —_Lenin_

[←20]

      _Ibid_, S. 465-66 —_Lenin_

[←21]

     Jeidels, op. cit., S. 108. —_Lenin_

[←22]

     Alfred Lansburgh, “Fünf Jahre deutsches Bankwesen” in _Die Bank_,
    1913, No. 8. —_Lenin_

[←23]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, “Die deutsche Kreditbank” in “_Grundriss der
    Sozialökonomik_”, Tübingen, 1915, 137. —_Lenin_

[←24]

     R. Liefmann, _Beteilgungs- und Finanzierungsgesellschaften. Eine
    Studie über den modernen Kapitalismus und das Effektenwesen_, I.,
    Jena, 1909, 212. —_Lenin_

[←25]

     Alfred Lansburgh, “Das Beteilgungssystem im deutschen Bankwesen”,
    in _Die Bank_, 1910, 500. —_Lenin_

[←26]

     Eugen Kaufmann, _Das französische Bankwesen_, Tübingen, 1911, 356
    and 362 —_Lenin_

[←27]

     Jean Lescure, _L’épargne en France_, Paris, 1914, p. 52. —_Lenin_

[←28]

     A. Lansburgh, “Die Bank mit den 300 Millionen” in _Die Bank_,
    1914, p. 426 —_Lenin_

[←29]

     S. Tschierschky, op. cit., 128. —_Lenin_

[←30]

     Statistics of the National Monetary Commission, quoted in Die Bank,
    1910, S. 1200. —Lenin

[←31]

     _Die Bank_, 1913, S 811. —_Lenin_

[←32]

     _Die Bank_, 1914, S 316. —_Lenin_

[←33]

     Dr. Oscar Stillich,_ Geld- und Bankwesen,_ Berlin, 1907, S. 169.
    —_Lenin_

[←34]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, “Die deutsche Kreditbank” in _Grundriss der
    Sozialökonomik_, Tübingen, 1915, S. 101 —_Lenin_

[←35]

     Riesser, op. cit., 4th ed., S 629. —_Lenin_

[←36]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, “Die deutsche Kreditbank” in _Grundriss der
    Sozialökonomik,_ Tübingen, 1915, S. 151 —_Lenin_

[←37]

     _Die Bank_, 1912, S. 435. —_Lenin_

[←38]

     Quoted by Schulze-Gaevernitz, op. cit., S 155 —_Lenin_

[←39]

     Jeidels, op. cit.; Riesser, op. cit. —_Lenin_

[←40]

     Jeidels, op. cit., S 156-57 —_Lenin_

[←41]

     An article by Eug. Kaufmann on French banks in _Die Bank_, 1909, 2,
    S 851 et. seq. —_Lenin_

[←42]

     Dr. Oscar Stillich, _Geld- und Bankwesen_, Berlin, 1907, S. 147.
    —_Lenin_

[←43]

     Jeidels, op. cit., S 183-84 —_Lenin_

[←44]

     _ibid_, S. 181. —_Lenin_

[←45]

     R. Hilferding, _Finance Capital_, Moscow, 1912 (in Russian), pp.
    338-39. —_Lenin_

[←46]

     R. Liefmann, op. cit., S. 476. —_Lenin_

[←47]

     Hans Gideon Fleymann, _Die gemischten Werke im deutschen
    Grosseisengewerbe_ Stuttgart, 1904, S. 268-69. —_Lenin_

[←48]

     Liefmann, _Beteiligungsgesellschaften_, etc., S. 258 of the first
    edition. —_Lenin_

[←49]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz in _Grundriss der Sozialökonomik_, V, 2, S. 110.
    —_Lenin_

[←50]

     L. Eschwege, “Tochtergesellschaften” in _Die Bank_, 1914, S.545
    —_Lenin_

[←51]

     Kurt Heinig, “Der Weg des Elecktrotrusts” in _Die Neue Zeit_,
    1912, 30. S. 484 —_Lenin_

[←52]

     E. Agahd, _Grossbanken und Weltmarkt. Die wirstschaftliche und
    politische Bedeutung der Grossbanken im Weltmarkt unter
    Berüchsichtigung ihres Einflusses auf Russlands Volkswirtscahft und
    die deutsche-russichen Beziehungen,_ Berlin, 1914 —_Lenin_

[←53]

     Lysis, _Contre l’oligarchie financière en France_, 5 ed. Paris,
    1908, pp. 11, 12, 26, 39, 40, 48. —_Lenin_

[←54]

     _Die Bank_, 1913, No. 7, S. 630. —_Lenin_

[←55]

     Stillich, op. cit., S. 143, also W. Sombart, _Die deutsche
    Volkswirtschaft im 19. jahrhundert,_ 2. Aufl., 1909, S. 526,
    Anlage 8. —_Lenin_

[←56]

     _Finance Capital_, p. 172. —_Lenin_

[←57]

     Stillich, op. cit., S. 138 and Liefmann, op. cit., S. 51. —_Lenin_

[←58]

     In _Die Bank_, 1913, S. 952, L. Eschwege,_ Der Sumpf_; _ibid_.,
    1912, 1, S. 223 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←59]

     “Verkehrstrust” in _Die Bank_, 1914, 1, S. 89. —_Lenin_

[←60]

     “Der Zug zur Bank” in _Die Bank_, 1909, 1, S. 79. —_Lenin_

[←61]

     _ibid_., S. 301. —_Lenin_

[←62]

     _ibid_., 1911, 2, S. 825; 1913, 2, S. 962. —_Lenin_

[←63]

     E. Agahd, op. cit., S. 202. —_Lenin_

[←64]

     _Bulletin de l’institut international de statistique_, t. XIX,
    livr. II, La Haye, 1912. Data concerning small states, second
    column, are estimated by adding 20 per cent to the 1902 figures.
    —_Lenin_

[←65]

     Hobson, _Imperialism_, London, 1902, p. 58; Riesser, op. cit., S.
    395 und 404; P. Arndt in _Weltwirtschaftliches Archiv_, Bd. 7,
    1916, S. 35; Neymarck in _Bulletin_; Hilferding, _Finance
    Capital_, p. 492; Lloyd George, Speech in the House of Commons, May
    4, 1915. reported in the _Daily Telegraph_, May 5, 1915; B.
    Harms, _Probleme der Weltwirtschaft_ , Jena, 1912, S. 235 et seq.;
    Dr. Siegmund Schilder, _Entwicklungstendenzen der Weltwirtschaft_,
    Berlin, 1912, Band 1, S. 150; George Paish, “Great Britain’s Capital
    Investments, etc.”, in _Journal of the Royal Statistical
    Society,_ Vol. LXXIV, 1910-11, P. 167 et seq.; Georges
    Diouritch, _L’Expansion des banques allemandes a l’ètranger, ses
    rapports avec le développement économique de l’Allemagne_, Paris,
    1909, p. 84. —_Lenin_

[←66]

     _Die Bank_, 1913, 2, S. 1024-25. —_Lenin_

[←67]

     Schilder, op. cit., S. 346, 350, 371. —_Lenin_

[←68]

     Riesser, op. cit., 4th ed., S. 375; Diouritch, p. 283. —_Lenin_

[←69]

     _The Annals of the American Academy of Political and Social
    Science_, Vol. LIX, May 1915, p. 301. In the same volume on p. 3.31,
    we read that the well-known statistician Paish, in the last issue of
    the financial magazine _The Statist_, estimated the amount of
    capital exported by Britain, Germany, France, Belgium and Holland at
    $40,000 million, i.e., 200,000 million francs. —_Lenin_

[←70]

     Jeidels, op. cit., S. 232. —_Lenin_

[←71]

     Riesser, op. cit.; Diouritch, op. cit., p. 239; Kurt Heinig, op.
    cit. —_Lenin_

[←72]

      Jeidels, op. cit., S. 192-93. —_Lenin_

[←73]

     Diouritch, op. cit., pp. 245-46. —_Lenin_

[←74]

     _Die Bank_, 1912, 1, S. 1036; 1912, 2, S. 629; 1913, 1, S. 388.
    —_Lenin_

[←75]

     Riesser, op. cit., S. 125. —_Lenin_

[←76]

     Vogelstein, _Organisationsformen_, S. 100. —_Lenin_

[←77]

      Liefmann, _Kartelle und Trusts_, 2. A., S. 161. —_Lenin_

[←78]

     A. Supan, _Die territoriale Entwicklung der europäischen Kolonien_,
    1906, S. 254. —_Lenin_

[←79]

     Henry C. Morris, _The History of Colonisation_, New York, 1900,
    Vol. II, p. 88; Vol. 1, p. 419; Vol. 11, p. 304. —_Lenin_

[←80]

      _Die Neue Zeit_, XVI, 1, 1898, S. 302. —_Lenin_

[←81]

     _Ibid_., S. 304. —_Lenin_

[←82]

     C. P. Lucas, _Greater Rome and Greater Britain_, Oxford, 1912, or
    the Earl of Cromer’s _Ancient and Modern Imperialism_, London, 1910.
    —_Lenin_

[←83]

      Schilder, op. cit., S. 38-42. —_Lenin_

[←84]

     See pp. 256–57 of this volume.—_Ed_.

[←85]

     Wahl,_ La France aux colonies_ quoted by Henri Russier, _Le Partage
    de l’Océanie_, Paris, 1905, p. 165. —_Lenin_

[←86]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, _Britischer Imperialismus und englischer
    Freihandel zu Beginn des 20-ten Jahrhunderts,_ Leipzig, 1906, S.
    318. Sartorius v. Waltershausen says the same in_Das
    volkswirtschaftliche System der Kapitalanlage im Auslande,_ Berlin,
    1907, S. 46. —_Lenin_

[←87]

     Schilder, op. cit., Vol. I, S. 160-61. —_Lenin_

[←88]

     J. E. Driault, _Problèmes politiques et sociaux,_ Paris, 1900, p.
    299. —_Lenin_

[←89]

     _Die Neue Zeit_, 1914, 2 (B. 32), S. 909, Sept. 11, 1914; cf. 1915,
    2, S. 107 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←90]

     Hobson, _Imperialism_, London, 1902, p. 324. —_Lenin_

[←91]

     _Die Neue Zeit_, 1914, 2 (B. 32), S. 921, Sept. 11, 1914. Cf. 1915,
    2, S. 107 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←92]

     _Ibid_., 1915, 1, S. 144, April 30, 1915. —_Lenin_

[←93]

     R. Calwer, _Einfü hrung in die Weltwirtschaft_, Berlin, 1906.
    —_Lenin_

[←94]

     _Statistisches Jahrbuch für das deutsche Reich, 1915; Archiv für
    Eisenbahnwesen,_ 1892. Minor details for the distribution of
    railways among the colonies of the various countries in 1890 had to
    be estimated approximately. —_Lenin_

[←95]

     Cf. also Edgar Crammond, “The Economic Relations of the British and
    German Empires” in _The Journal of the Royal Statistical Society_,
    July 1914, p. 777 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←96]

     Hobson, op. cit., pp. 59, 62. —_Lenin_

[←97]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, _Britischer Imperialismus_, S. 320 et seq.
    —_Lenin_

[←98]

     Sartorius von Waltershausen, _Das volkswirtschaftliche System_,
    etc., Berlin, 1907, Buch IV. —_Lenin_

[←99]

     Schilder, op. cit., S. 393. —_Lenin_

[←100]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, op. cit., S. 122. —_Lenin_

[←101]

     _Die Bank_, 1911, 1, S. 10-11. —_Lenin_

[←102]

     Hobson, op. cit., pp. 103, 205, 144, 335, 386. —_Lenin_

[←103]

     Gerhard Hildebrand, _Die Erschütterung der Industrieherrschaft und
    des Industriesozialismus_, 1910, S. 229 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←104]

     Schulze-Gaevernitz, _Britischer Imperialismus_ S. 301. —_Lenin_

[←105]

     _Statistik des Deutschen Reichs_, Bd. 211. —_Lenin_

[←106]

     Henger, _Die Kapitalsanlage der Franzosen_, Stuttgart, 1913.
    —_Lenin_

[←107]

     Hourwich, _Immigralion and Labour,_ New York, 1913. —_Lenin_

[←108]

     _Briefwechsel von Marx und Engels_, Bd. II, S. 290; 1V, 433—Karl
    Kautsky, _Sozialismus und Kolonialpolitik_, Berlin, 1907, S. 79;
    this pamphlet was written by Kautsky in those infinitely distant
    days when he was still a Marxist. —_Lenin_

[←109]

     Russian social-chauvinism in its overt form, represented by the
    Potresovs, Chkenkelis, Maslovs, etc., and its covert form (Chkeidze,
    Skobelev, Axelrod, Martov, etc.) also emerged from the Russian
    variety of opportunism, namely, liquidationism. —_Lenin_

[←110]

     _Weltwirtschaffliches Archiv_, Bd. II, S. 193. —_Lenin_

[←111]

     J. Patouillet_, L’impérialisme américain, _Dijon, 1904, p. 272.
    —_Lenin_

[←112]

     _Bulletin de l’Institut International de Statistique, _T.
    XIX_, _Lvr. II, p. 225. —_Lenin_

[←113]

     Kautsky, _Nationalstaat, imperialistischer Staat und
    Staatenbund, _Nürnberg, 1915, S. 72, 70. —_Lenin_

[←114]

     _Finance Capital,_ p. 567. —_Lenin_

[←115]

     _Die Bank, _1909, 2, S. 819 et seq. —_Lenin_

[←116]

     _Die Neue Zeit_, April 30, 1915, S. 144. —_Lenin_

[←117]

     David Jayne Hill, _History of the Diplomacy in the International
    Development of Europe_, Vol. I, p. X. —_Lenin_

[←118]

     Schilder, op. cit., S. 178. —_Lenin_

[←119]

     _Finance Capital_, p. 487. —_Lenin_

[←120]

     _Grundriss der Sozialökonomik_, S. 146. —_Lenin_
